_	He did, however, appreciate the fact that it allowed his island to stay independent from Guernsey.
_	In the spring of 1876, another uprising erupted in the south-central Bulgarian lands despite the fact that there were numerous regular Turkish troops in those areas.
_	It remains to be seen what will come of the school but concerns have been published in the local media regarding the fact that all of the Catholic high schools in the vicinity are at capacity and have started to refuse Catholic boys admission.
_	Delays were attributed to excessive construction activity in Las Vegas, and to the fact that inspections of safety systems did not occur as initially scheduled.
_	The power spectral density of the stochastic force formula_45 can be derived by using the equipartition theorem and the fact that Brownian collisions are completely uncorrelated:
_	Thereafter other scenes are also shown which consolidates the fact that they had a happy relationship which forms the core theme for the rest of the music video.
_	The meaning of Dromio’s line has not been satisfactorily explained by critics, but Oxfordians say the line is somehow connected to the fact that de Vere was given a £1,000 annuity by the Queen, later continued by King James.
_	This was due to the fact that the war on drugs in Mexico has claimed thousands of lives and many directly associated cannabis as a bad thing.
_	He concluded his review by saying "The Spoils Of War" anchors itself on characters whose stories are far from over, and crafts a reunion and a battle sequence that end no stories and yet draw meaning from the fact that technically, at this point, any story could end at any moment."
_	The Orthodox believe these icons do more than visually remind the viewer of the fact that there are saints in heaven, they believe that these icons act as 'windows' into heaven through which we see those saints, Christ and the Theotokos.
_	As a feminist she drew attention to the fact that historically, women were not the producers of the ceramics themselves; they were only allowed to decorate them.
_	In an article concerning her, Kotaku's Evan Narcisse praised the fact that Nilin did not have racial stereotypes attached to her character, and that her quest in the game was not driven by an ethnic-derived social situation.
_	Many of Torres's articles were so critical of the government that, owing to the fact that he was a government employee, he signed with an alias, “Serpico.
_	Afterwards, Camille begins to become targeted by Scorch as she is unknowingly helping Jarrod regain control over himself due to the fact that it is really Jarrod that has feelings for her, rather than Dai Shi.
_	In the end he had no success in retrieving his land or his lost rents, despite the fact that both Charles Carroll of Carrollton and Samuel Chase argued in his favor.
_	The name derives from the fact that it is formed of eight peaks which spread like a "Moustache" and it is located in between the Anaimalai Hills and Palani Hills near Suryanelli around 20km away from Munnar.
_	The relevance of quantum non-equilibrium states to physics lies in the fact that they can lead to different predictions for results of experiments, depending on whether the De Broglie–Bohm theory in its stochastic form or the Copenhagen interpretation is assumed to describe reality.
_	It was hampered by the fact that World War II was ongoing and by India's literacy and education standards.
_	Canadian Confederation became a reality in 1867, but received much resistance from the merchant classes of Halifax, and from many prominent Halifax politicians due to the fact that both Halifax and Nova Scotia were at the time very wealthy, held trading ties with Boston and New York which would be damaged, and did not see the need for the colony to give up its comparative independence.
_	He was proud of the fact that at his death he had finally sold the last of the lots.
_	Due to their shared association with skiing and the fact that both place names referring to Ullr and Skaði appear most frequently in Sweden, some scholars have proposed a particular connection between the two gods.
_	The passive posture of the Austrian Corps was due partly to a lack of orders to advance further and partly to the fact that Klenau's relatively small force was by now out of touch with the main Austrian force.
_	Despite the fact that he was injured, Robinson and Fanny Seward immediately applied first aid to the wounded Secretary of State, stopping his bleeding and saving his life.
_	However, the Prosecutor General of the USSR Nikolai Trubin closed the case due to the fact that the decision to recognize the independence of the Baltic states was not personally made by the President, but by the State Council.
_	Dairoku's name comes from the fact that he was born in the 6th year of the Taishō period at Itoshima, Fukuoka ("roku" means "six" in Japanese).
_	Caribou antler was chosen because of its unique handle-like shaft, as well as the fact that caribou are universally present in all three of Canada's Territories.
_	Social nests are more common, despite the fact that brood productivity is actually lower when females choose to nest together.
_	Not much is known about them, besides the fact that they are eaten by the birdlike Rawwks.
_	This concept was developed as a response to the fact that the code base of many open-source projects can be so massive and its organization so complex that individual users often find the task of interpreting the underlying code too daunting when they are interested in a small portion of the overall code base, e.g. if the user would like to know how a particular tool or algorithm operates.
_	While 'green' is unaffected (produced with 2 color filters), color inaccuracy arises from the fact that the red and blue sensors (as found in the standard Bayer filter) are in effect conflated into 'magenta' and 'cyan' sensors.
_	It is also well known for the fact that it was the first place in England to try out rock groynes.
_	Contrary to popular belief, a bee does not always die soon after stinging; this misconception is based on the fact that a bee will usually die after stinging a human or other mammal.
_	In it Malkoff discusses the fact that every time Will Ferrell has appeared as the first guest on a talk show, the show has not made it past a season.
_	This is mainly attributed to the fact that the coatings not only have high hardness and intrinsic lubricity but also afford excellent corrosion resistance and deposit uniformity.
_	Raymond is still angry at the fact that she has ended him up in this situation.
_	The future Patriarch Justinian owed his ascendancy within the church hierarchy to the fact that he had helped the Communist leader Gheorghe Gheorghiu-Dej to hide in the parish house at St. George's after the latter's escape from the Târgu Jiu internment camp in 1944.
_	Visorak leader Sidorak wanted to simply kill them,and he would have except for the fact that Roodaka, viceroy of the Visorak, persuaded Sidorak to mutate them and then let them fall to their deaths.
_	This can be further optimized considering the fact that we do not need to consider all ranges formula_31 but instead just formula_36.
_	In this way, all other groups can share in the fact that they are not part of the specific group being discriminated against.
_	For example, if a Native American had a lighter skin complexion, the fact that he/she is closer to the white side of the Black-White binary makes it possible for them to avoid discrimination because they are closer to being white than black.
_	In this case the court had to weigh the accused's personal circumstances (and more particularly the fact that he was already relatively old and suffering ill-health) against the nature of the crime and the interests of society.
_	Laga'aia said the fact that Elijah is a "6'2 Polynesian man with a white collar" who looks more suited to playing rugby is a lot for viewers to understand.
_	Fossils assignable to the genus occur in the Pleistocene in Europe and in the Late Pliocene of Kazakhstan, despite the fact that molecular data suggest the lineage is no younger than 8.5 million years.
_	According to Hort, it was written in the West, probably in Rome, as suggested by the fact that the chapter division in the Acts of the Apostles common to Sinaiticus and Vaticanus occurs in no other Greek manuscript, but is found in several manuscripts of the Latin Vulgate.
_	“I am certainly conscious of the fact that it is hard for a refugee + woman to find something.
_	I think it was partially the fact that AIP had become a public company and Sam was Jewish and they didn’t want to be accused of being anti-Semitic."
_	This was tied to the fact that the Polish Parliament (the Sejm) changed the Law on Assemblies, giving priority for reservation of a venue to cyclical events, such as the Smolensk monthlies.
_	One was due to the fact that the Canal Zone surcharge was printed on small quantities of stamps, with copper faced type which was reset at least five times for some of the values.
_	The proof uses the fact that the "n"-th triangular number is given by
_	Clearly, his early work on the expansion of the planetary nebulae and the fact that those objects result from the ejection of the outer layers of stars-the dynamical dissolution of star clusters via evaporation and of associations-created a logical background for his radical conclusion that the basic evolutionary processes in the Universe are not contraction and condensation.
_	Due to the fact that "T. indictiva" is established throughout much of Mexico, especially in areas with poor economic conditions, they are difficult to manage.
_	The passage was not especially noteworthy, except for the fact that Captain Marshall had beaten out of the Sunda Straits under double reefed topsails—a feat that very few square-riggers of that or any other time could have accomplished ...
_	Helping with this is the fact that, contrary to American comic magazines, Belgian magazines were letter-sized like regular news magazines (technically they were in A4 paper format).
_	From January 1989 Littman sought to make public at the Commission the fact that Hamas in its ideology calls for the annihilation of Israel, and points to Islamic texts for support of its position.
_	Arène's election to the general council of Corsica in August 1880, despite the fact that technically he was ineligible since he was not yet 25 years old.
_	Witnessing such splendor, Lisa is both surprised and touched by the fact that Akeem would have given it up just for her.
_	This road is noteworthy in the fact that it used to be part of the famed U.S. Route 66.
_	Beg also prevented autopsies of the dead to hide the fact that everyone on the plane had died from gas poisoning.
_	Opponents of the referendum point to the fact that the timing of the turnout was peculiar: after the first day of voting, the turnout was only 18.03%, and on Sunday morning it started rising slowly, reaching 46% at 5PM..
_	The 2004 dispute also raised concerns about reliability of Gazprom's supplies to Europe, and highlighted the fact that Gazprom had not solved the issue of reliable transit.
_	Leonard Newell admitted that his band went ahead with the previous name change from Wolf Am I to Brother despite being aware of the fact that other musicians were already using the name.
_	The last three royal titles were given late, due to the fact that the temple was not under royal patronage, and therefore received less attention from the royal family than other temples.
_	The internationalization is confirmed moreover by the fact that three conferences already took place outside of Europe - in Calgary (Canada) in 2007, Canberra (Australia) in 2009 and Shanghai (China) in 2011.
_	"Reichskanzlei Berchtesgaden" ("Reich Chancellery Berchtesgaden"), another nickname of the regime (named after the eponymous town located in the vicinity of Hitler's mountain residence where he spent much of his time in office) was also banned at the same time, despite the fact that a sub-section of the Chancellery was in fact installed there to serve Hitler's needs.
_	It was the band's second album, and takes its title from the fact that it was recorded in 34 hours.
_	In November 2012, the project's scientists stated that, given the fact that there is no immediate danger of an influenza outbreak, all of the project's results would be posted online and their resources would be refocused on the Dengue Project.
_	This could be attested by the fact that by 1917, four municipal districts of the province were organized into regular municipalities.
_	Both countries are also united by the fact that neither Finland or Sweden have decided to join NATO, whereas all the other Nordic Countries as well as the Baltic States are NATO members.
_	The architecture of the building has many advantages thanks to its three-dimensional facade, despite the fact that the building was built in narrow streets.
_	As Cyclops deals with the fact that his son is now old enough to be his father, the X-Men are forced to battle their mentor when Professor Xavier is transformed into the evil Onslaught, as a result of his recent attempt to wipe Magneto's mind causing Magneto's darker impulses to merge with Xavier's own subconscious darkness and manifest as a new personality.
_	The reason for the change was likely due to the fact that there is another town known as Bay Bulls.
_	The name of the game comes from the fact that three players team against the banker, like a horse raising one shoe (banker), with the other three remaining hooves on the ground (three players).
_	In his somewhat autobiographical novel, ("The Infancy of Nivasio Dolcemare"), Savinio would reflect upon the fact that:
_	The game was invented by four drinkers in Ye Olde Royal Oak Inn in Wetton, Staffordshire in 1974, who were bemoaning the fact that the United Kingdom struggled to produce any world champions.
_	Further, a role for DSCAM over-expression in contributing to the defects of cortical lamination seen in DS is supported by the fact that disruptions in other genes expressed by Cajal–Retzius cells, such as Reelin and LIS1, cause severe defects in neuroblast migration and cortical lamination.
_	Leaving aside the sale of the title rights which belonged to the FIM and the fact that the Spanish company was not specialised in motor sport, ""they seemed satisfied"".
_	Despite the fact that the film was one of the prize winners at the Venice Film Festival, the removed scenes were a terrible blow to Shepitko, who believed that changing an important moment leads to the loss of main ideas.
_	It can also be slowed down or completely stopped by reduced misbehavior, as revealed by the fact that Pinocchio decides not to drink beer or smoke any longer, and is able to escape from the island with only a pair of donkey ears and tail and does not transform any further for the rest of the film.
_	The large field made possible the fact that the 2016 primaries were the first since 1968 (and the first in which every state held a contest) in which more than three candidates won at least one state.
_	These figures reflect the fact that drivers of large mass vehicles are likely to be safer, often at the expense of other drivers if they collide with smaller cars.
_	An analysis of the biological spectrum revels the fact that, majority of the herbaceous members appears along with the first showers, flourish during the monsoon season, complete their life cycle towards the end of the rainy season and enter into the dormant phase by shedding their fruits/seeds or in the form of rhizomes.
_	In the area of child neuropsychology, "The need for its creation was dictated by the fact that children with localized brain damage were found to reveal specific different features of dissolution of psychological functions.
_	They [Drew's followers] said that the huge stone heads attested to the fact that the Yakubites evolved into a race of scientific geniuses with large heads (as depicted in the sculptures) and small bodies.
_	Indeed, many of the Blues' players liked the fact that their families could hear the games on KMOX.
_	He claimed that the total population of humans, like all living things, grows and shrinks according to an ecological law—an increase in food availability for any population yields an accompanying increase in the population's overall size—despite the fact that popular cultural thinking regards civilized humans as separate from and above any such law.
_	This test may be improved by using the fact that the only square roots of 1 modulo a prime are 1 and −1. Write "n" = "d" · 2 + 1, where "d" is odd.
_	The lack of recognition from Ukraine and the international community is based primarily on the fact that the referendum included an option to join Russia while the region was considered to be under military occupation by Russia itself.
_	One of the things that bedevils an objective view of this case is the fact that Robert Fabian was a considerable self-publicist.
_	The digger was a phenomenon peculiar to Queensland, perhaps due to the fact that other states had followed Britain's lead and established Advisory Boards made up of architects and artists, prior to the erection of war memorials.
_	The name Spiano may have derived from the fact that the town finds itself at a point from which one can spy (in Italian "spiare") on the valleys which lie below.
_	The digger was a phenomenon peculiar to Queensland, perhaps due to the fact that other states had followed Britain's lead and established Advisory Boards made up of architects and artists, prior to the erection of war memorials.
_	This can potentially be blamed on the fact that Gram Sabhas have not been sufficiently empowered and strengthened to ensure greater people’s participation and transparency in functioning of Panchayats as envisaged in the Panchayat Act.
_	Due to the fact that the River Rhondda meets the River Taff at one corner of the park it is prone to flooding, one flood in 1929 left the park severely flooded and led to the original layout of the park being changed to what it is today with the memorials being placed way from the River Taff.
_	Mostly it was the fact that there are too many journalist that don't know their work: don't know how to interview, investigate, or write properly—not to mention to read and or to edit.
_	It was considered a shock defection due to the fact that Seven, who he had been with for eight years, won a share of the telecast rights to AFL matches for the first time since 2001.
_	Wertham objected to not only the violence in the stories but also the fact that air rifles and knives were advertised alongside them.
_	The complexity of those circumstances is demonstrated by the fact that Tomlinson J and Rix LJ (with whom Gross LJ implicitly sided) disagreed as to whether Wikborg Rein had taken on specific or general duties in relation to the transactions (and therefore whether the case was of category 1 or category 2 under the Saamco principle)", before adding "[a]pplications of the "Saamco" principle will always be heavily fact sensitive, and it is for that reason that solicitors should consider carefully (and seek to strictly define, if possible) the nature of their duties to their client when providing advice on complex transactions.
_	Sharpe is devastated, not only at the loss of a friend, but also by the fact that his captaincy is up for sale, and without Lawford to defend him, he is likely to lose command of his company.
_	Despite the fact that married women were not generally welcome on university faculties (female professors were usually expected to resign when they married), Stieglitz agreed to write a recommendation letter for Morgan for a position at the University of Illinois.
_	The intensity between these two sides in the 90s was culminated by the fact that former Portuguese international team mates, João Vieira Pinto who played for Benfica and Paulinho Santos who played for Porto publicly declared their dislike for each other.
_	The name Kepler-1520 derives directly from the fact that the star is the catalogued 1,520th star discovered by "Kepler" to have confirmed planets.
_	This species is classified as critically endangered due to an assumed population decline in excess of 80% in the last 60 years and the fact that it is restricted to one small location.
_	The change is due to the fact that certain missions, such as mine-countermeasures and special operations staging, must be performed by a warship under the laws of armed conflict.
_	Related but less important factors, are that a hapu may belong to more than one iwi, a particular hapu may have belonged to different iwi at different times, the tension caused by the social and economic power moving from the iwi down rather than from the hapu up, and the fact that many iwi do not recognise spouses and adoptees who do not have kinship links.
_	Much was now made of the fact that Topanga was the most attractive and the most popular girl at school, and academically successful.
_	After a meeting with Princess Elizabeth and the infant Prince Charles, Lester Pearson confessed to his diary the "hope that relations... were not further disturbed by the fact that I was able to make the baby laugh while [J.B.]
_	By thinking of any material thing (like a rock, or a person) as being fundamentally the "same" thing throughout time, with any changes to it being secondary to its "nature", scientific materialism hides the fact that nothing ever stays the same.
_	Savaric's reputed successeor Reccared is a phantom, probably an error stemming from the fact that Lugo at that time was ruled by a bishop Reccared.
_	Players such as Chris Woods and Terry Butcher were attracted not just by the finances on offer, but also by the fact that Rangers still had access to European competition during a period when English clubs had been banned after the Heysel Stadium disaster.
_	An obvious example is the fact that land is immovable, and thus the rules that govern its use must differ.
_	The various dialects and social groups of the Taa, their many names, the unreliability of transcriptions found in the literature, and the fact that names may be shared between languages and that dialects have been classified, has resulted in a great deal of confusion.
_	The intentions for this extension of privacy are based on the fact that social media sites store years of data that affect minors lives' much later after the information is posted.
_	And we could only offer a bland note that 'circumstances beyond our control have forced us to offer this book in extremely abbreviated form' – the Tsarist censor did not allow us to print anything else about this... currently we are releasing, as the second book of the tenth volume, the entire ending, beginning with Chapter 7, of this work by Gorky, guided by the fact that many readers have already purchased the first six chapters which we released in the tenth volume, and which we will now consider only the first book of this volume".
_	The P-Line was abandoned in 1946 along with the Montello spur, despite the fact that there was still almost daily service on it.
_	The second stanza represents the "winding, gyring, spiring treadmill of a stair" mentioned in line 17, which would account for the fact that the stanza lacks symmetry among its lines, which appear to extend to various lengths across the page in a way not seen in the other stanzas.
_	It is also referred to as "midwife's tunnel" due to the fact that around the end of the 19th century midwives, as well as the children of Kappel, used it as a shortcut to Hofsgrund.
_	According to Françoise Hélène Pairault's study, historical and archaeological evidence point to the fact that both Diana of the Aventine and Diana Nemorensis were the product of the direct or indirect influence of the cult of Artemis spread by the Phoceans among the Greek towns of Campania Cuma and Capua, which in turn passed it over to the Etruscans and the Latins by the 6th and 5th centuries BC.
_	This is evidenced by the fact that despite the crisis between 1870 and 1872, a commission of 6-8% was paid, and then they opened a new machine factory in Racibórz, Poland.
_	One day he falls for Kumiko Komori, a girl who just transferred to their school, and decides to win her heart without relying on any of his relatives' godly powers, oblivious to the fact that Tenko herself has a crush on him.
_	Despite the fact that the salt was mined using pipes and sluices through which flowed gravity-fed water from the mountain, which carried dissolved salt 17 miles away to Bad Ischl, where the water was evaporated, leaving behind the salt, the mine was not naturally humid, as the salt in the mine's walls absorbed excess moisture, keeping the chambers at a constant 65% humidity, while the temperature only varied from a low of 4 degrees Celsius (40 degrees Fahrenheit) in the winter to 8 degrees Celsius (47 degrees in the summer).
_	Sharkey cited personal reasons for this, decrying the fact that if he were to marry his long-term male partner Ade Antigha in Spain (where the two were living at the time), the marriage would not be recognized by Irish law.
_	Before he can come to terms with the fact that he has talked to a ghost a minute ago, Polish aircraft appear and drop bombs on the grove Wallmoden had been ordered to by his dead commander.
_	Many choir directors have accepted the fact that they will always have less males in their choir, therefore very few make an attempt to reach out to males in the school.
_	This assimilation is seen by the fact that many, more affluent Jews moved away from the confinement of the "Judenberg".
_	This can be proven by the fact that they give birth in the wild.
_	With the aging and shrinking Japanese population, the fact that fewer and fewer students study abroad to acquire a more internationally oriented university education is reason for concerns over the future of the Japanese economy.
_	As Iran's Christian Armenian minority consists of two groups including Armenians of Tehran and northern parts of Iran as well as those of the southern parts of the country, two elections take place for both regions, as well as due to the fact that Christian Armenians have two seats at Iran's 290-seat parliament while other religious minorities (Zoroastrians, Jews and Assyrians) have one representative at the county's legislative body.
_	After telling McMahon that he respects the fact that he and the WWF cared, Austin attacked McMahon with a Stone Cold Stunner, leaving McMahon in shock.
_	In addition to the LTTE's defensive operations alluded to above, the IPKF's problems were compounded by the fact that the Tigers, using classic guerrilla tactics, blended in with the local population.
_	Stephen Brockmann argues the fact that "Caligari" was filmed entirely in a studio enhances the madness portrayed by the film's visuals because "there is no access to a natural world beyond the realm of the tortured human psyche".
_	Although the French origin of the word 'harassment' is beyond all question in the Oxford English Dictionary and those dictionaries basing on it, a supposed Old French verb "harer" should be the origin of the French verb "harasser", despite the fact that this verb cannot be found in French etymologic dictionaries like that of the or the (see also their corresponding websites as indicated in the interlinks); since the entry further alleges a derivation from "hare", like in the mentioned German etymological dictionary of the French language a possible misprint of "harer" = "har/ass/er" = "harasser" is plausible or cannot be excluded.
_	In those dictionaries the relationship with "harassment" were an interpretation of the interjection "hare" as "to urge a dog to attack', despite the fact that it should indicate a shout to come and not to go ("hare" = "hara" = "here"; cf. above).
_	The flagship line of adjustable outdoor sandals are distinguished by the fact that they use a single strap which loops around the foot through the sole, and so can be adjusted to fit without any extra fastenings.
_	Clarke stated that the "Time Odyssey" novels are an "orthoquel" (a neologism coined by Clarke for this purpose, combining the word "sequel" with "ortho-", the Greek prefix meaning "straight" or "perpendicular", and alluding to the fact that time is orthogonal to space in relativity theory) to the "Space Odyssey" series.
_	Later that day the Director of Sport of Djurgården Bo Andersson told the football site Fotbollskanalen.se that Djurgården were prepared to take the case to FIFA due to the fact that K.R.C Genk without the permission and knowledge of Djurgården booked a flight and hotel for Colley which violated the contract between Colley and Djurgården.
_	Appreciation by both connoisseurs and musicians alike attest to the fact that J.B. Guadagnini may possibly be considered the last of the great master violin makers in the second half of the so-called "golden age", while Italy was under Bourbon rule.
_	His argument was criticized as an oxymoron, since it intended to exploit a perceived loophole while ignoring the fact that based on International Law, the UN would not accept "fourth options" where one of the sides would remain permanently subdued to the other.
_	So the Criollos' failure to support Gual, España and Miranda, which would have created a state under their control, needs to also be understood by the fact that a national identity separate from the Spanish had not yet emerged among them.
_	The importance of this success is illustrated by the fact that the next day, Henderson aviators sank eleven enemy troop transports attempting to reinforce the island.
_	This is complicated by the fact that the auger could deform before applying enough resistance to the motor to turn it off.
_	It is uncertain, however, how cross buns are similar to "shlissel challah", other than the fact that people have always made signs or symbols on their bread.
_	The perception of seeing Hızır and İlyas as identical arises from the fact that İlyas stands as an obscure figure within the context of Tasavvuf (Sufism) and popular piety when compared to Hızır and there are numerous legends on Hızır, whereas little is known about İlyas and furthermore, there are many great maqams of Hızır, yet there are only few maqams for İlyas.
_	Privacy concerns with the TCG revolve around the fact that each TPM has a unique keypair, called the "endorsement key", that identifies the platform.
_	Reflective of this is the fact that the Maldives has had the highest national divorce rate in the world for many decades.
_	Tam was unable to accept the fact that his parents were drug traffickers.
_	Regardless of the fact that the Council of the Federation overrode Yeltsin's veto, he still refused to sign the law, and further cited allegations of voting irregularities; and repeated his position that the law conflicted Russia's international legal obligations.
_	Originally formed as Bonamassa's backing band with the help of the guitarist's manager Roy Weisman, Bloodline's name was chosen based on the fact that four of the group's founding members were the sons of famous musicians – Hagar of Van Halen frontman Sammy Hagar, Krieger of former The Doors guitarist Robby Krieger, Oakley, Jr. of original Allman Brothers Band bassist Berry Oakley, and Davis of prolific jazz trumpeter Miles Davis.
_	This practice caused some controversy, but Ryland defended himself by citing the fact that his lessons emphasized submission to authority.
_	The trains on Rome's metro are still heavily tagged to this day, partially due to the fact that graffiti still is rampant on the Metro's trains despite efforts to clean it.
_	Gay rights activists asked New York State Governor Mario Cuomo to appoint a special prosecutor to the case, citing the fact that Staten Island District Attorney William Murphy had been the only one of the city's five district attorneys to go on record as opposing the city's anti-gay-discrimination law when it was passed in 1986; and that also, in that same year, Murphy had prosecuted a carjacking case involving Taylor, Sarlo and two others that resulted in Taylor, then 16 years old, being adjudicated a juvenile offender when he could have been tried as an adult, and Sarlo receiving the minimum sentence — 1½ to 4½ years — then possible on the charges under which he had been indicted.
_	In another, she will resign herself due to the fact that she cannot ease his torment and returns home with Richter.
_	Three, a decision that has been made based on the fact that apparently you need more than two people watching a programme to make it successful.
_	The name of Holland has been thought to have come from the fact that ditches being dug in the 1850s to divert the swamp water reminded people of the canals of Holland.
_	The following Monday, with rumors swirling that the USOC would vote on terminating the bid that afternoon, Mayor Martin Walsh held a press conference asserting that, despite the fact that he had already signed a letter the previous October stating that he would sign the Host City Contract without reservation, he was not comfortable signing the financial guarantee in its current form at that time.
_	The other concession was in that its oath of allegiance to Hitler was conditional on the fight against Bolshevism and in the fact that Christian (mostly Ukrainian Greek Catholic Church and Ukrainian Orthodox) chaplains were integrated into the units and allowed to function (in the Waffen-SS, only the Bosnian division and Sturmbrigade Wallonien had a clerical presence).
_	After the death of the final "pure" dusky sparrow, the breeding program was discontinued due to the fact that it was thought the hybrids that exist could not reproduce to create dusky sparrows, since they did not share the proper mtDNA that dusky sparrows possess.
_	During that time the country's highest court approved Nkurunziza's right to run for a third term in office despite the fact that at least one of the court's judges fled the country claiming he had received death threats from members of the government.
_	Brennan felt that Doug's do-gooder actions are always based on the fact that he had hurt others and made the wrong choices.
_	Included in the argument was the fact that the current chaplain corps is overly representative of the evangelical Christian faith along with a claim that atheist and others were being ignored.
_	Substantial variations between annual (AADT) and summer (ASDT) traffic volumes are attributed to the fact that the road connects a number of summer resorts to Croatian motorway network.
_	James Mellaart suggested the industry dated to a period before the Pottery Neolithic at Byblos (10,600 to 6900 BC according to the ASPRO chronology) and noted ""Aceramic cultures have not yet been found in excavations but they must have existed here as it is clear from Ras Shamra and from the fact that the Pre-Pottery B complex of Palestine originated in this area, just as the following Pottery Neolithic cultures can be traced back to the Lebanon.""
_	Originally there were two motivations: either to resist enemy efforts to jam the communications (anti-jam, or AJ), or to hide the fact that communication was even taking place, sometimes called low probability of intercept (LPI).
_	When he makes a passing remark about the children and their parents, Buffy is struck by the thought that the children's parents were never seen or mentioned, and the fact that no one knows the children's names.
_	His name is an onomatopoeic representation of the braying sound made by a normal donkey, usually represented as "hee haw" in American English: the spelling with an "r" is explained by the fact that Milne and most of his intended audience spoke a non-rhotic variety of English in which the "r" in "Eeyore" is not pronounced as /r/.
_	The nature of the settlement prior to the 18th century remains obscure, but the fact that it does not appear on John Speed's 1610 map of Cardiganshire suggests that at the time it was very small.
_	However, such investigations are complicated by the fact that despite Ramstein Air Base being located on German territory, German officials and politicians are not allowed to enter the base without permission of the US commander.
_	They also share a similar trait which is the fact that neither has told their daughters what has been of their parents.
_	The technology makes use of the fact that a tumor’s blood vessels have pores 600 _m in diameter and are much leakier than normal blood vessels, which have pores only around 50 _m in diameter.
_	The announcement was met by some controversy due to the fact that the group was to be chosen by a voters' poll and American deathcore band Rings of Saturn had in fact won the vote by 1%.
_	In this case, difficulties arose from the fact that Herring failed to make it clear to Savige and Wilton exactly what was meant by "threaten".
_	Not only did she demonstrate that physical strength was not crucial for operating a motorcycle but this magazine was especially impressed with “the fact that Miss Cottle always manages to look nice when engaged in her exploits, and not the least like a professional motor cyclist.”
_	The satirical edge was equally significant, both the references within news programmes to the fact that they are reporting the news and repeating the show's title as well as such aspects as newsspeak, media-manipulation, exploitation of tragedies, patronising mistreatment of the general public, lack of fact-checking—personified by Marber's Peter O'Hanraha-hanrahan—and the general assumption that the programme itself is infallible (""On the Hour" – Towards a New Eden").
_	Despite the fact that the Bills were having a very bad season, and the Chargers' fortunes (at the time) had turned significantly, the game was very competitive, coming down to the final minutes play.
_	Turn! Turn!" being released, Dickson and the Byrds approached Columbia Records and requested that Melcher be replaced, despite the fact that he had successfully steered the band through the recording of two number 1 singles and two hit albums.
_	Portuenses are referred to this day as "tripeiros", in reference to the fact that higher quality meat would be loaded onto ships to feed sailors, while off-cuts and by-products such as tripe would be left behind and eaten by the citizens of Porto.
_	Most of the algebraic properties of the Christoffel symbols follow from their relationship to the affine connection; only a few follow from the fact that the structure group is the orthogonal group (or the Lorentz group for general relativity).
_	The museum also focuses on the fact that Greek history does not begin and end with specific events but rather exists along a continuum that continues today.
_	This contradicts the fact that currently Sasquatch possesses Snowbird's body, after his was destroyed, and that the body became male.
_	Metzinger's "Note sur la peinture" not only highlighted the works of Picasso and Braque, on the one hand, Le Fauconnier and Delaunay on the other, but it was also a tactical selection that highlighted the fact that only Metzinger himself was positioned to write about all four.
_	It also liked the fact that the Supreme Court made it clear that the government of Canada and that of the other provinces would have to negotiate after a winning referendum on secession.
_	The dispute lies in the fact that the American economy was highly diverse; there was no standard form of currency, and records were not consistently kept.
_	The great number of so far unknown texts in the Novgorod Codex might be explained by the fact that the writer belonged to a Christian community declared heretical by the ‘official’ church — probably a dualistic group similar to the Bogomils.
_	Eventually, Kara used Baldayo's powder to make herself immortal, and they became occupied with keeping Targala, the exiled priest of the ape god Esh-Kar, away from their kingdom despite the fact that he wishes Kara would become his queen.
_	Part of the reason for his distance from his fellow Democrat may have had to do with the fact that McCloskey had handed President Clinton his very first foreign policy defeat.
_	The facial disc plays a part in this process, as is shown by the fact that with the ruff feathers removed, the bird can still locate the source in azimuth but fails to do so in elevation.
_	But they were not aware of the fact that his father's sister- Unichala (Sukumaari), her two children (Ganesh Kumar and an unknown actress) and Moosakkuutti (Srinivasan) were captured by Kathiroor Chandrappan ( Kochin Haneefa).
_	Despite the fact that lyricist Skip Haynes maintains that the song is not about LSD, the line "Just slippin' on by on L.S.D. / Friday night, trouble bound" has been construed as a double entendre of both driving on Lake Shore Drive and tripping on the drug.
_	Proponents of this belief system point to verses such as Ps. 12:6-7, Matt. 24:35, and others, claiming that "perfect preservation" was promised, often basing this reasoning on the fact that these verses utilize the plural form "words", supposedly indicating that it is more than merely "the word" that will be preserved.
_	In addition to these material blessings, verses 1-4 recount the fact that Allah taught man how to communicate and even gave him the Qur'an to guide him on the path to righteousness.
_	The novel ends as Sam meditates on the fact that, even if he went across the Pacific Ocean to get away from people, he still craves friendship and family.
_	The strategy is complicated by the fact that, because of the Joker rule, the player will score 30 if he gets a Yahtzee.
_	The variety of his interests may be suggested by the fact that he published in 1871 papers on "A Trip to Queensland in Search of Fossils" and on "The Introduction, Cultivation and Economic Uses of the Orange and Others of the Citron Tribe".
_	Considering PIDA's backbone and the fact that Iodine atoms can easily undergo elimination, it is conceivable that PIDA can be subjected to full reductive deiodination in the precsence of a lewis base, such as pyrrolidine to yield carbyne.
_	This effect is amplified by the fact that the Irish State enables foreign investors to pay no taxes on Irish commercial property via Central Bank regulated QIAIFs (and ICAVs in particular).
_	Given their smaller numbers, the loss of even a few men in battle could be catastrophic for a band, and notably at the battles of Adobe Walls in Texas in 1874 and Rosebud in Montana in 1876, the Indians broke off battle despite the fact that they were winning as the casualties were not considered worth a victory.
_	According to Keith Weller Taylor, "the matriarchal flavor of the time is ... attested by the fact that Trung Trac's mother's tomb and spirit temple have survived, although nothing remains of her father", and the "society of the Trung sisters" was "strongly matrilineal".
_	The practice of washing the wool rather than the sheep evolved from the fact that hotter water could be used to wash the wool, than that used to wash the sheep.
_	Blöndal & Benedikz (2007) note that most of the Greece runestones are from Uppland and relate it to the fact that it was the most common area to start a journey to Greece, and the area from which most Rus' originated.
_	However, as noted by Jansson (1987), the fact that most of these runestones were raised in Uppland and Södermanland does not necessarily mean that their number reflects the composition of the Scandinavians in the Varangian Guard.
_	Adebayo Adedeji, a notable political communicator, alluded to the fact that Salaam might be Aregbesola's anointed candidate, in reward for his loyalty.
_	Scott did not submit a bid; however, when the bidders who did submit a bid tried to protest at the GAO, their GAO bid protests were dismissed due to the fact that Scott had filed a case at the court and deprived the GAO of further jurisdiction in the matter.
_	This devolves from the fact that the canal links Paris with Aubervilliers and Saint-Denis.
_	The Chiefs won the game 4-1, despite the fact that China was ranked the seventh best senior national team in the world and on their way to the 2010 Winter Olympics.
_	However, when he is working in resus, Fletch always respects the fact that the consultants are in control of the situation.
_	Prince Hans-Adam II of Liechtenstein, speaking to the International Institute for Strategic Studies on 25 January 2001, argued for a more flexible approach to territorial integrity, in line with historical norms, saying, "Let us accept the fact that states have lifecycles similar to those of human beings who created them.
_	The importance of cricket over football is highlighted by the fact that between 1898 and 1901, the most prestigious ground, the MCG, was not used for finals because cricket wickets were being prepared.
_	Due to the fact that the entrance to Svinesund was blockaded by naval vessels and Norwegian cannon batteries, Charles XII decided that a number of galleys should be towed across land from Strömstad to Trångsviken in the Ide fjord, a distance of roughly 20 kilometers.
_	The city's motto, based on the fact that outsiders tend to mispronounce the name , is "A great place to live, no matter how you pronounce it."
_	It is interesting that he would devote such care to a painting of flowers, as he did also to the Basket of Fruit in the Ambrosiana, and that he was not averse to doing this, as is illustrated by the fact that he introduced the carafe of water with the same reflections into the canvases of the "A Boy bitten by a Lizard", without regard to the position of the figure in front of the light sources.
_	To this must be added the fact that decisions like stumpings, run-outs, l.b.w.s and catches at the wicket are frequently the cause of contention, with the umpire invariably coming in for adverse criticism."
_	Paul Kincaid of "SF Site" noted that Vincent and Michelangelo "are homosexuals from a world whose regressive and repressive mores mean that this could get them killed, but for the fact that they are exceptionally well-skilled at their job and also well-practiced in deception".
_	Despite the fact that at same time Vojvodina brought much older players such as Stephen Appiah and Almami Moreira to the squad in the midfield role, Poletanović managed to earn himself 12 appearances out of 15 matches during his first half season in the Serbian top flight.
_	During his long tenure as Libertad Digital columnist and COPE debater, Girauta expressed strong sympathies for right-wing Zionism (to the point of calling then-president Zapatero an anti-Semite) and lent credibility to the now discredited book by Victor Farías dismissing Socialist politician Salvador Allende as a racist and a Social Darwinist, without clarifying that the quotations about genetic determinism in Allende's doctoral dissertation were themselves quotations from other authors (mostly Cesare Lombroso) or the fact that Allende was highly critical of these conclusions in his thesis, which was later published as a rebuttal to Farías' position.
_	Due to continuing contractual problems and the fact that Funkadelic releases were more successful at the time, Clinton abandoned the name Parliament until 1974.
_	Rescue operations were immediately undertaken after it became clear that the plane had crashed, although efforts were hampered by the fact that the crash site was around two hours away from the closest location of police forces.
_	Bathurst responded favourably to Macquarie despite the fact that work on the lighthouse had commenced without obtaining official approval from Britain On 16 December 1817, the Governor and Mrs Macquarie and a party of their friends went to inspect the tower.
_	Influenced partly by the fact that Gregory was the son of his father's enemy, he ordered Gregory imprisoned for twelve (some sources indicate fourteen) years in a pit on the Ararat Plain under the present day church of Khor Virap located near the historical city Artashat in Armenia.
_	Taking advantage of the fact that many of these universes were mostly unchronicled or merely glimpsed and that Final Crisis also changed the Multiverse slightly, many stories featuring alternate worlds and their interactions were published, which led certain inconsistencies and retcons to appear, such as Earth-1 being originally a "mirror" of Earth-One and later being the reality of J. Michael Straczynski's "" or Earth-16 being the home of an alternate Superman/Christopher Kent, the home of the "Super-Sons", and later the reality of the "Young Justice" TV series.
_	"We should not lose sight of the fact that maintaining man’s right to knowledge and freedom to choose his reading is an empty achievement if we do not make available to him the material from which he can select and choose…
_	The problem is compounded by the fact that society, even the church, discriminates against women in prostitution.
_	The title comes from the fact that the main character tells one to his new girlfriend (Cassidy) - that he is a psychiatrist instead of an actor.
_	Chad Brown, the trainer of Cloud Computing, praised Classic Empire after the race, stating: "I'm not going to dispute the fact that I brought in a fresh horse as part of our strategy.
_	Capitalism was a "satanic economic system" starting with the fact that it called for the postponement of some consumption in favor of investment.
_	However Cornelius Clifford places his birth no earlier than 296 and no later than 298, based on the fact that Athanasius indicates no first hand recollection of the Maximian persecution of 303, which he suggests Athanasius would have remembered if he had been ten years old at the time.
_	What makes his work unique is the fact that you can see the rouble coins on both sides - inside the shell and of course, on the outside.
_	He explains that his stage name NoClue is derived from “the fact that the world had no clue what kind of impact he was about to bring”.
_	There is hardly any explanation for the fact that the section of the diary of individual work with the inmates reflecting the improvements/reforming of behavior, (most important for decision-making with respect to the use of incentives, e.g. early discharge) under the new Order contains a clause “attitude to the jobs performed, self-service and facility improvements” instead of “attitude to work”.
_	The 1928 National Collegiate Athletic Association rulebook noted, "Attention is called to the fact that if the double wristlock is brought up to a twisting hammerlock, it becomes an illegal hold and must be stopped by the Referee...".
_	Christopher Walken also stars as Walker's slightly corrupt promoter, who encourages him to fight whilst hiding from him the fact that one more punch in the wrong place would kill him.
_	When the team was able to run the ball and play defense they were able to win games, as shown by the fact that in all their wins, they had a hundred or more rushing yards.
_	Being assigned to the color guard is considered an honor due to the fact that these individuals present and carry the symbols of their unit and country.
_	Col. Simeon Medalla, head of the Veterans Federation of the Philippines, explains that the rally was not Marcos-inspired, contrary to allegations sprung from rumors of American officials or allies being seen at the rally and the fact that the President himself was the most decorated veteran of the previous war.
_	Rescue efforts were complicated by the fact that the area is densely forested with no mobile-phone coverage, which may also have contributed to the uncertainty as to casualty rates.
_	Demand for the system is based on the fact that there are many situations in which asking a person out might have negative consequences if the feelings are not mutual.
_	The different character of the English Reformation came primarily from the fact that it was driven initially by the political necessities of Henry VIII.
_	He resigned the position after one year, citing the fact that the role took too much time away from his business interests in Calgary, but reversed his decision on the understanding that he would not always be available to serve the NHL post.
_	He called the episode "claustrophobic, cynical and ultimately painful" and particularly praised the performances of Braugher and Secor, and the fact that it was not a happy ending.
_	NO is one of the few gaseous signalling molecules known and is additionally exceptional due to the fact that it is a radical gas.
_	The study also suggests, however, that residents felt more fearful and suspicious of the evacuees, as well as the fact that they were being taken advantage of more.
_	After teaming up to recover the partner's Relic Fragment from some thieves, the player, who has lost all memories except their name and the fact that they used to be human, agrees to form an exploration team to piece together their identity.
_	Campus & Stadium Ireland Development (CSID), the State company which owns the centre, commissioned an engineer to assess the roof damage and they concluded that the roof was not designed and constructed in accordance with building regulations, despite the fact that CSID's experts had certified it.
_	Critics called attention to the fact that plays such as "Phèdre" could be interpreted as realist drama, containing characters that were universal and that could appear in any time period.
_	Hoenig based this theory on the fact that shortly after "I Am Furious (Yellow)", which satirizes the dot-com bubble, aired, the dotcom stocks "began a massive rebound from bear-market lows."
_	The fact that zero is even, together with the fact that even and odd numbers alternate, is enough to determine the parity of every other natural number.
_	However, the detailed journal in the British Hydrographic Office Archive suggests quite a different order, with both ships setting out from the middle and Moresby and the Palinurus going first to Jiddah, the confusion perhaps arises from the fact that the journal, comprising the two parts completed respectively by Moresby and Elwon, though signed and submitted to Sir Charles Malcolm by Elwon, was bound in the incorrect sequence.
_	His name appears on the war memorial in Gordon in the Scottish borders, showing the fact that he won the VC.
_	Despite the fact that it was growing too small for the growing population (which the new Melingriffith Tin Plate Works had bolstered to 696), the issue of the church's inadequate facilities would not be addressed for several decades.
_	These interpretations, while not in agreement, shed light on the fact that Chinese socialism did change during the Deng era.
_	The cost is attributed to the fact that this type of potato is almost extinct because it must be harvested by hand.
_	Charles Bramesco of "Vulture" notes that despite the fact that Robert never actually rapes any of the female members of the crew, he exhibits psychological traits associated with rape culture.
_	Due to the fact that the Nambikwara language has such a high proportion of speakers (and, one can infer, a high rate of transmission), and the fact that the community has a positive attitude towards the language, it is not considered to be endangered despite the fact that its speakers constitute a small minority of the Brazilian population.
_	This is due to the fact that more women are diagnosed as depressed than men, and also that depression is correlated with suicide attempts.
_	The title of the collection reflects the fact that it is both the sixth book in the Kai Lung series and contains six stories.
_	You do forget things about the various tracks," and said to Australia's "The Vine", "I quite like the fact that it’s not chronologically laid out, so you just jump straight into the middle."
_	Because of his versatility and effectiveness, the Bengals placed the franchise tag on Andrews on February 18, 2008, despite the fact that Andrews did not officially have a starting job on the Bengals line.
_	According to the "San Francisco Examiner", "Emphasis which [the defense] repeatedly laid on the fact that Young was in isolation or solitary confinement for more than three years—and that he drove his knife into McCain's abdomen just eleven days after release from such confinement, made it clear that the defense hopes to show not only that Young was 'punch drunk' but that the punches were administered by the Alcatraz 'system'", where both of the historical assertions were inaccurate.
_	The proof is in the fact that the person who has the light bulb go off never forgets the Ah experience, while the others never had this photochemical reaction go off in their brains."
_	This was evident due to the fact that in 1865 another disaster took place for the same reasons and once again John Moody was again acquitted of manslaughter at the trial.
_	It was known to the ancient Greek writers as the gold-digging ant apparently as reference to the fact that gold chunks were mined from the silts of the burrows these marmots dug.
_	Mirkin was very fond of the fact that Homer and Marge have the biggest fight they have ever had on the show in the episode, and he thought it was a "really great" exploration of their marriage.
_	In his 1972 monograph, Ghillean Prance designated "P. campestris" as the type species of the genus due to the fact that Aublet's illustration of "P. montana" contains errors and includes parts of plants belonging to two different species of "Parinari".
_	They would have played the opening home fixture there too, were it not for the fact that the Pleasure Gardens was still hosting holiday-makers at the tail end of the summer season.
_	A plot about the fact that too many religious activities - there was a daily public prayer - left no time for Native americans to hunt, led to the abandonment of the mission in 1725.
_	Significant in this regard is the fact that the muscles of the so-called “lower face” can be consciously controlled much easier than the muscles of the so-called “upper face”.
_	Undeterred by the fact that it was over a half a mile down a track with no services, club members set to and levelled, drained and seeded the pitches and like the 1930s members overcame all obstacles and eventually built the clubhouse seen today.
_	The match with Löwenthal was interrupted as Löwenthal fell ill, and Morphy used the break to crush Owen 5-0 with two draws, despite the fact that Owen was a very strong player who later took third place in the 1862 London tournament and was the only player to win a game against the victor, Adolf Anderssen.
_	At present, the local ferry has had to cut back on hours because the ferry has been unable to find a new captain for ferry due to the stringent Coast Guard requirements to get a merchant mariner license, despite the fact that the ferry only travels 500 feet on steel cables, without any steering capabilities.
_	He holds very long meetings and assemblies that are often filled with irrelevant and/or ridiculous anecdotes or performances (known unofficially as "Item 53", due to the fact that in each episode the bizarre story/act is promptly followed by Iqbal saying "Next on our list, item 54...").
_	The expanding range of species was chiefly the result of French travelling researchers, colonial officials and donations from private people, which accounts for the fact that the animals in the Jardine were not limited to local French species.
_	Jessica Johnsson claims that the fact that Kosovo is still regarded in law as being part of Serbia, as well as the ongoing political tensions, has caused it significant difficulties in achieving economic development and that its uncertain legal status has prevented it from accessing lending from International Financial Institutions such as the World Bank.
_	Ford won easily, despite the fact that fellow Democrat Bill Clinton was not declared the winner of the presidential race in Kentucky until around 10:00 E.S.T.
_	Rebelling against her father's wishes and more than slightly motivated by the fact that she knows Tommy did not commit the murders as he was with her at the time one was being committed, she releases Tommy from jail and helps him track down Jason.
_	The Committee said Stumbo had not updated her campaign website in a timely manner to reflect the fact that Barber had paid his delinquent property taxes.
_	George insists that all he needs as a conversation starter is the fact that they share the same name.
_	The "Alexiad" interests many historians because of the fact that Anna wrote it in a different format to the norm of the time.
_	A major advantage of this strategy is the fact that temperature differences (dT) within a cooling circuit can be drastically increased.
_	The party was established in February 1969 by Makandal Daaga (then known as Geddes Granger), who was dissatisfied with the fact that most businesses in Trinidad at the time were owned by the white minority.
_	In spite of the fact that Danziger later had his reservations about "Nimrod" as a model for Israeli culture, many artists adopted the "Canaanite" style and point of view in their sculpture.
_	In large part, this may be due to the fact that the monks, after having converted to Lutheranism, were provided with the professions of medical doctor, pastor or teacher, while the nuns seldom had a choice other than marriage.
_	According to Shani D'Cruze of the Feminist Crime Research Network, the fact that she was Irish was a significant factor in the widespread revulsion felt towards Webster in Great Britain.
_	This is due largely to the fact that in much of East Africa Anglicanism was introduced by the evangelical Church Missionary Society.
_	Adding further intrigue to this series is the fact that the Aggies' National Championship Season of 1939 succeeded the Horned Frogs' National Championship Season of 1938.
_	Several other accusations were levelled against himself, especially the fact that he lived on his "borgarråd"-pension.
_	Despite the fact that the likelihood ratio in favour of the alternative hypothesis over the null is close to 100, if the hypothesis was implausible, with a prior probability of a real effect being 0.1, even the observation of "p" = 0.001 would have a false positive rate of 8 percent.
_	However, Flood refused to report to the moribund Phillies, citing the team's poor record and the fact that they played in dilapidated Connie Mack Stadium before belligerent and, Flood believed, racist fans.
_	The plot reflects Macedonski's confrontation with his critics, and his acceptance of the fact that people saw in him an eccentric.
_	Adding to the unfamiliarity of the forwards was the fact that of the eight men, only Jehoida Hodges and George Boots played for the same club as each other.
_	That is in part due to the fact that there are European Organic Regulations such as (EC) No 834/2007 or the new draft from 2014 but no comparable regulations for Integrated Farming.
_	The few verses of Annianus' that survive seem to be dedicated to pastoral country life and viniculture, and it is supposed that these are overall reflective of his body of work, owing to the fact that in his short description, Aulus Gellius depicts Annianus as harvesting grapes.
_	The unusual event was further accentuated by the fact that the leaf fell at the location where Atisha (982–1054), had made a Mandala sign with pebbles when he had first visited the place and identified it as the place for a future monastery.
_	This is reflected in the fact that cod more actively search for food during the day.
_	The Ethiopian eunuch, an early gentile convert encountered in Acts 8, has been described as an early gay Christian, based on the fact that the word "eunuch" in the Bible was not always used literally, as in Matthew 19:12.
_	Due to the fact that this region is geographically positioned in the center of the United States and Canada, there are many different air mass types that pass through and affect the constantly shifting weather patterns.
_	The groups is best known for the fact that its members were from different promotions: New Japan (Mutoh, Frye, & Ohtani), All Japan (Kea & Hase), and Michinoku Pro (Shinzaki).
_	In the months after the March 2007 protests at the Port of Tacoma, PMR organizers claimed they had ended military shipments through the Port of Olympia, basing this conclusion on the fact that the military had chosen to go through the Port of Tacoma instead of the Port of Olympia.
_	The team is well known for their active supporters and the fact that they hardly ever lose their home matches.
_	These are the people, whose names I never heard, despite the fact that I was born and brought up in Poland.
_	In 1783, riksråd Carl Fredrik Scheffer decided to meet the complaints about the fact that the foundation Vadstena adliga jungfrustift, despite repeated attempts, had never managed to form any actual establishment of a Protestant convent, as had originally been the purpose.
_	Despite the fact that Chai was endorsed by renowned pharmacologist Chen-Yuan Lee, he lost the DPP chairmanship election in 1996.
_	This discrepancy may be explained, at least in part, by the fact that privileged students have opportunities to attend private schools (most of which start instruction after 8 a.m.) and/or save time by driving or being driven to school.
_	Franklin D. Roosevelt praised George as "one of the really great thinkers produced by our country" and bemoaned the fact that George's writings were not better known and understood.
_	"The dialogue is just so artful and poetic, the characters are so appealing, the whole damn package is so original and daring and lovely, that after watching the first four hours, it's impossible not to feel inspired and cheered by the fact that a drama this ambitious and unique could make it onto network TV."
_	Among General Armstrong's legacies in education is the fact that he was a principal mentor of Dr. Booker T. Washington.
_	This strange distribution pattern (and the fact that there were no new specimens of "A. acaroides" recovered) initially led 20th century specialists to question whether "A. acaroides" was indeed collected from Sumatra, or whether it was correctly designated to the genus as originally described.
_	In addition to the widespread exposure gained through literature, the Florentine dialect also gained prestige due to the political and cultural significance of Florence at the time and the fact that it was linguistically an intermediate between the northern and the southern Italian dialects.
_	The Supreme Court held, restoring Gnango's conviction for the murder of Magda Pniewska, that he was guilty of murder notwithstanding the fact that he had not fired the shot which killed Pniewska during the shoot out which led to her death, and that the fatal shot had been fired by his opponent in an attempt to kill him.
_	This technology is unique due to the fact that it is platform agnostic and does not require any hardware or software changes on the host.
_	This point of origin is supported by the fact that all six genera and 52 species are native to this region, many of those being endemic.
_	Castle was of substantial significance for Jerzy Sikorski to his "Copernicana" studies in terms of the History of Astronomy; as well as, in view of the fact that from the second half of the 14th century, Lidzbark Warmiński Castle was a strongly fortified "Seat of the Bishops of Warmia" and the administration center of their lands (Warmia Chapter), while the Lidzbark city had one of the largest populations in Warmia, similarly to Braniewo.
_	He observed that the majority was led into reaching its result by the fact that it would not have been "profitable to exploit this patent by granting express licenses for fixed terms to users of propanil or by granting licenses to competing sellers." and that the patent would have little value "unless the patentee is permitted to engage in patent misuse."
_	The first semi-final was won by Locht Seal from Miss Gemnei and Carmodys Tanist in 29.85, despite the fact that Sterope had led by three lengths in the home straight before suffering cramp and finishing last.
_	So, like the heuristic analysis, this can lead to false positives errors, due to the fact that this type of anti-virus checks the whole document.
_	His reasoning followed from the fact that a node is not a mathematical point but a physical point.
_	The 2012 edition of "Debates in the Digital Humanities" recognized the fact that pedagogy was the “neglected ‘stepchild’ of DH” and included an entire section on teaching the digital humanities.
_	Schmitt held that it is not the actual precepts of the law which determine its validity, but rather the fact that it has been made into law by the proper authority.
_	The promoter of the festival, Michael Coppel, declared Melbourne a "festival graveyard", and did not book a venue for the festival in the city, despite the fact that several very successful Big Day
_	Based on the cost of the east side route, the Lands Tribunal ruled that equivalent reinstatement would only be justified if passenger number were to rise from 76,000 to 196,000, which was not deemed to be "within the bounds of the possible", despite the fact that these figures were reached in 1967.
_	Kent’s original intention had been to study law but the outbreak of World War II and the fact that he was unable to fight meant that he entered the family business, initially looking after the estate at Craigston in Carriacou.
_	Two, despite the fact that CTV
_	"Vadla" in its name derives from the fact that it is famous for paddy in that region.
_	This is complicated by the fact that most of Cybertron is under the control of the Decepticon Shockwave.
_	That a man who did so much for industrial development did not receive higher recognition from his own government was a source of deep regret for English engineers, who alluded to the fact that in the United States, where the Bessemer process found much use, eight cities or towns bore his name.
_	He ordered an inquiry into O'Reilly's appearance in the show, despite the fact that O'Reilly had not infringed any regulations of the Police Code of Conduct.
_	It can be told from the rather similar "Neoscapteriscus borellii" by the fact that the two claws are almost touching at the base, whereas in "N. borellii", they are widely separated.
_	According to the minutes preserved among the papers of Erich Hüttenhain, Generalleutnant Wilhelm Gimmler, Chef AgWNV, stated that one special difficulty in signal communications was the fact that the diverse parts of the Armed Forces used different wireless and cipher phraseology.
_	James Parker was not so sure, due to the fact that the Comanche were not a unified tribe as Americans understood the term, and he understood that all bands would not feel bound to accept a treaty made by only one.
_	In 1968, he published his theory of Case Grammar (Fillmore 1968), which highlighted the fact that syntactic structure can be predicted by semantic participants.
_	Libby Kennedy (Kym Valentine) and Steph Scully are unimpressed with the fact that she has forgiven Brendan but Tess is adamant they can make it work this time.
_	Disadvantages of a Demsetz auction include the fact that the entire risk associated with falling demand is borne by one agent and that the winner of the bid, once locked into the contract, may accumulate non-transferable know-how that can then be used to gain leverage for contract renewal.
_	He also has an odd relationship with Ranger Tabes who usually calls on him to assist her with the Poppy Rangers, most likely due to the fact that since he is a grizzly bear and in theory it makes sense that he would know a lot about nature, though it has shown that this is not the case.
_	This belied the fact that Andrew Jackson was a societal elite by any definition, owning a large plantation with dozens of slaves and mostly surrounding himself with men of wealth and property.
_	A great deal of the tension during the recording of the album stemmed from the fact that Richards had emerged (to an extent) from his destructive lifestyle of the previous decade, and thus sought a more active role in the creative direction of the band.
_	Muons are measured by exploiting the fact that they penetrate matter more easily than most other particles: in the forward region a very thick and complex absorber stops all other particles and muons are measured by a dedicated set of detectors: the muon spectrometer.
_	In 1980, Hollinger broke the story that the jury at the Cannes Film Festival, chaired that year by Kirk Douglas, had been surprised that a French film, "My American Uncle", had been awarded the Grand Prix by Cannes' organizers, despite the fact that the jury had rejected the film as the winner.
_	They justified this by the large amount of money they were owed in back pay, the fact that the Zanon factory had been built with public funds, as well as worries about asset stripping.
_	It was due to that the fact that he would not be given a first team opportunity next season.
_	In the fall of 1944, a 7-year-old Polish Jew, Yurchik (Lyolik), got into his unit, despite the fact that he was so small that he had the status of a political prisoner.
_	It is possible that the subspecific epithet "praedicta" was given in honor of the fact that Darwin predicted its existence, but there is no reference to Darwin in the paper that described the moth.
_	1300 corporals symbolize a battle for freedom of their country and people, mainly because of the fact that most of them were composed of youngsters who went into the battle on their own initiative.
_	This widespread idea is a misconception, and might originally stem from the fact that Newton discovered that "sunlight" is composed of light with wavelengths across the visible spectrum.
_	In finite-dimensional spaces, that is merely an instance of the fact that all subspaces of a vector space are closed.
_	The carnival is one of the biggest in Switzerland and attracts large crowds, despite the fact that many of its central traditions are played out in the early morning starting at 4am (') and followed by a continuous run of festivities for 72 hours.
_	Homer discovers Fat Tony is there alongside his henchman, Louie, having been released on bail, and unwittingly made the situation worse when he did what Fat Tony told him to do by planting a kiss on Mayor Quimby, oblivious to the fact that he had given the Mayor the kiss of death.
_	This conclusion ignored his prior diagnosis and the fact that he was not once cited for aggressive or suicidal behavior within 16 months of his pretrial detention in Butyrka prison.
_	The barn at Ablington Manor was one of these, and has a date stone "1727 JC", denoting the fact that the lord of the manor at the time was John Coxwell.
_	Although the fact that the band were invited back for a third Peel Session suggested that Peel and his production team felt there had been nothing irregular, the criticism clearly disturbed feeling within the band.
_	The superiority of the Brahmin is not attached to their birth (varna) but to the fact that they are devoted to the study of the Veda, and thus are qualified to instruct other people.
_	There is difficulty in attributing Ruisdael's work, which has not been helped by the fact that three members of his family were also landscape painters, some of whom spelled their name "Ruysdael": his father Isaack van Ruisdael, his well-known uncle Salomon van Ruysdael, and his cousin, confusingly called Jacob van Ruysdael.
_	The term 'latent' refers to the fact that infection may be symptomless.
_	The synod got its name from the fact that the 1382 Dover Straits earthquake shook the city of London during its meetings.
_	The MNLF also slammed the ignoring of the Mindanao situation by Amnesty International and the Human Rights Commission of the United Nations and attacked America over massacres of Moro people by American troops and the fact that Lumads and Muslims are subjected to persecution, accusing the American government of turning a blind eye to this.
_	Making Bean's victory even more important for the Democratic Party was the fact that the Party lost seats in the House elsewhere in the country, meaning Bean's victory somewhat softened the Party's overall net defeat in the 2004 elections, which saw the reelection of Republican President George W. Bush as well as a net Republican gain in both the House and the Senate.
_	Joyce King, author of the 2002 book "Hate Crime: The Story of a Dragging in Jasper, Texas", said that Beto's reputation as a "gladiator" prison stems from the fact that most of its prisoners are in their mid-20s, relatively young.
_	Digital Transformation (DT) is not necessarily about digital technology, but about the fact that technology, which is digital, allows people to solve their traditional problems.
_	Evidence of this lies in the fact that studies show that systematically disabling parts of the cortex in animals does not remove consciousness.
_	The growing demand for surrogate mothers is based upon the fact that many urban Chinese are marrying later and postponing child birth as work demands and the high costs of city living weigh couples down.
_	The film was filmed in Guatemala and El Salvador and at the time the most intriguing part of it all was the fact that producer Manuel Zeceña was able to get Alemán and Aguirre to work together after they had been strained for a while.
_	A major issue with converting the Hetch Hetchy Valley into a municipally owned reservoir was the fact that it was within the borders of the newly formed Yosemite National Park.
_	The addition of the preposition "To", "transitive" and dedicatory in impact, moreover, belies the fact that the poem is written in the first person as a (would-be) record of personal, "intransitive" experience of the author.
_	This has never been addressed by Ford due to the fact that other malfunctions or abuse must occur to stretch the bolts.
_	Varteg owes its origin to the fact that the land lease for the Blaenavon Ironworks was too big, and portions were sublet to the Nantyglo Company and part taken up by a partnership called Knight and Company which opened an iron furnace in 1802.
_	The chair of the department asked Fish to teach the Milton course, notwithstanding the fact that the young professor "had never — either as an undergraduate or in graduate school — taken a Milton course" (269).
_	J.A.C. Fagginger Auer got an award from the Dutch government for "the fact that they had already made preparations during the war to bystand the Dutch universities and colleges in the reconstruction of their equipment."
_	An example of Italian influence is seen in the fact that Cimbrian does not move its verb to the second position as in German:
_	That meant, he said, that despite the fact that the Palestinians suffered from a 'violation of their rights' and 'crimes,' the ICC could not provide them with a defense.
_	Despite the fact that the main writing implement of the time was already the brush, little paper survives from this period, and the main examples of this style are on steles.
_	One couplet was widely quoted through the end of the nineteenth century as an illustration of the fact that some people just want action and excitement, never mind what:
_	This undertone of homoeroticism between Gawain and Bertilak underscores the strength of male homosocial bonds, and the fact that sex never occurs reinforces ideals of the masculine chivalric code.
_	It has experienced controversy over the fact that its results changed throughout the day until (and often through) the results show.
_	Despite the fact that the initial version of "Into the Dalek" contained a glitch that made it unable to download, a workable version found its way online by the second week of August 2014.
_	He would have continued his schooling into the sixth form but for the fact that by age sixteen the Second World War was underway and he decided that he should join the war effort by working for BICC in their local factory.
_	Although it maintained its semi-perfect Roman arch, the fact that the staves were "long and narrow" indicates that the bridge was reconstructed.
_	Lichtenstein liked this quality of his paintings within his paintings, saying "I like the combination of a very separate quality that each of my paintings has within the painting, and the fact that everything works as one painting too."
_	As regards to the suggestion that "Chaukhandi" is the name of a place, Mumtaz Hassan feels that such a view derives from the fact that the name Chaukhandi had come to be associated with the tombs near Landhi.
_	Elsewhere, yakuza boss Yazaki Jōji orders Ken to kill Genji, disregarding the fact that doing so will incite a war between the yakuza organizations.
_	This results from the fact that the formerly predominant prefectures, which prefectural level cities have mostly replaced, were themselves large administrative units containing cities, smaller towns, and rural areas.
_	Electronics was shut down for 30 days, but due to the fact that the incident was an accident was allowed to reopen after 20 days.
_	Crosbie later appeared in court seeking to suppress the fact that he had sex with the body of Melissa Maahs after he murdered her.
_	Convincing evidence against competition-based models includes the fact that globally ambiguous sentences are easier to process than disambiguated sentences, signifying that there is no competition of analyses in a globally ambiguous sentence.
_	The Zeeman splitting is caused by the fact that individual atoms are magnetized due to the circulating motion of electrons bound to them.
_	Its name derives from the fact that it was first identified in the salivary glands of the octopus.
_	The decision to go with SRP was basically based on the fact that at the time Gigabit Ethernet and SRP had roughly the same cost.
_	"A priori" is Latin for "from before" and refers to the fact that the estimate for the solution is derived before the solution is known to exist.
_	However, Labour had been ascendant in the opinion polls since the Black Wednesday economic fiasco a few months after the 1992 general election, and the increased lead of the polls under Blair's leadership remained strong in spite of the revolt, and the fact that the economy was growing again and unemployment was falling under Major's Conservative government.
_	Labour's popularity was also helped by the fact that the Conservative government was now divided over Europe.
_	In the report Judge Smithwick said that although there was no "smoking gun", he was "satisfied there was collusion in the murders" and that he was "satisfied that the evidence points to the fact that there was someone within the Garda station assisting the IRA".
_	It was said that the real reason why he was not paid anything was the fact that Sir Christopher's expenses came within a few shillings of the maximum, but there was no evidence of any contract to the effect that Sir Christopher Furness would pay the Election Agent's fee if he could do so without exceeding the maximum of expense."
_	This fall in popularity stemmed not only from the quality of the roles and his conflicts with MGM, but also from the fact that by late 1938 he was a tall, nearly 6-foot teenager, and the fact that the world was focusing on the growing problems of World War II and therefore the literary classics and costume dramas Bartholomew excelled at were less in fashion.
_	The specific tests which volunteers are put through are not as important as the fact that their fortitude should be tested to the limit.
_	A big part of commissioning the Captain Cook Bridge was the fact that the nearby Tom Ugly's Bridge was carrying more traffic than any three lanes of the Sydney Harbour Bridge before 1962, and the Taren Point punt was at full capacity carrying 1000 cars daily.
_	Named WFCB-LP, the station broadcasts at just 100 watts at 81 feet above the ground, and may be subject to interference from CKUE-FM-1, due to its vastly higher power (3840 watts average, 9000 peak), and the fact that its antenna atop Solidarity Tower is adjacent to the Detroit River, and therefore, only a few hundred feet from the Canada–United States border (which sits in the middle of the river).
_	Though as a proportion of the entire Mughal army the actual casualties suffered were not excessive, this masks the fact that the casualties constituted the very best of the Mughal army including an overwhelming number of its leaders.
_	Serena said that when the Wigginses tasted the stew, they accused the Whitmans of spoiling the stew on purpose: an assumption that resulted from the Whitmans’ half-hearted welcome and the fact that none of the Whitmans had taken any stew.
_	"It's not so much the Reform Party, it's really the fact that I'd want to make that if I ran and spent a lot of money I could actually win, I could beat that Democrat-Republican apparatus."
_	Despite the fact that an Interpol arrest warrant was issued, he still managed to return to Nigeria, where he was said to have enjoyed protection from the security.
_	Most of these peaks make it into this list by virtue of the fact that they are the highest point in their local areas.
_	The number of seats was increased from 22 to 31, and the result was a victory for the Zanzibar Nationalist Party and Zanzibar and Pemba People's Party alliance, which won 18 seats, despite the fact that the Afro-Shirazi Party, which had won 13, claimed 54.2% of the vote.
_	The biggest rival is Nacional, who make the derby called "Pai vs. Filho" (Father Vs. Son), due to the fact that the Fast Clube was founded by dissidents of the Nacional, and for that reason, the press at the time and the own fans of National nicknamed the derby thus.
_	Easpaig suggests, that the saints could refer to one and the same person:[...] both are given as the third bishop of Armagh [...] placename evidence from the Tuam area would tend to corroborate [this] view [...] the evidence suggests that there was a strong Patrician and, consequently, a strong Armagh influence in the Tuam area from the earliest Christian period [...] the fact that Iarlaithe was a bishop like Benignus of Kilbennan and Felartus of Donaghpatrick, would further indicate that Tuam [...] would have predated Brendan of Clonfert by almost a century.
_	A conceived but unborn "foetus" (the "nasciturus") is not a legal subject, but the law takes into account the fact that, in the normal course of events, the "foetus" will one day "become" a legal subject.
_	It is said that James Skinner had fourteen wives and many children, one of whom was Mrs. Wagentreiber, who managed to escape the 1857 revolt due to the fact that he was greatly revered by the Indian Army regiments.
_	The damage done by Saracens is not known, but the fact that Dubrovnik managed to survive a fifteen-month-long siege, proves how well the city was fortified.
_	A major factor in this is the fact that Trans
_	One point worth mentioning was the fact that from 1967 until about 1972 the Se1, 2 and 3 could be found with a different green paint on their engine frames.
_	The "easiest" way to distinguish the two species is the fact that "A. percula" has 10 spines in the first dorsal fin and "A. ocellaris" has 11, which is a more reliable distinction than color patterns. " A. ocellaris" does not have thick black edging outlining the fins.
_	This was due to the fact that apart from Nsawam Medium Security Prisons, Ankaful, and the Kete Krachi Prisons which were purpose built, all other prisons were makeshifts from warehouses, stores, and silos among others, meant to house goods.
_	As their playing, the judge realises that Sorn isn't playing on the ranad-ek and calls the teacher out on the fact that if they have a good player, might as well bring out the good material because then you can lose with dignity.
_	A hint of the feud between father and son is the fact that the image of Ivan Sratsimir was not included in the Tetraevangelia of Ivan Alexander where the whole imperial family was pictured, including Ivan Alexander's son-in-law.
_	Despite his reported dissolute lifestyle and his preference for low-life subjects, Brouwer was highly respected by his colleagues as evidenced by the fact that Rubens owned 17 works by Brouwer at the time of his death, of which at least one had been acquired before Rubens got to know Brouwer personally.
_	Yet the weakness of his position lay just in the fact that he was not ultimately responsible.
_	The increasing adoption of lightweight approaches is due largely to the fact that software requirements are very susceptible to change, and it is extremely difficult to illuminate all the potential requirements in a single project phase before the software development commences.
_	The difficulties, particularly the shortness of time for preparation, and the fact that regular football had not been theretofore played at Vanderbilt at all, were dealt upon.
_	However, the position is complicated by the fact that many legal systems employ both, interchangeably.
_	The adoption of an Iroquois kinship system is necessitate by the fact that traditionally large families lived together in compounds, and married children rarely lived far from their parents.
_	Despite the fact that he even remained with the Autobots when Optimus Prime and Megatron vanished in an early space bridge experiment and the factions splintered into smaller sub-groups, his original hesitance caused his Autobot allies to regard him with a certain degree of mistrust.
_	Pierrothito is Spanish for "Little Pierroth", alluding to the fact that he wrestles as a mini version of Pierroth, Jr.; he is sometimes billed as "Mini Pierroth" or "Pequeño Pierroth".
_	The NhRP emphasizes the fact that currently all nonhuman animals are considered merely property, or legal "things," without the capacity for rights.
_	The main evidence for this is the fact that the author of the text refers to the black pieces as "crow pieces" (烏子) rather than "black pieces" (黑子).
_	Other notable features are the "Number Two Slough", named for the fact that a toilet can be seen there.
_	They praised the visuals, controls, and features and commented on the fact that such an "exceptional package" was on sale for a low price; however, when writing about the Wii controls, they said, "if you've played the GC version this won't be as special".
_	Moreover, they bemoan the misuse of Holi, the fact that their culture has been profited off, the sexualisation coming from a very inappropriate outfit and the devaluation on social networks.
_	His cult spread throughout Lithuania in the 15th century as a compromise to the former rituals to the pagan spring god Pergrubis, owing to the fact that his feast day in mainly Roman Catholic Lithuania, as in the rest of the Western Church, falls on 23 April.
_	Despite the fact that Edwards and Biffle finished up front while Stewart finished 15th, Stewart still clinched the championship.
_	As of June 2015, not a single candidate managed to demonstrate his/her paranormal skills, despite the fact that a few of them publicly declared that they would undertake the challenge.
_	The strength of the main rings, the lower keels, and the fact that helium, instead of flammable hydrogen, was to be used, also allowed the designer to mount the engines inside the hull, improving streamlining.
_	Despite the fact that the members of the squadron do not trust him, they help with his recovery by creating a game called "Real or Not Real" in which Peeta will ask them a question about something he believes may be true and the members will confirm whether they are real or a hijacked memory.
_	The reviewer in "Les Annales" noted the irony of the fact that the opera "Rigoletto", based so closely on the play, had been performed at two theatres in Paris since 1857 while the play had been forbidden.
_	Holl was appointed Premier despite the fact that he sat in the appointed legislative council rather than the elected House of Assembly.
_	Since Fox already owned KSTU (channel 13), it was forced to sell KTVX due to Federal Communications Commission regulations prohibiting one company from owning two of the four highest-rated stations in a single market, as well as the fact that the station was in the middle of a long-term affiliation contract with ABC.
_	Another lodger, Ramesh Kumar (Biswajit Chatterjee), who arrives there subsequently, finds their presence undesirable and asks the caretaker to get the surprised group to leave, as he is perturbed by the fact that his residential bungalow has been converted into the Dreamland Hotel!
_	In "Reelpolitik II: Political Ideologies in '50s and '60s Films" (2004), Beverly Merrill Kelley wrote that Drury accepted the commission to write the book despite the fact that he found Nixon to be "very weird, very odd."
_	The BPPA's argument was that the Municipal officers were not qualified to be Boston police officers due to lack of training, political patronage, nepotism and the fact that the Munis were not civil service tested.
_	In spite of the fact that the Symphony No. 38 was first performed in Prague, it is not certain that it was actually written for Prague.
_	Despite the fact that her beauty and fortune made her an attractive match, she is said to have dislike the thought of marriage and refused to marry for many years.
_	Where other people might be worried about such behavior being reminiscent of stalking, Sheldon reacts positively to Ramona by appreciating the fact that he is getting a free dinner.
_	He got really angry at Kyoya, because he was complaing about the fact that he was chosen for the competition and told him that so many people want to take part in the competition, but they can't take part in it no matter how much they practice and want to.
_	But since some of the Phase I and Phase II volunteers had become infected with HIV while taking the vaccine, showing that the vaccine was not 100% effective, and it was not proven that the vaccine itself hadn't caused these infections, the FDA and other members of the medical community hesitated and finally declined to approve Phase III testing "until more was learned about HIV immunity", despite the fact that early versions of successful vaccines have rarely been 100% effective, and even the 1955 Salk polio vaccine was only 70% effective, superseded as it was seven years later by the Sabin vaccine.
_	Established in 2015 by MRASZ, the Hungarian national amateur radio society, the beacon went out of order on 20 February 2017 and following a substantial increase in activity near its frequency plus the fact that an alternative frequency was not available, the decision was taken to switch off the HG7BHB beacon.
_	On the consoles and PC, some of the problems cited were repetitive gameplay, poor enemy AI and the fact that the Xbox 360 version looked similar to the other console versions despite the better hardware.
_	Yet the fact that he could eulogise kings in "Theogony" (80 ff., 430, 434) and denounce them as corrupt in "Works and Days" suggests that he could resemble whichever audience he composed for.
_	Late critic José Lino Grünewald labelled it one of the brightest moments of the language in prose, despite the fact that Carpeaux was not a native speaker.
_	He later suggested that the Roe effect serves as an explanation for the fact that the fall in teen birth rates is "greatest in liberal states, where pregnant teenagers would be more likely to [have abortions] and thus less likely to carry their babies to term."
_	A similar case includes James Landrith, who was made to penetrate a female acquaintance in a hotel room while incapacitated from drinking, while his rapist cited the fact that she was pregnant to advise him not to struggle, as this might hurt the baby.
_	Astronomical masers remain an active field of research in radio astronomy and laboratory astrophysics due, in part, to the fact that they are valuable diagnostic tools for astrophysical environments which may otherwise elude rigorous quantitative study and because they may facilitate the study of conditions which are inaccessible in terrestrial laboratories.
_	Simmons blames file sharing and the fact that no one values music "enough to pay you for it" for the decline of the rock music scene.
_	The 5 drivers battled it out, with Piquet, Laffite, Jones and Reutemann keeping with and desperately trying to find a way past Pironi, but not being able to because of the Ferrari's power pulling away on the straights; made more difficult by the fact that the scenic Österreichring was made up almost entirely of long corners and straights.
_	By the end of 1972, following the critical and commercial successes of Rod Stewart's solo albums, the singer had become increasingly distanced from some of his Faces bandmates, who were frustrated by the fact that by this point they had come to be perceived by the public (and even by some concert promoters) as little more than Stewart's backing band for live work.
_	Notwithstanding the Vaishnava claim of unbroken teacher-student tradition, the fact that Nathamuni has used the form āļvār but Piļļān [A disciple and younger cousin of Rāmānuja] ended up using the form āzhvār suggests that there has been an error in transmission somewhere along the teacher-student chain between the two teachers.
_	It was also due to the fact that all members of the band were born after the year 1990.
_	Departing to Moscow with a delay (because of the passing of exams), Boris was horrified to learn that the exams at the Moscow Art Theatre School were already finished - due to the fact that the theater was leaving for a tour to Japan, the exams were held a week earlier.
_	Many saw the criticisms as retaliation to an outspoken woman of color standing alongside three equally strong independent women on the stage of an award show notorious for its conservative attitudes and lack of diversity, with several reviewers noting that many of the negative comments surrounding Beyoncé's inclusion at the ceremony as hateful and racist, pointing to the fact that there was not backlash on such a scale when Meghan Trainor performed with Miranda Lambert, Ariana Grande performed with Little Big Town or when Justin Timberlake performed with Chris Stapleton at previous CMA ceremonies, with several in fact referring to the latter as one of the best CMA performances of all time.
_	Renewables increased their production by 6TWh or 4% compared to 2013, and accounted for a total of 156TWh or about 30% of net-generated electricity, despite the fact that hydroelectricity recorded a decrease in production due to unfavorable weather conditions.
_	Commander of the PAK military wing described their engagement and declaration of hostilities against Iranian government due to the fact that "the situation in eastern Kurdistan (Iranian Kurdistan) has become unbearable, especially with the daily arbitrary executions against the Kurds".
_	In essence, the only barrier to proving the theorem is the fact that Gleason's original result does not hold when the Hilbert space is that of a qubit.
_	The Committee deplored the fact that the State party allows sexual intercourse involving girls as young as 9 lunar years and that other forms of sexual abuse of even younger children is not criminalized.
_	Kanazawa's study has been criticized for using the Pythagorean theorem to estimate geographic distance, despite the fact that this theorem only applies to flat surfaces and the Earth's surface is roughly spherical.
_	Ru worries that her aspirations in life are never really made certain, and the fact that she might not get a boyfriend.
_	The voting system has been widely accepted, due in great part to the fact that it speeds up the vote count tremendously.
_	This is proved by the fact that tumors in all parts of the body are disappearing or diminishing.
_	A positive review appeared on the front page of the "Harvard Crimson" newspaper despite the fact that the band performed with makeshift sound amplifiers after their regular equipment was stolen in Boston.
_	“These are highly valued programs because they lead to the work force and address the fact that employers do require and/or prefer the bachelor’s degree in most of these fields,” Constance Carroll, chancellor of the San Diego Community College District told "Inside Higher Ed".
_	Despite the fact that the licensing process would determine which clubs would enter the newly expanded Super League, the Crusaders were still eager to make their mark in their new division and win the league title.
_	Its name is taken from the Book of Zechariah (3:2), and symbolises the fact that the founders were survivors of the Holocaust;
_	Often teams have to play early morning or late at night due to the fact that the rinks are mostly used for public skating.
_	He only began leaving cards after the media sensationalized the fact that a card had been found by a victim's body.
_	It got its name from the fact that when gum trees die they rot from the inside out, thereby creating a large cavity in which bees would commonly nest.
_	But the fact that you don't escape it is not a negative verdict on your honor."
_	This notion is supported by the fact that no suicide note was left and Taiji theorizes in his autobiography, that on the night of his death, hide may have been practicing a technique to relieve upper back and neck pains which guitarists can suffer from continuous use of a shoulder strap.
_	When the Season 8 episode focusing on domestic abuse aired, Steve Marsi from "TV Fanatic" commented, "What was most intriguing about the case was not the evidence or the unfolding mystery but the fact that this powerful woman, a Marine martial arts trainer, was an abuse victim.
_	They conclude that 'a number of animals perished for no discernible beneficial reason' and criticized the British Home Secretary for the fact that he 'failed to weigh adequately the likely benefit of the research against the likely adverse effects on the animals involved'.
_	May we not say that, in the fortuitous combination of the productions of Nature, since only those creatures "could" survive in whose organizations a certain degree of adaptation was present, there is nothing extraordinary in the fact that such adaptation is actually found in all these species which now exist?
_	However, this plan did not take into account the fact that the fortress was located on a rocky promontory where it was impossible to dig approach trenches and that a large ditch cut into the rock protected the fort on the land side.
_	Afterward, he makes reference to the fact that contemporary rap music is being flooded with the glorification or subliminal promotion of misogyny, drug-dealing, materialism and violence.
_	Their interest for the laity lies mainly in the fact that marriage and divorce fall within their competence; and their reform has been postponed largely because the wealthy and corrupt society of the Russian capital preferred a system which makes divorce easily purchasable and avoids at the same time the scandal of publicity.
_	It ran from 7 July to 1 August 1903, a long run spurred in part by the fact that Kikugorō had recently died.
_	The Earl himself died at what is generally considered to be the first battle of the wars, at St Alban's on 22 May 1455, and Poynings was elevated as third Earl of Northumberland, without having to pay relief to the Crown, due the fact that his father had died in the King's service.
_	Admitting that from the back cover he expected "The Tribe of Witches" to be filled with "wild claims", he was surprised that these claims were "merely hinted at" most of the time; he found it difficult to describe the book as "an ambitious work" due to the fact that while a broad swathe of material is dealt with, most of it is examined only perfunctorily, leaving Rodway with the impression that Yeates "has lost interest in his subject entirely."
_	Moreover, the fact that this same bewilderment could arise when the winds died suggests that the Vikings relied on prevailing winds to navigate, as expected if their skills depended principally on traditional knowledge.
_	While some sources call the Estonian Swedes' migration an outright expulsion from their Estonian homeland, other accounts stress the fact that these poor and oppressed serf farmers were given what may have seemed like a generous offer.
_	Describing the album as "the result" of McAloon's "late night experiments" with radio recording, "Entertainment.ie" rated the album four stars out of five, calling the record "an exceptional work from an exceptional talent" that, while bordering "on the self-indulgent at times, much of the material is absolutely fascinating - despite, or perhaps because of the fact that it's been taken completely out of its original context."
_	Wiley may face political opponents in his run for Mayor, in part due to the fact that his father, James Wiley, who served as the head of North Bergen’s Department of Public Works from 1995 until his retirement on August 31, 2012, pleaded guilty on September 11, 2012 in County Superior Court to second-degree conspiracy to commit official misconduct after having used North Bergen town employees to work at his house and perform campaign duties and personal chores for him.
_	Scholars such as Bart Ehrman treat as significant the fact that, of the seven letters written by Ignatius of Antioch to seven Christian churches shortly after the time of Clement, the only one that does not present the church as headed by a single bishop is that addressed to the church in Rome, although this letter did not refer to a collective priesthood either.
_	Mauritius laments the fact that he has been made prefect of the prison despite his many deeds for Rome and that his daughter is dying from a terrible sickness despite all his sacrifices to the Roman gods.
_	The statement quickly became a meme on Chinese web forums, primarily due to the nature and context of the comment, and that other parodies took advantage of the fact that "huáng" (黄), the Mandarin character for "erotic", can also refer to the color yellow.
_	Alan Sepinwall of "HitFix" praised the fact that the kiss was in the background comparing it to better than the "ghoulish" episode of "Cougar Town".
_	The ruling Communist Party of India's general secretary Prakash Karat said "The central government should extend all help to the state government in tracking down the culprits behind this attack especially in view of the fact that the state has international borders on its three sides."
_	Under this theory, the officials denied the imperial ancestry of these children in fear of the fact that they were also descendants of Empress Dowager Lü and her clan, and therefore might avenge the slaughter of the Lü clan—a reason that they themselves admitted.
_	I've had to go through the fact that I set up my dad in sainthood, but never addressed the years of abuse.
_	During the eighties, thought, it saw its financial capacity reduced despite the fact that its circulation had grown exponentially.
_	This letter, seemingly, provided alleviation of suffering of some slaves due to the fact that Paul placed pastoral focus on the issue.
_	The strangeness of its contents is due to the fact that it is incarnated in this prodigious realm.
_	According to some sources, the cause for the Amazons' attack on Athens was the fact that Theseus had abandoned Antiope and planned to marry Phaedra.
_	Ovid mentions that Theseus killed Antiope despite the fact that she was pregnant.
_	The serpents are detailed in the fact that they aren't just a line, giving a greater sense of realism to the game.
_	The partnership benefited from the cultural recognition of the poster as a design piece in the 1930s and from the fact that mass media was yet to explode, meaning that the poster was the only means of shouting a message to a mass audience.
_	The recipes' common characteristics are the presence of meat and the fact that all are sauces for pasta.
_	The objective of this was to call attention to the fact that there were no Asian or Asian-American actors at the Oscars, and that "the only yellow men were all statues."
_	During his term, he faced many political challenges, due to the fact that the main opposing party, New Progressive Party (NPP) gained control of the Legislative Assembly of Puerto Rico, the Resident Commissioner in Congress (Luis Fortuño), and Acevedo Vilá's main political rival, Pedro Rosselló (former Governor or Puerto Rico who had just lost the election against Acevedo), managed to gain a seat in the Senate of Puerto Rico after a young first-term Senator from Arecibo unexpectedly resigned shortly after taking the oath of office, and unsuccessfully attempted to topple Senate President Kenneth McClintock.
_	Rantel frequently features guests on his program, coordinating a weekly simulcast with British talkSport host Mike Mendoza (despite the fact that Mendoza has compared homosexuality to pedophilia) and often conversing with conservative author Ann Coulter.
_	This is in spite of the fact that the station is one of the most heavily used on the line.
_	Kaisharis and Walston decided on the name due to the fact that "It's white, dirty and holds all of our sh--."
_	For the past 12 years, she has hidden the fact that she is a girl.
_	Another factor that hampered the development of Ivorian-Soviet links was the fact that Soviet Union had close links with Guinea, ruled by Houphouët-Boigny's adversary Ahmed Sékou Touré.
_	I think the fact that it (electronic dance music) is mostly male dominated makes females stand out that much more if they are driven enough.
_	Noteworthy is the fact that the tree contains 39 distinct word combinations that are not catenae, e.g. AC, BD, CE, BCE, ADF, ABEF, ABDEF, etc.
_	Ron Evans, the assembly's Grand Chief, said that Smith's recommendations "bring attention to the fact that most vulnerable victims of domestic human trafficking and sexual exploitation are First Nations youth."
_	Visitors are welcome to witness the fleet in action, but must respect the fact that the area is very much a working beach with many hidden perils.
_	Despite the fact that several Deryni play central roles in the Restoration, anti-Deryni sentiment continues to grow throughout the kingdom.
_	Its name derives through Greek σίγουρος from the Venetian word "siguro", meaning "safe", based on the fact that it has a safe harbour.
_	The term Barnabotti derives form the fact that the group met and lived in the zone of the "Campo San Barnaba".
_	From the start of the 14 March 2015 timetable revision, the remaining "Ayame" services were discontinued due to low ridership amid competition by bus services, despite the fact that its scheduled travel time between Tokyo and Kashima-Jingu was only one hour and 43 minutes, about 40 minutes faster than bus schedules.
_	Overlaid upon these financial issues was the fact that veterans of the war had received little pay during the war and faced difficulty collecting pay owed them from the State or the Congress of the Confederation.
_	A member of the United Nations (UN) Commission of Experts testified during the trial of Duško Tadić at the ICTY that their number was in the thousands, but she could not be precise, despite the fact that Serbian officials confirmed there were no large scale releases of prisoners sent there.
_	The interest in the phytogeomorphological approach stems from the fact that the geomorphology component typically dictates the hydrology of the farm field.
_	This was due to the fact that, at Wang Phong, the train was supposed to be collecting a schedule for stopping at certain passing loops for train crossing.
_	Consequently, one of the prosecutors questioned the reliability of Fonti on the alleged sinkings, despite the fact that his collaboration with the authorities since 1994 had resulted in high-profile arrests of 'Ndrangheta members involved in drug trafficking.
_	Her consistent motifs of women having power over men and even killing them is possibly a revenge narrative linked to the fact that Gentileschi was raped by her father’s friend Agostino Tassi when she was just a teen.
_	The term 'ply' comes from the fact that the drawing board consists of two interwoven layers, resulting in a thickness made up of two layers or strands.
_	Later on, the Orthodox media tried to blacken the event due to the fact that gay activists took part in the action.
_	Considering such a schedule and the fact that the Ukrainian Cup competition was on the way simultaneously, the Ukrainian clubs had to forfeit their scheduled games in the Soviet Cup competition.
_	Despite France's difficulties in looking at its past, which is made evident by the obstacles it continues to put before the historical research, and the way the Algerian War is taught (or not) in French high-schools, the fact that torture had not only been massively employed, but also ordered by the French government, was confirmed by General Paul Aussaresses in 2001.
_	To that end, Manohar and Satish get together and invent a "electricity producing machine" which harnesses its power from vehicles that drive on roads (the fact that this isn't free energy, and that it would cost motorists who drive over it some extra fuel is not mentioned in the movie).
_	Despite the fact that Boris Yeltsin at the time of the ceremony was already a former President (having resigned December 31, 1999), he was formally invited as a guest, but took part in the ceremony as the outgoing President.
_	Taking its name from "Wee" Joe McKibben, one of three owners of the cinema (which was nicknamed the "Wee Shank"), it was said locally that it cost a jam jar to get in on account of the fact that patrons could go to McKibben's other place of business, a grocery shop, and swap an empty jam jar for a ticket to the cinema.
_	In the season one episode "Bomb Squad", Jarod is described as having had an "erudite, European upbringing" and that the cadence in Jarod's voice betray the fact that he was raised by a "French or Belgian nanny".
_	Eurogamer gave "Colin McRae: Dirt 2" a score of 8/10 with their main criticisms being reserved for the lack of weather and track deterioration, and the fact that damage now has very little influence on the game, with drivers receiving a brand new car for each race.
_	Enraged by this and the fact that Jeff is now dating Carol, Fluke viciously attacks him when he visits the house, and ends up getting put outside.
_	The conspiracy theory is supported by the fact that voting lists were used to identify Sikh families.
_	Because of the fact that many football teams in Yugoslavia wore red and white or black and white jerseys, most notably Red Star Belgrade and Partizan, Maribor officials decided for a new and fresh combination.
_	Research has primarily analyzed geopolitical imaginations of European and North American countries, ignoring the fact that in other socio-political contexts there exist different ‘non-western’ geopolitical imaginations.
_	This is further corroborated by the fact that the grand princesses of the fifteenth century, Sofiia Vitovtovna and Sofiia Palaiologina both received foreign envoys in 1476 and 1490, respectively.
_	The National Register described the building's architecture as achieving a "unique quality and charm from the fact that vernacular builders selectively borrowed Georgian, Roman Classical, Adamesque, and other European Renaissance architectural forms, elements, and details and combined them in the builder's own esoteric way."
_	"Calling Out of Context" received positive reviews, AllMusic noted that "with the many hats Russell wore, "Calling out of Context" should hammer home the fact that he was also a dynamite writer of heart-on-sleeve love songs -- not just a formidable cellist and innovative disco producer."
_	The Goodies created this episode with the sole intention of annoying Mrs Whitehouse, who had written to the BBC to praise the team's wholesome family-orientated humour, clearly overlooking the fact that the first episode contained, in Bill Oddie's words, "drug references, tits and a royal scandal".
_	Hebrew but was registered by the mandatory authorities as a Jew despite the fact that he did not convert to Judaism.
_	Tyner had initially chosen to undergo a pat-down rather than going through a full-body scan machine because of health concerns and the fact that he viewed the machines as a threat to privacy.
_	The planners and constructors had overlooked the fact that a water pumping station next to the facility had been built over unstable land, and a portion of the building's foundations would have had to be redone because of this.
_	Although an important feature of contracts, the fact that they are used on such a large scale means that they are approached by the courts with suspicion and:
_	The release of the book prompted pundits to say that she is leaving open the possibility to run for president in 2016 or even 2020, in spite of the fact that she repeatedly declared that she is not running.
_	Cleary's defense was temporary insanity, brought on, he claimed, by the fact that Newman had impregnated, then secretly married, Cleary's daughter Anna.
_	"It's a tragedy to say it but David was one of those classic people who could not face up to the fact that things were wrong and he looked for solace in a bottle," commented Bron.
_	His work here led to the Organization for a Better Austin (OBA) in 1966, notable for the fact that it brought together African-Americans and whites in an area tormented by racial strife.
_	Unfortunately, there are not many remains of such "Esszettel" today, one of the reasons lying in the fact that the church institutions had mostly seen "Esszettel" as pure superstition.
_	In spite of the fact that even in his early works he relates to political and social issues, in the 1980s and 1990s he gives more attention to historical events.
_	The liner notes are just like those of "Early Days", except for the fact that the images range from the years 1972 to 1979.
_	This is primarily due to two things: (1) wear and tear on the tower unit, which tended to experience technical faults with the light bulbs and carousel after prolonged use, and, (2) the fact that the game went out of print shortly after release due to a lawsuit brought against Milton Bradley for intellectual property theft.
_	Haidée and Juan fall in love despite the fact that neither can understand each other's language.
_	Initially, his efforts were rebuffed, but Washington eventually came around, promoted by the fact that Al Saud had obtained recognition from many nations.
_	Many scholars echo this claim despite the fact that Masuda’s work was published 45 years before Iwasaki’s.
_	Frequent mention of friends like Tullus, the nephew of Lucius Volcatius Tullus, consul in 33 BC, plus the fact that he lived on Rome's Esquiline Hill indicate he moved among the children of the rich and politically connected during the early part of the 20s BC.
_	The requirement for kinetic energy was based on the fact that 58-foot pounds is required to deliver a potentially lethal injury.
_	This is due to the fact that it takes about 3,500 liters of water to produce enough food for the daily minimum of 3,000 calories, and food production for a typical family of four takes a daily amount of water equivalent to the amount of water in an Olympic-sized swimming pool.
_	However, the Hungarian Communist Party, a Marxist–Leninist group who shared the Soviet government's ideological beliefs, constantly wrested small concessions in a process named salami tactics, which sliced away the elected government's influence, despite the fact that it had received only 17% of the vote.
_	As described in a film magazine, against the promptings of her heart, Margot Hughes (Talmadge) marries Chadwick Himes (O'Brien) and completely ignores the fact that her husband is very much in love with her.
_	Daniel J. Mitchell has argued that Hauser's Law has been observed due to the fact that the U.S. does not have a national sales tax and instead collects taxes in a federalist system, in contrast to many other Western nations.
_	Confusion about the names stems from the fact that on their ship "The Prince of Wales", at least five males were named John McIntosh in one form or another.
_	The "Upper Cumberland" part of the name refers to the fact that the denomination was established in Gallatin, Tennessee on the Upper Cumberland River, the section of the Cumberland River east of Nashville, Tennessee.
_	Many types of multiplexers and buffers exist and all must take into account the fact that I²C lines are specified to be bidirectional.
_	However, the closely related compound estradiol sulfamate (E2MATE) failed to show estrogenic activity in humans, which is due to the fact that it is additionally a highly potent inhibitor of steroid sulfatase and prevents its own bioactivation into estradiol.
_	"Bam Thwok" debuted at number one on an early version of the UK Download Chart, although one report said that the fact that the Pixies were in first place despite releasing the single halfway through the period surveyed and only through iTunes "suggests there could be problems to iron out ... [unless] all iTunes owners are big fans of the Pixies."
_	After discussing the events of the previous issue with a recuperating Batman, Flash heads to the Justice League Watchtower, where he thinks about how he hid a piece of crucial evidence from Bruce: the fact that the radiation on Thawne's corpse matches the radiation on the Button.
_	Psoralen is difficult to synthesize due the fact that umbelliferone undergoes substitution at the 8-position rather than at the desired 6 position.
_	In addition to the traditional information and enforcement advantages resulting from the fact that members shared the same workplace, the employer-based bond permitted credit unions to use future paychecks as collateral.
_	"The Washington Post" Stuever has many complaints about the show including the fact that it is about Washington, DC, but filmed in Baltimore.
_	Something that is not often discussed in context with this experiment is the fact that the dogs would not salivate unless they were wearing a special harness.
_	Despite the fact that the California softball program has been one of the more successful programs in the country, and earning a national seed on many different occasions in the past, the Bears hosted NCAA tournament games in 2012 for the first time since the 1993 season (the team then played at Strawberry Field).
_	They are also disturbed by the fact that far more of the ship's medical systems are active than would be expected.
_	Another notable difference is the absence of any lateral movements, causing some enthusiasts to not consider the rides 4th dimension roller coasters due to the fact that all movement is restricted to a 2 dimensional plane.
_	I am referring to the fact that both opponents were perfectly equal and therefore had to take more of the combative note into account".
_	A fair and objective critique of his output should take into account the fact that, occasionally, the emphasis on virtuosity and technique can be detrimental to the musical content and substance.
_	She must have realized the personal gain that might stem from the transition to seniority coupled with the fact that she was no longer haseki but had a son "in waiting".
_	This is due to the fact that Kentucky requires an amended birth certificate reflecting person's accurate gender, but the state of Ohio does not change gender markers on birth certificates.
_	The romantic comedy film ponders the classic question of how much looks matter when it comes to love, when a good-looking architect finds the perfect woman, except for the fact that she is not very pretty.
_	Emperor Taizong, citing the fact that the Han Chinese may be fearful of Khitan soldiers, stopped at Lu himself and had Shi advance toward Luoyang by himself.
_	This Gaeltacht has been featured in the news, primarily for the fact that it is the first of its kind outside Ireland and has been reported on by the Irish TG4, the British BBC and in the Canadian Globe and Mail newspaper.
_	Searle simply claims that to posit the existence of something that is like a "thought" in every way except for the fact that no one can ever be aware of it (can never, indeed, "think" it) is an incoherent concept.
_	Computational models have demonstrated the importance of accounting for the fact that the in-cylinder mixture is actually in-homogeneous, particularly in terms of temperature.
_	The auction house is in dispute over the check that he wrote (ignoring the fact that Flynn touched a throw pillow with the stone, effectively turning it into a 2 million British pound gold piece on his way out), and his suggestion of using the philosopher's stone to pay off the debt is met with resistance since standing policy is that the Library must not profit from its treasures.
_	Regarding Judge Baricevic, the FEC complaint stated, "Given the fact that "Given the fact that C. John Baricevic, C. J. Baricevic's father, has served on the bench as an Illinois judge for more than a decade, it is not surprising at all that the local legal community, including Keefe, Keefe, and Unsell, would take advantage of a young attorney in order to curry favor with his father who, as chief judge, not only hears a significant number of cases but also assigns cases to each of the judges he oversees."
_	There is no definitive version, but one variant is known to have been in existence by the time of World War I. Drinking songs describing the humorous invigorating effects of some food or medicine form almost a small genre in themselves, and the fact that Pinkham's medicine was marketed for "female complaints" made it especially vulnerable to ribald fantasies about what it might cure.
_	He justified that by the fact that there were no cigarettes in the prophetic era (7th century AD) and that neither the Quran nor Messenger Muhammad prohibited smoking explicitly.
_	News, Marlow denied that Breitbart is a "hate-site", stating "that we're consistently called anti-Semitic despite the fact that we are overwhelmingly staffed with Jews and are pro-Israel and pro-Jewish.
_	This usage is derived from the fact that many of the Palestinians who became refugees in 1948 had locked their homes when leaving, expecting to return soon, and took the keys with them.
_	Also criticized was the fact that many of the game elements were already featured in the series or by other World War II shooters (with the exception of the parachute drop).
_	The organization is concerned with the need for people of small stature (dwarfism) to be useful members of society through education, employment and social adjustment, and to focus public attention to the fact that the magnitude of any physical limitation is a function of attitude of both the small and the average-sized person and desire to assist in these matters.
_	Despite the fact that Jordan has few natural resources it does benefit from abundant reserves of potash and phosphates, which are widely used in the production of fertilisers.
_	Researchers like Elizabeth Loftus have challenged eyewitness testimony based on the fact that people's memory can be distorted.
_	The senators who voted against confirming Quattlebaum did so not because they found him unqualified, but as a protest vote over the fact that in 2013 and 2016, the Senate had not advanced two black nominees for the same South Carolina judgeship.
_	North America usually releases its models one to one and a half calendar years after Japan does, due to the fact that all current Legacies for the North American market have been built at Subaru of Indiana located in Lafayette, Indiana since 2004.
_	He also had a dotted line "tattoo" on his right arm (parodying Goldberg's tribal tattoo) and would use the catchphrase "Who's First?" in reference not only to Goldberg's catchphrase "Who's Next?", but also to the fact that Gill would lose to each and every one of his opponents.
_	In providing an example, Mr. Fortas presented the justices with the fact that when Clarence Darrow, who was widely known as the greatest criminal attorney in the United States, was charged with jury tampering and suborning perjury, the first thing he did was get an attorney to represent him.
_	These events, along with the fact that he was linked to personally overseeing who ran the heads of each Mexican cartel, together with the increasing current account deficit fostered by government spending, caused alarm among Mexican and foreign T-bill ("tesobono") investors, who sold them rapidly, thereby depleting the already-low central bank reserves (which eventually hit a record low of $9 billion).
_	Given the fact that it was an election year, whose outcome might have changed as a result of a pre-election-day economic downturn, the Bank of Mexico decided to buy Mexican Treasury Securities in order to maintain the monetary base, and thus prevent the interest rates from rising.
_	The name comes from the fact that MN 62 is also known locally as the "Crosstown Highway".
_	Studies have found that pregnenolone levels are not significantly changed after surgical or medical castration in men, which is in accordance with the fact that pregnenolone is mainly derived from the adrenal glands.
_	In 1424, Emperor Sigismund ruled, based on the fact that the people of Schleswig spoke Danish, followed Danish customs and considered themselves to be Danes, that the territory rightfully belonged to the King of Denmark.
_	Being the sole member of the Library Club, he enjoys the fact that he can read peacefully by himself.
_	Four teams tied for third place due to the fact that there was no play off to determine a single bronze medal winner.
_	Leszek I the White of Kraków, Konrad I of Masovia, Wladyslaw Odonic of Kalisz and Casimir I of Opole issued the so-called "Immunity Privilege", in which they confirmed the fact that Archbishops of Gniezno owned Lowicz.
_	San Francisco's Jeffrey Leonard was named the Series MVP despite the fact that his Giants lost the series.
_	This fire risk was aggravated by the fact that if the printer continued to operate, it would essentially stoke the oven with fresh paper at high speed.
_	This decision is justified by the fact that for + we have V > V > V, which according to Simons fixes an unlikely channel for the excitation transfer.
_	It remains unclear whether or not he was on the pre-war council; his advance rested on the fact that he could speak the German language.
_	Further to the idea of inevitability is the fact that Sun unknowingly seals his own doom by consuming meat whose origins he is unaware of.
_	Part of the reason for such a statement may have been the fact that at one time Frenchman Creek and its main branch the Stinking Water Creek were used as watering stops for cattle drives that traveled from Texas to the Union Pacific railhead at Ogallala.
_	The quality of the Amiga's sound output, and the fact that the hardware is ubiquitous and easily addressed by software, were standout features of Amiga hardware unavailable on PC platforms for years.
_	The name "Leadhills" testifies to the fact that this area was chiefly known for its lead mining; and there is a lead mining museum in nearby Wanlockhead.
_	The name comes from the fact that the Grand Calumet and Little Calumet rivers run through the area.
_	The group originally debuted with a "boyish" concept, referring to the fact that the majority of the members had short hair and a more masculine attitude and style, opposed to the feminine concepts many Korean pop girl groups have, but after their line-up changes, the group returned in 2015 with a feminine and sexy concept.
_	The word "bokking" is derived from the word "bok" (the Dutch word for "buck" or "goat"), and refers to the fact that bokkoms reminds of goat, because bokkoms has the same shape as the horns of a goat, it is just as hard as a goat's horns, and it stinks just as much as the horn of a goat (goats have scent glands behind their horns which causes the smell).
_	According to Rosanna Cantavella, a scholar who has extensively studied Sor Isabel, there was a rumor that there had to be divine intervention from the Archangel Michael that allowed Isabel to be elected as abbess, simply because it would have been very difficult for her to be elected on her own because of the fact that she was an illegitimate child.
_	It has long been speculated that Whitley's death may not have been directly caused by his recklessness or alcoholism, but that he may have been a victim of foul play due to the fact that Keith Whitley became sober in 1987.
_	Also noted was the fact that Anton would have to continue negotiations with teachers' unions, and the possibility of a strike if salaries were not raised.
_	Between 1870 and 1878, the state were put under joint administration, due to the fact that Prince Takhtsinhji was a minor.
_	(5) No High Contracting Party may evade the obligations incumbent upon it under the present Article, in respect of another High Contracting Party, by reason of the fact that the latter has not applied the measures of safeguard referred to in Article 3.
_	An innovation in the act was the fact that all electors had a single vote, and thus county councillors were popularly elected.
_	Other improvements include reduced road noise, attributed to the fact that this model doesn't use polymer body panels like its predecessors, in addition to the extensive soundproofing GM added to car, and the triple-pane front windows and windshield.
_	In fact the story is rather subtler than this summary sounds, despite the fact that the author's sympathies obviously lie with Shawcross's friends and associates who remain faithful to the cause; however, many of the middle class and aristocratic characters are portrayed fairly sympathetically, and one character whose career parallels that of Shawcross in his rise from poverty to eminence is a market-boy who becomes a major capitalist.
_	Our understanding of naturally occurring necrobiomes is further complicated by the fact that different portions of a corpse may be in different stages of decomposition.
_	As well as the fact that the foster-mother of the Islamic prophet Muhammad, Halimah al-Sa‘diyah, was from the tribe of the Banu Sa'd, a subdivision of Hawazin, the parent tribe of Otaibah.
_	Later on his name was modified to "Damián 666", with the addition of 666 stemming from the fact that he had taken to painting those numbers on his forehead.
_	The two forms reflect the fact that for some speakers of Romani there are two rhotic (ar-like) phonemes: and .
_	What these two most original and distinctive of the vanguardia painters had in common - aside from severe problems with alcoholism - was the fact that neither had studied in Europe.
_	This policy has been criticized, as it makes state-awarded diplomas dependent on a private institution—despite the fact that it was not the private institution that set the 785 mark but a recommendation from the "Commission des titres d'ingénieur" indicating a B2+ level on the Common European Framework of Reference for Languages.
_	Though Zamora was openly gay, he chose to not make that explicit point to school children, preferring to emphasize to them that he got the disease through unprotected sex, to underscore the fact that both homosexuals and heterosexuals could contract HIV.
_	Also unusual is the fact that Sullivan includes his name in the tile mosaic over the front door.
_	Aniruddha Guha of "Daily News and Analysis" gave it 2 stars and wrote: "Salman is charming as ever, and the fact that he’s playing a slightly different character would have actually worked to the film’s advantage if it was backed by a better script."
_	It seems that Mickey is upset over the fact that his parents spend every Monday night arguing.
_	Eyewitnesses have confirmed that camels, including dromedary and Bactrian camels, can swim, despite the fact that there is little deep water in their natural habitats.
_	George F. Nelson, who was Potter's assistant at Grace Church, attributes the progress to the fact that "the Rector and his Vestry were brethren dwelling together in unity.
_	EMCC claimed that the fact that it worked at all after this was testimony to the quality of the design.)
_	However, the doctrine can only be used where the defendant would have had a right to self-defense but for the fact that the defendant was the initial aggressor.
_	The most commonly cited capacity is "The Magical Number Seven, Plus or Minus Two" (which is frequently referred to as "Miller's Law"), despite the fact that Miller himself stated that the figure was intended as "little more than a joke" (Miller, 1989, page 401) and that Cowan (2001) provided evidence that a more realistic figure is 4±1 units.
_	I didn’t like the way Hollywood treated him—he was kind of an underdog and I loved the fact that he would just say, “Here, go make the movie.”
_	He was largely responsible for the fact that Reagan's environmental record in Sacramento was pretty good, in spite of the fact that Reagan said fairly outrageous things" about environmental issues.
_	Despite the fact that the drug had not been studied in this age group, a multitude of OTC preparations containing carbinoxamine were being marketed for infants and toddlers.
_	In addition to this, Benito resents his sedentary desk job and the fact that Gabriela won't sympathize with him.
_	It is only the fact that humans are part of it that makes it seem so special, requiring a transcendent explanation.
_	The logo for Paramount Pictures also doesn't appear at the beginning, due to the movie's poor reception and the fact that Paramount merely distributed it.
_	Editors and critics of the play felt that the speech was probably wrongly attributed to her either as a printing error or due to the fact that actors preferred that no character would remain silent too long on stage.
_	Designed by JPA Design Consultants, this type of sleeper suite is unique in the fact that the outboard seats face toward the windows instead of the aisles, and the center section seats (on widebody aircraft) face inward instead of outward.
_	GameSpot scored it an 8 out of 10 criticising the short storyline, the limited Sackboy manipulation, and the lack of multiplayer, but they praised the fact that almost everything else was intact from the PlayStation 3 version.
_	That assessment was self-serving, but undoubtedly Fagan's views were more conservative than other critics of the government, like Alan Paton's Liberal Party, and did not question the fact that South Africa's white population ought to be preserved and indeed preferred.
_	Nevertheless, Ross' position reflected that of many of his fellow citizens of Fulton County, as evidenced by the fact that he was twice re-elected to Congress.
_	Buchanan explained that the process was made much more difficult due to the fact that his co-stars always wanted to discuss it.
_	Comforted by the fact that Léa has returned, Chéri runs home to Edmée where he makes love to her properly and kindly, thinking that he can now live in peace with Edmée.
_	That the alliance was construed by his contemporaries as purely mercenary, and the fact that Adolf did not comply with its obligations, damaged his reputation, but this was initially without consequences.
_	In the book, Popkin contends that the rising rates of obesity around the world are due to several different factors, including globalization, technology, and the fact that people now eat more often and in more places than they did before.
_	He also cites the fact that humans have a tendency to enjoy eating foods containing large amounts of sugar and fat as another contributor to the obesity epidemic.
_	However, due to the fact that current financing and investment patterns are inadequate in meeting investment needs, there is "space for newcomers", he said.
_	Gordon can tell that he is not looking at the original Batman (based on Jean-Paul's costume and Dick's height, and the fact that Jean-Paul was more than ready to kill people), and he refuses to place blind trust in a costume after spending so long learning to trust the man.
_	The basis for the Penn State Athletic Department request for the unbalanced home games was the fact that of the 96 games played by the two teams at the time, only 23 occurred in Happy Valley.
_	Konjic was also included in those areas claimed by the HDZ in Bosnia and Herzegovina as part of the "Croatian Community of Herceg-Bosna", despite the fact that the Croats did not constitute a majority of the population there either (just a quarter of population in 1991, as the municipality was mixed).
_	In addition to the fact that UPW has organic particles and dissolved gases removed, a typical UPW system has three stages: a pretreatment stage to produce purified water, a primary stage to further purify the water, and a polishing stage, the most expensive part of the treatment process.
_	It goes on to comment that on a general level the reasoning used by the atheists for denying the existence of God is based in the fact that "we ascribe to God affections that are human, or we attribute so much strength and wisdom to our minds" that we presume to understand that which God can and ought to do.
_	This was due to the hard copper-nickel alloy and the fact that the eagle on one side of the piece was directly opposite parts of the reverse design; efforts to bring out the design more fully led to increased die breakage.
_	In addition, there is evidence that property values surrounding some more desirable schools become inflated, thus restricting the ability of lower socio-economic groups to purchase a house in the zone, though this is off set by the fact that students are accepted from rental accommodation or from homes where they are boarding with a bona fide relative or friend living in the zone.
_	Clementi's online conversations and text messages referred to his amusement at Ravi's construction of a private changing area, but Clementi said he appreciated the fact that Ravi left him alone and did not force an excessively social atmosphere.
_	This implies that there is no decay and phase coherence is maintained throughout the process, and is a consequence of the fact that all participating degrees of freedom are considered.
_	Given James's history with the Ruthvens and the fact that he owed them a great deal of money, his account of the circumstances was not universally believed.
_	This veneration can perhaps be accounted by the fact that Augustine of Canterbury came from a monastery near the basilica of Santi Quattro Coronati in Rome or because their relics were sent from Rome to England in 601.
_	In spite of the fact that he directed a number of films that have become cult favorites with horror movie buffs, he died in abject poverty in 1991 from AIDS and was buried in an unmarked pauper's grave in Los Angeles, California.
_	Despite the fact that the engine and plough coped well with the task, the effort of re-positioning the pulleys at either end of the field was too time-consuming.
_	The number of churches and the fact that the RCUS now reached from California to Florida aided that decision.
_	The coat of arms of 1882 has a white double-headed eagle, but not the Nemanjić type, but a German one, despite the fact that it symbolizes heritage of the Nemanjić; the mistake was made by the illustrator of the coat of arms, Von Schtrel (a German), who "cheated" Stojan Novaković (a Serbian reputable historian and minister) and used the German-style eagle instead of the Nemanjić eagle.
_	Citizenship matters were complicated by the fact that British nationality law treated those born in Hong Kong as British subjects (although they did not enjoy full rights and citizenship), while the People's Republic of China (PRC) did not recognise Hong Kong Chinese as such.
_	Schwarzenberg has been criticized for the fact that his wife cannot speak Czech and that he spent a part of his life abroad, despite the fact that his family fled from communists when he was a child.
_	They would produce an identical record in 2009; however, the season was somewhat ameliorated by the fact that four of the Raiders' five wins were against opponents with above .500 records.
_	The "mystery" referenced in the Evening Standard diary is the fact that the author of the "Trouser Bar" script/scenario is officially unknown, despite earlier comments and claims to the contrary.
_	Some television stations (such as WKYC and WJW in Cleveland, Ohio, or WJAR in Providence, Rhode Island) have recently begun using the fact that primetime in the Eastern Time Zone begins at 8:00 p.m. to their advantage by carrying a newscast during the 7:00 p.m. hour, generally in order to attract viewers who work longer days and cannot return home to watch a 5:00 or 6:00 p.m. newscast.
_	He cited as his reason for leaving the fact that his party had refused to even debate his proposal regarding the constitutional future of Quebec.
_	The Turtles sued De La Soul for using a sample from their 1969 hit "You Showed Me" for the interlude track "Transmitting Live from Mars", despite the fact that The Turtles did not actually write the original song.
_	They can all be machined using a manual hacksaw, despite the fact that some of them are three times as stiff as titanium metal, with the same density as titanium.
_	Although the interior corridors seen throughout the original series were not initially seen in the 2005 series, the fact that they still exist was established in "The Unquiet Dead" (2005), when the Doctor gives Rose some very complicated directions to the TARDIS wardrobe.
_	In "Consider Phlebas", a typical Mind is described as a mirror-like ellipsoid of several dozen cubic metres, but weighing many thousands of tons, due to the fact that it is made up of hyper-dense matter.
_	If Officer Roosevelt's account of the shooting is correct, the fact that he was hit nine times at night by .45-caliber bullets strongly indicates that Walker actually shot Roosevelt from his car with a burst of automatic fire from a Thompson submachine gun.
_	However, in 2013, in recognition of the fact that many communitues had resettled into the Park, the borders were changed to reflect this fact and facilitate the management of the area as a wildlife haven.
_	The main incentive for Sharky and Haffner to enter episodes of "The Lone Shark" into the competition was the fact that they could get copies of the comments of the judges who reviewed and voted on the video entries.
_	In historic times they were once spoken as far south as the Tirah valley, where now the only language heard is Pashto, and the fact that Ormuri shows traces of them leads to the supposition that there were once speakers of a Dardic languages still further south in Waziristan and, perhaps, the Logar country before they were occupied by the Pashtuns."
_	This suggests that sex changes might not purely depend on fish length, but we cannot ignore the fact that fishery has changed the natural population composition of "P. colias".
_	This theory was supported by the fact that investigators who were examining the wrecked shell of train 153944 found the main brake pipe valve, located behind the first car, closed.
_	An official document bearing 21 June 1720 as a definite date, bears testimony to the fact that his grandfather, Jan Verlooy (about 1657–1723), was a royal and hereditary notary ("conincklyck ende erfelyck notaris").
_	This position might have provided him with a degree of respectability which is proved by the fact that one of his grand children, Jan Frans Verlooy, referred to it when he applied to be a notary in the Chancery of Brabant in 1775.
_	Ekwall went as far as to say "it has often been held that Colchester contains as first element [Latin] "colonia" ... this derivation is ruled out of court by the fact that Colne is the name of several old villages situated a good many miles from Colchester and on the Colne.
_	House Bill CS/HB 355 and Senate Bill CS/SB 742 are being considered at present in Tallahassee to address the fact that 9-1-1 operatives in the state are not required to undertake mandatory training.
_	The term Virginia dynasty is sometimes used to describe the fact that four of the first five U.S. presidents were from Virginia.
_	Leo de Benedicto, whose baptismal name comes from the fact that he was baptised by Pope Leo IX himself.
_	Drawing on various sources of European continental philosophy his work highlights, beyond the efforts of the traditional stream of research in business ethics, the fact that ethics cannot be taught or understood as any other management “knowledge”.
_	Jim jumps into the water, but because of the height of the jump and the fact that it is late at night, Eva is unsure if he made it safely in the water.
_	Despite all this, Louise continued to turn a blind eye to his activities unaware that Ray was hiding more than just his dodgy deals from his girlfriend, he had also hidden the fact that he had diabetes.
_	The use of this old clock was due to the fact that the technology did not exist for an electronic timepiece, and would not until 1980, when an electronic timepiece was finally obtained for BBC2.
_	The usual story about the — given the fact that "Oplosaurus" is not known to be armoured — odd choice of name is that Gervais named this large, well-preserved tooth (holotype BMNH R964) under the mistaken belief that its owner was an armoured dinosaur like "Hylaeosaurus" following Mantell's suggestion.
_	Most of it is due to the 2004 Final; Pumas vs Guadalajara and also due to the fact that UNAM has not been able to win against Guadalajara in an away match for now, 36 years.
_	This would mean that the skin already was softened and loose, which is bolstered by the fact that in some specimens the flight feathers were starting to detach at the point of embedding in the sediment.
_	The piano compositions of the great composers often sold well among amateurs, despite the fact that, starting with Beethoven, they were often far too hard for anyone but a trained virtuoso to play well.
_	Quebec city objected to the fact that no games were in Quebec city.
_	Despite the fact that he never dunked in an actual game, he participated in the 1993 NBA Slam Dunk Contest, after Nuggets president and general manager Bernie Bickerstaff sent NBA league officials a tape of Abdul-Rauf showcasing his dunking ability.
_	There was a lot of demand for the winter landscapes painted by Leytens as is confirmed by the fact that they were often incorporated in the art gallery paintings of Frans Francken the Younger.
_	Polaco's association with the group is also lent weight by the fact that upon his return to WWF after the closure of ECW in 2001 he instantly aligned himself on TV with X-Pac with the two going on to form a short lived stable under the name of X-Factor along with Albert as the group's enforcer.
_	The origin of the river's current name is originally thought to be derived from the fact that in dry seasons the river bed is broken into a series of water holes.
_	In the 1800s the harbour was enclosed by locks, together with a diversion of the River Avon, resulting in its alternative name of the "Floating Harbour", taken from the fact that the ships were able to float at all times, rather than resting in the mud at low tide, as had previously been the case.
_	Clohessy struggled with the fact that his brother, Father Kevin Clohessy (who has since left the priesthood voluntarily), also had eventually "a credible accusation" against him for being inappropriate sexually while a priest.
_	The Population Growth rate is also attributable to the fact that majority of Muslim populations are concentrated in the states that are lagging behind in social reforms and services which have shown higher birth rates than other states.
_	Several fraternities, sororities, and secret societies exist on the University of Victoria, despite the fact that the Students' Society does not recognize fraternities, sororities, or societies on the basis that they, by definition, seek to exclude portions of the membership.
_	From around 1950 to 1965, the support for these theories was evenly divided, with a slight imbalance arising from the fact that the Big Bang theory could explain both the formation and the observed abundances of hydrogen and helium, whereas the Steady State could explain how they were formed, but not why they should have the observed abundances.
_	Fat-hoi attempts to punish her for her crime but instead acknowledges the fact that he too has led people to their deaths, mainly his fellow monks.
_	The film made use of fight clips from Cagney's boxing movie "Winner Take All" (1932), despite the fact that the TV movie is about an entirely different character.
_	The latter remarks on Hacker's recent interview, in particular the fact that he regarded his new duties as a "challenge".
_	With the intention of releasing the material as soon as possible, Davies bemoaned the fact that he had so little time to debut his own work, but stated that he had no regrets.
_	Their final game played to clinch promotion was against Crewe Alexandra, and was notable for the fact that both teams needed a point to gain promotion.
_	However, the fact that the Earth–Moon Lagrange points and tend to collect dust and debris, whereas - require active station-keeping measures to maintain a stable position, make them somewhat less suitable places for habitation than was originally believed.
_	Alice knew from her parents of Azami's cruel treatment toward Erina as well as the fact that he destroyed her letters to Erina.
_	H3 "The Bloodstone Wars" (1987) reveals more details, including the fact that the Witch-King of Vaasa is possessed by Orcus.
_	Peruvian wine-making was further challenged by the fact that production of pisco, also made from grapes, rose from being exceed in the early 18th century by wine to represent 90% of the grape beverages prepared in Peru in 1764.
_	Studies of multiple motors are inspired by the fact that multiple motors are involved in many biological processes such as intra-cellular transport and mitosis.
_	A problem sometimes connected to the Pope Joan legend is the fact that there is no Pope John XX in any list.
_	According to Di Tella, the fact that Tangolates requires a rapport between two people is a very interesting subject of research.
_	Indeed, Tango’s strong and focused beat and the fact that it is done in close coordination with a partner is an excellent stimulus to initiate movement.
_	Edward Ball was a powerful figure in business and politics in Florida for decades despite the fact that he never held public office and did not own the assets he controlled.
_	Analysts reckoned that this was not synonymous with deflation, due to the fact that GDP had been growing since 2014, domestic consumption had rebounded as well and, especially, because core inflation remained slightly positive.
_	When Bogart first got wind of the fact that Huston might be making a film of the B. Traven novel, he immediately started badgering Huston for a part.
_	Despite the fact that the region had earned the name "Quad Cities", the National Basketball Association had a franchise in Moline, Illinois, from 1946 to 1951 called the "Tri-Cities Blackhawks".
_	Riegel added that "this time it was the fact that they were going to have Bianca in a committed relationship".
_	Verdict gave the film a negative review, panning the acting and the fact that the film itself did not make any sense.
_	Shortening their moniker even further to "REZ," the band took advantage of the fact that Capitol Records now handled Sparrow's distribution.
_	In England, on the borders of the diocese of Ely, there is a town called Cantabrica, just outside which is a place known as Wandlebria, from the fact that the Wandeli, when ravaging Britain and savagely putting to death the Christians, placed their camp there, Now, on the hill-top where they pitched their tents, is a level space ringed with entenchments with a single point of entry, like a gate.
_	The high number of turns is consistent with the fact that KIAA1211L is proline rich.
_	That decision was further reinforced by the fact that the boats appeared empty.
_	This terminology can be explained by the fact that the canonical projection "p" from "M" onto formula_6 is universal among all monoid homomorphisms from "M" to a (∨,0)-semilattice, that is, for any (∨,0)-semilattice "S" and any monoid homomorphism "f: M→ S", there exists a unique (∨,0)-homomorphism formula_8 such that "f=gp".
_	Originally it also was the origin for Essex, but that county was recalculated on the meridian of St. Paul's, London, in about 1919, due to the fact that Greater London started to spill out well into Essex.
_	When I heard the news about Prince and the fact that it might have been prescription drug-related, I really had a moment of, like, "That's awful and that's sad — and I can relate."
_	PVA received a rating of zero out of four possible stars from Charity Navigator, based primarily on the fact that the organization spends less than one-third of its expenses on the programs and services it delivers, and more than two-thirds on fundraising and administration.
_	McCoy took pride in the fact that he never paid a cent to organized crime, politicians, or law enforcement for protection.
_	Captain Adams confronts Dr. Morbius with the fact that he is giving form to his subconscious, and his guilty conscience, from having brought it into existence, finally ends the monster's destructive rampage.
_	The tours are geared towards creating awareness of the fact that primates do not make good pets, and the benefits of releasing primates into recognized sanctuaries.
_	The actress listened to several different voices, as she had to factor in the fact that Magnus lived all around the world.
_	Here the court distinguished the case from "Balfour v Balfour" on the fact that Mr and Mrs Merritt, although still married, were estranged at the time the agreement was made and therefore any agreement between them was made with the intention to create legal relations.
_	He stated, "Blight seems to be off to a solid start as well, though the fact that this issue is at its weakest when it directly sets up the crossover with the three other series is a bit worrisome."
_	This is due to the fact that deaf parents are better prepared than hearing parents to meet the early learning needs of the deaf child; thus, they acquire language 'on schedule'.
_	The many long-running jokes included Wali's intolerance of his mother, Tecwyn's constantly angry wife, and the fact that Arthur's wife, Elsi, was almost never seen on screen - with many excuses being made for her absence.
_	He added the displacement current term to Ampère's circuital law and this enabled him to derive the electromagnetic wave equation in his later 1865 paper "A Dynamical Theory of the Electromagnetic Field" and to demonstrate the fact that light is an electromagnetic wave.
_	Asanova never had problems with the censors despite the fact that her films featured such themes.
_	According to a BBC article, the Sri Lankan leopard has evolved to become a rather large leopard subspecies with very large males reaching almost , due to the fact that it is an apex predator without competition by other large wild cat species in the country.
_	They are connected to the history of the Serer by virtue of the fact that, the pangool is associated with the founding of Serer villages and towns as a group of "pangool" would accompany village founders called "lamane" (or "laman" - who were their ancient kings) as they make their journey looking for land to exploit.
_	This was due to the fact that, after its conquest by Great Britain in 1759, further candidates to the Order had been forbidden.
_	David Shribman, executive editor of the "Post-Gazette", explained his paper's motivation for reviving the "Press" name, citing the fact that his newspaper still received letters to the editor addressed to the "Press" instead of the "Post-Gazette", and that despite nearly 20 years since its last publication Pittsburgh natives still talked about the "Press" on a regular basis.
_	He regularly works with his brother, Jonathan Nolan (creator of "Person of Interest" and "Westworld"), who describes their working relationship in the production notes for "The Prestige": "I've always suspected that it has something to do with the fact that he's left-handed and I'm right-handed, because he's somehow able to look at my ideas and flip them around in a way that's just a little bit more twisted and interesting.
_	They were sure that a series of successful breakthroughs would snap their enemy's resolve, ignoring the fact that each victory sapped German strength, while their foes were continually strengthened by Americans flooding into France.
_	The game has been called a psychedelic parody of Epic Games character, Jazz Jackrabbit, due to similar game play and the fact that the protagonist is also a rabbit.
_	The Lukka and the Sherden in particular are mentioned in the Amarna letters, a series of 362 clay correspondence tablets from the king of Babylon to Pharaoh Amenhotep or his son Akhenaton, about the fact that these sea raiders were beginning not just to plunder ships but capture towns.
_	Company representative Valerie Jorquera also highlighted the need for a consistent chromatographic analysis of fuel samples, drawing attention to the fact that the samples provided during the event had been analysed by a different company than the reference sample, and that the differences may have been caused by the use of different analytical machines and methods.
_	Despite the fact that the Boxers had been dispersed several months before, numerous small bands of them were still operating in the country.
_	They criticized the slowdown, lack of scaling, frequent load times, and low-quality reproduction of the arcade version's sounds, and added that the fact that "Samurai Shodown" was by then a three-year-old game makes the Sega CD version's faults stand out more.
_	However, Jack just gives a simple thank-you to the fact that Dan saved him from multiple dangers, even though his stepson may have been the only one down the road who was able to help him as it was blocked by policemen due to it being blocked by the downed lines, debris and broken underground utility lines.
_	One key difference between a XACML rule engine and a business rule engine is the fact that a XACML rule engine is stateless and cannot change the state of any data.
_	Cunningham felt that Aurora's "little screen time makes [her] difficult to classify as a feminist, but her single active decision shows great promise in the evolution of feminist Disney princesses," despite the fact that her agency is constantly undermined by other characters.
_	In November 2013, following the announcement that Hull was to be the UK City of Culture 2017, NCP managing director Duncan Bowins took to popular social media website Facebook and branded the city "a sh**ehole" – despite the fact that his car parks took over £1 million from the city each year.
_	The petitioners were not infatuated with the name of Bismarck as such and did not base their case on the fact that it had been borne by a German statesman but the name was a reasonable one and was not difficult to pronounce like so many German names.
_	She thinks the fact that states, not federal lawmakers, adopt and enforce most of these product regulations presents "great challenges," for manufacturers, distributors, and retailers in particular.
_	This is borne out by the fact that the melody had long been in use in military music, and that the foundation of REME is inextricably associated with many of those regiments.
_	The exhibition exhibits Wiggles memorabilia and merchandise, alongside some of The Cockroaches memorabilia, due to the fact that Anthony and Jeff were part of The Cockroaches before The Wiggles.
_	It lacked the high levels of commonality that the Ariane 4 had with its predecessors, and had been designed not only for launching heavier payloads of up to 5.2 tonnes and at a 20 per cent cost reduction over the Ariane 4, but for a higher margin of safety due to the fact that the Ariane 5 was designed to conduct manned space launches as well, being intended to transport astronauts using the proposed Hermes space vehicle.
_	She often referred to Sabrina as a "freak", and, while ignorant of the fact that Sabrina was a witch, she suspected that Sabrina was different.
_	This is attributed to the fact that most of the village's inhabitants profess a form of Islam that is close to the Saudi version of Salafi Islam, known as Ahl al-Hadith in the South Asian region.
_	This is due to the fact that many of the largest demoparties were already well established in the early 1990s and their facilities were also suitable for large-scale LAN party activity.
_	Because of the debacle and the fact that the commanders were hit, the battalion frequency became disorderly, with hysterical reports of casualties and requests for assistance.
_	In 1911, Ferguson argued in the legislature that "no language other than English should be used as a medium of instruction in the schools of this Province," despite the fact that a significant proportion of the population was French-Canadian.
_	The film records the fact that despite its technological advances, Lepage was ultimately disappointed that he could not get the set to "figuratively stand on its head" during the final opera, "Götterdämmerung".
_	Following the success of the RSL broadcasts and the fact that there wasn't another local radio station with any significant special interest programmes aimed at the local community, Ofcom awarded a full-time 5 year community radio licence in 2006 to the same group that ran the RSLs.
_	The name comes from the fact that they are exactly the representations that occur discretely in the decomposition of the regular representation.
_	The upright Thakur is wealthy, well liked and happy, except for the fact that his wife Lajo is unable to have children.
_	The later theory is supported by the fact that she also donated linens for the rewrapping of his mummy; the former is indicated by the fact that apparently no attempt has been made to redecorate the coffin for a male mummy.
_	In his dharma talks and teishos he regularly draws attention to the fact that Zen, as it is practiced in the West, often blends classic Zen Buddhism and its practices with a Western rationalist and humanistic understandings.
_	Due to the fact that Korea can not truly compete against other countries like the United States and China with very large and powerful militaries, this use of soft power through promotion of the Korean pop culture is a viable option for them in terms of their relationships with other countries.
_	Although "diffeomorphism covariance is not the defining feature of general relativity", and controversies remain regarding its present status in general relativity, the invariance property of physical laws implied in the principle coupled with the fact that the theory is essentially geometrical in character (making use of geometries which are not Euclidean) suggested that general relativity be formulated using the language of tensors.
_	His reputation as a stern, stolid reformer is counterbalanced by the fact that he had an excellent sense of humour and used satiric fables, spoofing, and puns in his writings.
_	It benefited from the fact that a number of songs on the album (including the latter three) had been live favourites for a while and had been recorded on past releases like "The Yellow Tape".
_	Coleman pretends to follow, delaying to tie his shoelace, despite the fact that he was wearing loafers.
_	Privacy advocates worry about the fact that search engine companies can store and utilize the users’ personal information such as medical history, criminal records, profile, location and their orientation for implementing a marketing strategy.
_	The advantage of NPH is its low cost, the fact that you can mix it with short-acting forms of insulin, thereby minimizing the number of injections that must be administered, and that the activity of NPH will peak 4–6 hours after administration, allowing a bedtime dose to balance the tendency of glucose to rise with the dawn, along with a smaller morning dose to balance the lower afternoon basal need and possibly an afternoon dose to cover evening need.
_	He also noted the difficulty of the scene, due to it being close to 4,000 frames, and the fact that Downey was moving his head from side to side multiple times.
_	Thus for example when comparing Qazvin to Yazd, Qazvin has fewer surviving ab anbars despite the fact that Yazd’s ab anbars have been retired for much longer time spans.
_	(This image is derived from the fact that "soul" in German, "die Seele", is always a feminine noun.["Cassel"'s "German-English Dictionary", entry "die Seele".]
_	Many of the basic properties of double cosets follow immediately from the fact that they are orbits.
_	Manny is also having trouble fearing the fact that he may be the last mammoth left.
_	The poetry of Lautréamont is characterized by the juxtaposition of fantastical elements, and by sadistic imagery; the fact that Modigliani was so taken by this text in his early teens gives a good indication of his developing tastes.
_	The reason for this tribute was partly due to the fact that another Oslo youth, Omer Bhatti, Jackson's friend, was also a good friend of Hermansen.
_	He also points to the fact that the MMR vaccine scandal involved an unsubstantiated conspiracy theory about the UK government.
_	Parker also refrained from revealing the new title because of the fact that the title hadn't been leaked online.
_	In the beginning of 2017–18 season after a third difficult season marred by injury (219 days to be exact), PEC Zwolle announced Karagounis that he could continue his career elsewhere as his not in the plans of club's coach John van 't Schip, besides the fact that his contract is still in force.
_	In this, he not only changed postal services around the world, but also made commerce more efficient and profitable, notwithstanding the fact that it took 30 years before the British Post Office's revenue recovered to the level it had been at in 1839.
_	Despite the fact that everyone knows the plot, Flinn's version is well worth reading."
_	In February 2007, Săftoiu received criticism from the National Liberal Party (PNL) involving two Romanians who had been held on an American base in Iraq since the previous November; at issue was the fact that Prime Minister Călin Popescu-Tăriceanu had only learned of the situation from the news media when the story broke in February.
_	Once there, one team member had to take part in puenting, which is similar to bungee jumping except for the fact that the cord is non-elastic and that the jump ends in a pendulum-like movement.
_	Robert Ham of "Paste" gave the episode a 9.3 out of 10, stating, "At some point everyone around is going to own up to the fact that "Bob’s Burgers" is not just the best animated series on TV, but the best sitcom on network TV.
_	If the fact that it was just picked up by FOX for a sixth season wasn’t enough, this sturdy, funny, and heartfelt episode should offer up ample proof of its greatness."
_	Located in the town of Fukaura, the name means “twelve lakes” despite the fact that there are 33.
_	The origin of its name comes from the fact that the hills turns brown in the hot summer days.
_	Meron Benivasti states that the fact that the "infiltrators" were for the most part former inhabitants of the land returning for personal, economic and sentimental reasons was suppressed in Israel as it was feared that this may lead to an understanding of their motives and to the justification of their actions.
_	She qualified for the 2003 World Championships thanks to the fact that Mutola, as defending champion, received automatic entry.
_	One reason for the opposition comes from the fact that the Bureau of Indian Affairs grants tax-payer money to tribes for economic development purposes.
_	Considering the small proportion of the Spanish population in Mexico as opposed to the Indian and mixed-race casta populations and that the fact that there had been few challenges to Spanish rule since the early sixteenth-century conquest, likely meant the huge riot on June 8, 1692 was a shock to Spaniards.
_	He leaves Yoke unclassified due to lack of data, apparently referring to the fact that Donohue did not publish independent pronouns in Yoke.
_	Practical and commercial use of KAP is limited by the unpredictability of the weather (notably wind, sun and rain) and the fact that not every site is suitable to flying a kite.
_	Due to the fact that this organization incorporates informal sector employment, consisting of the least privileged women of the global South, SEWA is considered the leading transnational organization to adopt "feminism without borders" agenda.
_	"Despite the fact that the translator himself possessed no impressive literary talent, greater attention to matters of style would have eliminated many of the infelicities and made for less stilted translation.
_	This work has had a broad impact, reflected in the fact that Martin is among the most cited medical scientists in the Southern Hemisphere, with a number of citation classics including "Genes, culture and personality: An empirical approach" that he co-authored with Lindon Eaves and Hans Eysenck (cited over 600 times), "Analysis of the p16 gene (CDKN2) as a candidate for the chromosome 9p melanoma susceptibility locus" ("Nature"; cited over 460 times), and "Genetic and environmental contributions to alcohol dependence risk in a national twin sample" (cited over 400 times).
_	After the November 2015 Paris attacks, in a Press Release by the Australian National Imams Council, Mohamed made some controversial remarks that: "These recent incidents highlight the fact that current strategies to deal with the threat of terrorism are not working.
_	Nor did he mention the fact that she constantly stalked him.
_	[He] also placed pickets with orders of letting only patriots in and make them put on the distinctive [stripes]"", although his statement might be biased due to the fact that blue was one of the colours of the party he was a member of, and which would be later known as the Unitarian Party.
_	He is unaware of the fact that Daisy is in love with him, but once he realizes that he is hurting his mate Brightheart, he resolves to stay with Brightheart, and rekindles his relationship with her.
_	Although the original dispute between the two codes has now disappeared – and despite the fact that officials from both forms of rugby football have sometimes mentioned the possibility of re-unification – the rules of both codes and their culture have diverged to such an extent that such an event is unlikely in the foreseeable future.
_	A later review hinted at the fact that living individuals lay behind the principal characters of the book.
_	The scholarship of these works is evidenced by the fact that Rabbi Chaim Volozhin, known for his opposition to "digests of halacha", granted the work his approbation (on condition that each section be cross-referenced to the Shulchan Aruch to allow for further study).
_	Octavian was able to further his cause by emphasizing the fact that he was "Divi filius", "Son of God".
_	Many art historians suggest that the portrait was likely a private commission based on the print's content and the fact that it has no "kiwame-in" censor seal.
_	But we cannot but record with frustration the fact that the vigorous and perceptive attacker of the status quo in the 1930s became its emblem for a time in the late 1950s before returning to be its critic in the 1980s.
_	He also foils a coup attempt by his assistant, Geoffrey Foukes, who was trying to take advantage of the fact that Rumaan did not understand the English translation of the press briefing he was reading.
_	Most of the studies beetles are due to the fact that they are pests for many cultivations.
_	In 2015, long-term President Robert Mugabe announced that he would run for another term in 2018, and was adopted as the ZANU–PF candidate despite the fact that he would have been 94 at the time of the elections.
_	Consider the change from the days of and before the industrial evolution, when a job was held for a lifetime, to the fact that, from 1978 to 2008, individuals who aged from 18 to 44, held an average number of 11 jobs.
_	Battersby also theorizes that the controversial perception of her private life probably was related to the fact that at the time Sallé was experiencing abundant success in her choreography.
_	Aspren lived at the end of the 1st century and in the early 2nd century, as confirmed by archaeological studies regarding the early Neapolitan Church as well as the fact that "Aspren" was a common name during the days of the Roman Republic and the early years of the Roman Empire and afterwards fell into disuse.
_	Such an introduction will be complicated by the fact that, at least for some time, there will be two forms of the product in the pipeline.
_	The strike began on September 6 with about 5000 workers, the majority being women, agitating in front of the KDHPL office after the management struck down the bonus to ten percent, which was 20 percent the previous year, citing dips in profit and falling tea prices – this despite the daily wage being a mere Rs 234 for 12 hours of labour and the fact that the daily output per worker had increased to 31 kilograms from 21.
_	Undeterred by the fact that no venture capital was then available in the country, the Zisapel brothers decided to try their luck by establishing an export-oriented company in Israel to manufacture the types of devices that Bynet had been distributing.
_	Di Nola caused a stir among the more liberal fractions of Catholics when in an interview in Canada led by the Pro-Choice Pro-Women' rights group Abortion Rights Coalition of Canada ( ARCC ), when asked about if Women should be Priests he responded "That is Gay!" and further issued a statement saying that such beliefs as Women Ordination and Women' Rights can cause one to go to hell by virtue of the fact that it is a Mortal sin.
_	And I'm terribly sorry to have to say this, but the fact that we have poor people even in this kind of society means something.
_	By definition, the fact that incumbents are already in office gives them name recognition.
_	Due to the fact that Kashmiris had suffered under the Afghan rulers, they initially welcomed the Sikh rule.
_	It symbolizes the fact that "every person is looking for his drunkenness which can lead to extreme erotic games".
_	For the group who had plentiful pieces of information, this factor made them confident in their initial decision because they felt comfort from the fact that their decision topic was well-supported by a large number of resources.
_	However, the admittance to the use of photographs in Photorealism was met with intense criticism when the movement began to gain momentum in the late 1960s, despite the fact that visual devices had been used since the fifteenth century to aid artists with their work.
_	His injuries did little to help, nor did the fact that his older brother, an artillery officer, was convicted as a war criminal for having prisoners of war executed.
_	Critics add that the fact that such differing views have proliferated are a sign of the enigmatic nature of the Zoroastrian beliefs regarding the divinity.
_	The quality of horses she beat is evidenced by the fact that every one of her six stakes races wins are now Group 1 events.
_	(The join for equivalence relations is normally more difficult to define, but is simplified in this case by the fact that "a" "L" "c" and "c" "R" "b" for some "c" if and only if "a" "R" "d" and "d" "L" "b" for some "d".)
_	Slavs in response to military manpower shortages, forced it to allow Slavs to serve in its armed forces within the occupied territories in spite of the fact that they were considered "subhuman".
_	Morgan brought attention to the fact that the product contained bleach and was being illegally marketed as a "miracle" cure, which prompted a consumer warning across the European Union and earned Morgan a James Randi Award for Grassroots Activism.
_	Although considered edible, it is not particularly useful as food due to its ivy-like taste and the fact that more choice mushrooms will be easily found at the same time.
_	When the minimum A block is dropped behind and needs to be rotated into the previous B block, after which its contents are swapped into the second internal buffer for the local merges, it would be faster to swap the A block to the buffer beforehand, and to take advantage of the fact that the contents of that buffer do not need to retain any order.
_	These are known locally as the Seven Lakes, or alternatively the Salmon Leaps, despite the fact that they are used as a trout farm.
_	Russell began coaching Masonic Home in 1927, and due to the fact that his teams were often over-matched physically by other schools, they were called the "Mighty Mites".
_	Due to the fact that arrowheads varied in size from 5.5 cm (2 inches) to 15.5 cm (6 inches), there is some degree of difficulty in distinguishing between the heads of large arrows and small javelins.
_	[Those opposed to it] have no idea about the fact that they’re talking about normal people."
_	The magnitude of such precision (152 decimal places) can be put into context by the fact that the circumference of the largest known object, the observable universe, can be calculated from its diameter (93billion light-years) to a precision of less than one Planck length (at , the shortest unit of length that has real meaning) using expressed to just 62 decimal places.
_	The journey to New Mexico is fairly uneventful apart from the fact that while Willow and Alex fall in love with each other, both are oblivious to the other's feelings.
_	This common sense idea of the mind must either block out the fact that the mind is constantly processing all kinds of information below the level of awareness, or else rename that activity to some putatively "non-mental" status such as "reflex reaction" or even, sometimes, "demon possession".
_	The now largely archaic term "St. Martin's Summer" referred to the fact that in Britain people often believed there was a brief warm spell common around the time of St. Martin's Day, before the winter months began in earnest.
_	However, his indiscretion in communicating to Lincoln directly about Burnside's shortcomings, compounded by the fact that Smith was a close friend of out-of-favor Maj.
_	Despite the fact that microsurgical lumbar laminoplasty is an effective and less-invasive method for decompressing spinal nerves compared to traditional laminectomy, few surgeons have adopted it because the technique is more time consuming and requires specialized training and equipment (operating microscope).
_	Randy leads the public in speaking out against the TSA and the fact that it allowed a terrorist with a gun and a baby past a security checkpoint.
_	Though the conspiracy charge carried a maximum of six years' imprisonment, his sentencing was recommended by prosecutors as part of the plea bargain deal he reached, and decided after the government considered the fact that Lequieu was the first militant to take responsibility.
_	As has already been explained, the sheriff will proceed with the attachment notwithstanding the fact that a third-party claimant alleges ownership of the property.
_	The name skipjack shad comes from the fact that it is commonly seen leaping out of the water while feeding.
_	On 22 August 2014 the club withdrew from all competitions and ceased to operate, the reason cited were the lack of funds and the fact that the original Górnik Łęczna team went back to its original name scrapping the GKS Bogdanka name.
_	Due to these features, the Semovente da 75/18 has been regarded as the only Italian armoured fighting vehicle to be seriously feared by Allied tank crews, and despite the fact that it was originally conceived for a totally different role, the 75/18 often ended up replacing the standard M13/40.
_	In particular, he criticized the fact that the spectators were too far away from the skiers and the lack of a television screen and more scoreboards.
_	Justice Richard Mosley ruled that the information could be made public in May 2008, stating, "the fact that a foreign state paid a bounty for the apprehension of a Canadian citizen abroad and that Canadian officials were aware of it at an early state is also a matter in which the public would have a legitimate interest."
_	In retrospect, the captures of the moles Aldrich Ames and Robert Hanssen proved that Angleton, though ignored as over-aggressive, was correct, despite the fact that it cost him his job at CIA, which he left in 1975.
_	Schreierstoren is known mainly for the fact that women wept there for their husbands, who would leave from that port, to go to war, or to fish.
_	In 1940, Drewry established the George Foster Peabody Awards to address the fact that Columbia University, home of the Pulitzer Prize, did not accept radio broadcast entries.
_	This typical mammalian anatomy combined with the fact that the lungs are not emptied and re-inflated with each breath (leaving a substantial volume of air, of about 2.5-3.0 liters, in the alveoli after exhalation), ensures that the composition of the alveolar air is only minimally disturbed when the 350 ml of fresh air is mixed into it with each inhalation.
_	Other reasons why businesses have not necessarily switched over to a different alternative chemical in lieu of the toxic one could be a lack of knowledge that an alternative exists or the fact that the alternative may not have been created yet.
_	Ewatski announced his plans to retire in 2007 based on the fact that he has served for 34 years, and has entered a milestone in his life; the age of 55.
_	"Could Have Been" was released as a demo tape and discovered by MTV despite the fact that no video was created for the song.
_	This is very doubtful though, due to the fact that there are no trailers, or a cast that has been announced.
_	Due to the fact that Ferdinand was also the name of the disputed King of Spain at the time, it was deemed that the new parish should have a more "American" sounding name.
_	But the finiteness of each of them is due to the fact that it is restrained or hedged in, so to say, by other finite modes.
_	A practical problem which may arise is that the annual dose limit is apparently exceeded by virtue of the fact that one is taking account, in the first year, of doses which will actually be received only in the following years.
_	The situation was worsened by the fact that the hat included a leather cockade, made from cow hide.
_	In this situation, solidarity in society comes from the fact that people need the contribution of an increasing number of other people in order to function, and even to survive.
_	In the Commission's view, given the unprecedented nature of the relief sought in the Application and the serious and fundamental issues it raises, as well as the fact that the specific approval is being sought in favour of Canadian carriers without notice to such carriers, it would be inappropriate to consider granting the interim relief sought in the Application on an ex parte basis, and in particular without affording Canadian carriers and all other interested parties the opportunity to comment.
_	However the fact that all of the county councils were controlled at the time by the opposition Labour Party led to accusations that their abolition was motivated by party politics: the general secretary of NALGO described it as a "completely cynical manoeuvre".
_	Four reasons were stated as to why it was pulled-out: Three are aspects of the movie: the priest portrayed in a villainous light, the use of a hypodermic needle as a murder weapon, the amorous scenes between a 10-year-old couple, and the fact that "“[the film] might give [the] youth certain subversive ideas.”"
_	The large quantity of stycas produced, combined with the fact that large numbers of stycas are clearly of unofficial creation, might suggest a reason as to why production was halted in the reign of Osberht of Northumbria.
_	It is also common for American coins to be found among circulation due to the close proximity to the United States and the fact that the sizes of the coins are similar.
_	Part of the problem could probably be ascribed to the fact that the exhaust steam from the rear power unit contributed nothing to the smokebox draught, the same phenomenon which would, half a century later, necessitate the installation of induced draught equipment on South Africa’s Class 25 condensing locomotives.
_	"We do not know the charges against him, but the fact that he is held in Evin without bail option is very serious.
_	"We have to emphasize the fact that the idea of an economic boycott of Jews, put forward by the National Democracy, was embraced by the local peasantry, which feels hatred towards the Jews (...)
_	Del. Kemper defended his men with the fact that the range did not allow their fire to accurately disable the Marblehead.
_	The public received it with great enthusiasm, despite the fact that it had ignored all the traditional elements of box office attraction.
_	Kept hidden from them was the fact that the two housemates with the most votes, Anna and Camilla, were not evicted; but were sent to the "Revenge Room" to secretly cause havoc on the house.
_	UK soap operas do not incorporate recap sequences at the beginning of each episode, which would be appropriate for the fact that when an episode ends, it picks up the story during the following episode.
_	McClelland somewhat-jokingly told Schneider that he thought that "”they’re very" fair "judges” ", referring to the fact that he was the only African-American in the studio – and that may have swayed the judges’ scores.
_	This is despite the fact that the foreigners represent only about 1.22% of the total population in Japan.
_	They contemplate the fact that Nian and Quinth would probably be transferred to another Weyr.
_	Considering the relatively high presence of demonstrations on the Berkeley campus in its history, and the fact that it had already been the site of the largest student demonstration in the United States, it provided a perfect site to nurture the Berkeley riots.
_	The fact that EMD is, or contributes to, a super theory, is related to the fact that EMD violates the positivity condition, mentioned above.
_	This may be explained by the fact that the Russian Orthodox Church introduced its own lovers’ day in 2008.
_	This was also due to the fact that most of the U.S. population lived east of the Mississippi River prior to 1900, while most of the animals used to produce the meat it consumed were raised west of it, thus making St. Louis a logical place for the interchange between supply and demand in the meat market.
_	This distinction is motivated by the fact that duration is the only element shared by both silence and sound.
_	House over the fact that House stole one of his prescription pads and faked his signature in order to get more Vicodin, and tells
_	"All sections must derive confidence from the fact that even at the height of our movement (for statehood), no individual, family or institution was harmed or alienated.
_	"[T]his could be more a result of the fact that far fewer movies used to be released then, so it took less to sway the average," Raymond noted.
_	The Catholic faction argued that his consecration by 12 priests was irregular, from the fact that his consecration as a Bishop is said to have been regularized by Gregorios Abdal Jaleel ( a delegate of the Patriarch of Antioch), in the year AD 1665, but the place and date yet anonymous.
_	However, despite the fact that he was also credited with "celebrat[ing] the band's innumerable musical accomplishments", Cole's book was criticised by members of Led Zeppelin, who accused him of fabrication and dishonesty.
_	Although few actively joined the rioting, many officers were either shot or went into hiding; the ability of the garrison to hold back the protests was all but nullified, symbols of the Tsarist regime were rapidly torn down around the city, and governmental authority in the capital collapsed – not helped by the fact that Nicholas had prorogued the Duma that morning, leaving it with no legal authority to act.
_	He made this separation based on the fact that classifiers were semantically bleached, and that they can be used directly with a number, whereas true nouns need to have a measure word added before they can be used with a number.
_	Pro20 cricket's first outing came at the end of the 2003–04 season, and Bosman – who was now part of the Eagles team under the new franchise system – topped the batting charts with 219 runs at a strike-rate of 120.99 and a high score of 84* despite the fact that he was asked to bat in the middle order.
_	Despite the fact that the film was seminal to gathering support from other Arab countries against the French, the film was banned in Algeria both under French occupation and post-independence.
_	This is suggested by the fact that the word for "man", for example, is spelled as or .
_	The building is unique for its outstanding white vertical fins and the fact that it curves outward on the bottom.
_	Although no copy of Q has ever been discovered, the fact that Thomas is similarly a 'sayings' Gospel is viewed by some scholars as an indication that the early Christians did write collections of the sayings of Jesus, bolstering the Q hypothesis.
_	Anthony Cedric Vuagniaux has been many times introduced as an "ovni", a "musical autist" of cinematography and electronic music, also as the Ennio Morricone, François de Roubaix, Henry Mancini, Jean-Jacques Perrey, John Barry's dignified legacy, by the fact that he writes, plays, records, mixes and masters himself all his compositions in his studio saturated with curious and rare musical instruments of all ethnicities, synthesizers, organs and old analog tape recorders.
_	His advanced graphics, as well as the fact that it is entirely original (as all the work was made from scratch by Reuben), place it in a small category of M.U.G.E.N works, as the majority are from edited commercial games.
_	The station adopted the "UPN Indiana" branding in September 2003, dropping on-air references to its channel 23 allocation; this was done partly due to the fact that most cable providers in the Indianapolis market carry WNDY on channel 10.
_	It was reported that the "UPN Indy" moniker was ditched in favor of "UPN Indiana" at the last minute to appeal to the larger audience across the state rather than just those living in the Indianapolis area, along with the fact that the Indianapolis Motor Speedway had stopped allowing the station to use the trademarked word "Indy".
_	Another important factor in the defeat of the British force was the fact that Cartagena's defensive fortifications had been repaired and improved over the past year.
_	In grateful recognition of the fact that Edward A. Filene is the Friedrich Wilhelm Raiffeisen of America – that he first brought cooperative credit to the United States – that he created in 1921 and financed from 1921 to 1934 the Credit Union National Extension Bureau in order that there might be a sustained development of cooperative credit in our country – in free acknowledgement of the unique debt which we and succeeding generations of credit union members owe and will always owe him – we make a part of these our By-laws, not subject at any time to amendment, this acknowledgement – and we create the office of Founder of this Association and name Edward A. Filene to that office for life.
_	Because the Ottomans did not want conflict against the European nations and because Germany was being brown nosed for assistance by the Ottoman Empire, an order imploring Chinese Muslims to avoid assisting the Boxers was issued by the Ottoman Khalifa and reprinted in Egyptian and Indian Muslim newspapers in spite of the fact that the predicament the British found themselves in the Boxer Rebellion was gratifying to Indian Muslims and Egyptians.
_	Both of Margherita's two daughters married their cousins, who were Henry's successors due to the fact that Margherita had not given him a son to inherit his estates.
_	His worship would no doubt have taken into consideration the fact that it blesseth him that gives and him that takes and becomes the throned monarch better than his crown.
_	The titles Monck and Albemarle referred to the fact that the 1st Earl of Bath had been granted reversion of his cousin Monck's Dukedom of Albemarle, should the Duke have died without male progeny.
_	They want to have children but Ed is infertile, and they cannot adopt because of Hi's criminal record, despite the fact that Ed is a police officer.
_	However, the fact that Thomas Lyon-Bowes, as a child who died in infancy, has no individual gravestone is in keeping with the funeral customs of the time, when – owing to high rates of infant mortality – usually only adults were commemorated in this way.
_	This is possibly due to the fact that education and advancement in transportation has meant people can find better more high paying jobs than they could in 1881.
_	These observations are explained by the fact that cetalkonium chloride present in oil-in-water emulsions is bound to the oil nanodroplets therefore sequestered from the water phase and not available to cause damages to ocular tissues.
_	Example (4) is a statement that holds of the cat species as a whole; in other words, "The cat species is common" (4), and this despite the fact that there is no single individual cat that has the attribute of being "common".
_	They held that the fact that section 29 might hinder Quebec's efforts to create their own registry was insufficient to make out colourable legislation.
_	Bismarck, already jealous of British influence at court, honoured Morier with a hatred not lessened by the fact that Morier's knowledge of German politics was unrivalled outside Germany.
_	The sense of inevitability and predestination (the narrator often mentions the fact that Odilo can't commit suicide and has no choice but to follow through) further strengthens the significance of the alternative title.
_	The preeminence of superalloys is reflected in the fact that they currently comprise over 50% of the weight of advanced aircraft engines.
_	The widespread use of superalloys in turbine engines coupled with the fact that the thermodynamic efficiency of turbine engines is increased with increasing turbine inlet temperatures has, in part, provided the motivation for increasing the maximum-use temperature of superalloys.
_	This in spite of the fact that the spot offers neither an attractive view nor any rest-stops or amenities.
_	This, as well as the fact that his actions were seen by many as usurpation of the power that he was not entitled to, being a deputy of imprisoned Metropolitan Peter (Polyansky) (according to the XXXIV Apostolic canon), solidified the already existing split with the Russian Orthodox Church Outside of Russia abroad and provoked another split with the Russian True Orthodox Church (Russian Catacomb Church) within the Soviet Union.
_	This was despite the fact that Hughes oversaw an upturn in the team's fortunes but was unable to save them from the drop.
_	His war experiences, especially the fact that diseases affected the natives and the Europeans differently, led him to believe that mapping of the medical features of the empire in much the same way as topography was critical for military and economic development.
_	He won the Victoria Cross for his actions on 14 October 1915 when he held a barrier across a trench in the Hohenzollern Redoubt, France against heavy German bomb attacks (the 'bombs' of the citation were early grenades) ordering a second barrier to be built behind him in order to secure the safety of the trench regardless of the fact that his own retreat would be cut off holding back the enemy for long enough for a second barrier to be completed.
_	The advantage of G theory lies in the fact that researchers can estimate what proportion of the total variance in the results is due to the individual factors that often vary in assessment, such as setting, time, items, and raters.
_	Amnesia and Hubert return with Sister Julia, Child of God's cookbook and put on a short cooking show segment, which is interrupted by the fact that the book is full of misprints and innuendos.
_	In another twist for this series, due to the fact that the chefs are cooking for the WI, the judges revealed that only "perfect dishes" will make the shortlist, and unlike the mandatory 3 in the previous series, for some courses, there might be more or less than that.
_	Some point to the fact that one of the Sarbadar rulers, Vajih al-Din Mas'ud, produced a son who also eventually reigned, named Lutf Allah.
_	Greyton owes much of its charm to the fact that its Cape Vernacular architectural heritage has remained largely intact.
_	In April 1936, he and the Minister of the Interior Ion Inculeț allowed the a youth congress to gather in Târgu Mureș, aware of the fact that it was masking a fascist gathering; delegates to the congress, traveling in a special train commissioned by the government, vandalized Ion Duca's memorial plate in Sinaia train station, and, upon their arrival in Târgu Mureș, made public their violent anti-Semitic agenda.
_	He also threw light on the fact that though Indians have significantly contributed to the research and innovation successes at Silicon Valley (California), they have not played such a major role in research activities in the Indus Valley (India), and advised the students to work towards a career of innovation.
_	Concerns include the fact that all forms of media have the power to shape the population's perceptions and portray images of unrealistic stereotypical perceptions by portraying women either as submissive housewives or as sex objects.
_	As Bunin scholar V. Lavrov pointed out, so carried away was the critic with his stream of irony that the fact that the whole totaled up to 101% somehow eluded his attention.
_	This was in contrast to the fact that the candidate of the MDC polled an overall majority.
_	Nine months later the club sacked him, mainly due to the fact that the team was not improving.
_	Confusion arose in the Allied squadron over the way forward, compounded by the fact that HMS "Exeter" could only sail at half power and wanted to return to port at Soerabaja or now day Surabaya on its own steam.
_	Though both he and his all-powerful minister, Maximilian von Montgelas sympathized more with France than Austria, the state of the Bavarian finances and the fact that the Bavarian troops were scattered and disorganized placed him helpless in the hands of Austria.
_	Another major drawback to greater E85 fuel use is the fact that by June 2008 Canada had only three public E85 pumps, all located in Ontario, in the cities of Guelph, Chatham, and Woodstock.
_	It is, however, the fact that the NLP is easier to solve than the boundary-value problem.
_	Most critics praised the fact that the games introduced new features while still maintaining the traditional gameplay of the series.
_	Her engagement with Syaoran was omitted along with the fact that she and Syaoran were cousins.
_	The influence of the electronic configuration on acidity is shown by the fact that [Ru(HO)] (pK = 2.7) is more acidic than [Rh(HO)] (pK =4), despite the fact that Rh(III) is expected to be more electronegative.
_	This plan, and particularly the fact that exceptions would not be made for the CBC's highly rated newscasts in Newfoundland and Labrador and Prince Edward Island, led to protests across the country, and most strongly in those two markets.
_	Czech-style hot dogs are differentiated by the fact that rather than slicing the bun in half and placing the sausage into the resultant cleavage, the top of the bun (rohlík) is cut off, with a hole punched into the softer inside of the bun where condiments and then the sausage is placed, similar to the Ketwurst.
_	Avril is show to be sexually ambiguous and tries to have sex with husband Jackson (Emmanuel Ighodaro) regularly, most of the time to keep hidden the fact that she is sending daughter Letitia (Kira Martin) to a private school, a secret that would devastate her husband.
_	The name Chameleon comes from the fact that the machine was able to change its "skins", which are different sound engines.
_	The view was possibly promoted by the fact that during Khufu's lifetime, permission for the creation of oversized statues made of precious stone and their displaying in public was limited to the king only.
_	(Kyo was then called the Demon Child due to the unknown manner of his birth and the fact that as soon as he was born, the Mibu stopped being able to have children.)
_	On the other hand, the fact that Somairle and Muirchertach jostled over ecclesiastical affairs in the 1160s suggests that these two were in fact rivals.
_	Furthermore, the fact that Þorfinnr may have been related to a previous King of Dublin could reveal that Þorfinnr himself was opposed to Muirchertach's foreign overlordship.
_	She opined that the disbelief Danielle was faced with was "heartbreaking" and served to highlight the fact that "she came as the outsider and she still is the outsider because no one steps in to help her".
_	He rejects theoretical or conceptual models; in fact he dislike the fact that the description of anything has to fit in some kind of a framework.
_	He also brings to attention the fact that "Seneca avoids any direct allusion to Cordus's alleged Republican sympathies, whatever their true character may have been."
_	Residents elsewhere in Midi-Pyrénées at times complain of the overwhelming weight of Toulouse inside the region, and they resent the fact that so much is done for Toulouse by the regional council, turning the Midi-Pyrénées region into a "Region of Toulouse".
_	This latter area derived its name from the fact that, being close to Greece, it was influenced by the Greeks.
_	This is related to the fact that 1/"n"!
_	"Bukidnon" means 'that of the mountains or highlands' (i.e., 'people of the mountains or highlands'), despite the fact that most Bukidnon tribes settle in the lowlands.
_	However, Dunne also notes the fact that Homer himself sings "his objection that musicals are fake and phony".
_	Making the win even sweeter was the fact that it was a KHI 1-2 finish with new teammate Jack Sprague close behind.
_	Golwalkar later openly admitted to the fact that the RSS did not participate in the Quit India Movement.
_	In addition the fact that the route is 3 km longer than Option 1, that most freight traffic comes from the west, and the route requires trucks to negotiate slopes down into the Waurn Ponds Valley and then back out again means the additional cost to users is around $10 million per annum.
_	Their camera shots certainly highlighted the fact that these sisters are identical twins, but they were certainly allowed to shine on their own in solo shots.
_	National minority parties, such as the SSW, which last ran for parliamentary election in 1961, are now freed from the election threshold due to the fact that under Constitutional Law it is imperative that minorities are protected.
_	Glückel notes that her mother's age at widowhood was forty-four and remarks on the fact that she never remarried.
_	Due to the fact that the journalists and activists criticize the ruling government, some media organizations' licenses are canceled.
_	For example, Gorgon dismisses Reed Richards as simply the equivalent of a parrot that can mimic a human voice, despite the fact that Gorgon was actually impressed by Richards' ideas on the plans, simply because Richards is not a mutant.
_	Despite the fact that over two-thirds of the Earth's surface is covered with water, only 1% of it is potable.
_	Despite the fact that Mapledurham village is closer, as the crow flies, to central Reading than some of that town's suburbs, it remains a remote and rural location.
_	He points out that the fact that "Christians will remit thousands of pounds annually for the maintenance of a Christian settlement is a challenge to the Jews who neglect to provide for the beloved sons of Zion."
_	His performance was erratic, evidenced by the fact that he only made 64.3% of his field goals, converting 18 out of 28 opportunities.
_	Protesters accused the Romanian media of a media blackout, claiming that this was due to the fact that Gabriel Resources paid large sums of money in advertising throughout the years.
_	Otto Brunfels (c. 1489–1534), Leonhart Fuchs (1501–1566) and Hieronymus Bock (1498–1554) were known as the "German fathers of botany" although this title belies the fact that they trod in the steps of the scientifically feted Hildegard of Bingen whose writings on herbalism were "Physica" and "Causae et Curae" (together known as "Liber subtilatum") of 1150.
_	While Latrell is upset that Marcus is a man, his primary anger stems from the fact that Marcus is black, not that he is a man.
_	Met with heavy jeers at Rio Tinto, Davies successfully bagged the match tying goal, in spite of the fact that Salt Lake's goalkeeper, a former United player, Nick Rimando, guessed the correct way.
_	This traffic was added to by the fact that most towns also had their own gasworks, with coal delivered by rail to their own private sidings, and the rapidly developing domestic use of coal for heating and cooking.
_	He was mostly jealous when Faarah and Wali were together and hated the fact that they are married.
_	Johanan's comment is supported by the fact that Jose was known as one who occupied himself with Jewish chronology; further, many sayings of R. Jose's quoted in the Talmud are paralleled in the "Seder Olam.
_	Czechoslovak reaction to Remek's flight included comments about the media's inundation focused on Remek and the fact that he was only able to journey with a Soviet cosmonaut as if Remek needed a minder.
_	Though much has been made of the fact that the Republic decidedly came off second best (the taunt by the French negotiator, Melchior de Polignac, ""De vous, chez vous, sans vous"", meaning that the Peace Congress had decided over the Dutch interests in their own country, but without them, still rankles), they actually attained most of their war aims: the desired codominion over the Austrian Netherlands, and the Barrier of fortresses in that country, were attained under the Austro-Dutch Treaty of November, 1715 (France already having acquiesced at Utrecht), though the Dutch, due to British obstruction, did not gain all they had hoped for.
_	Substantial variations between annual (AADT) and summer (ASDT) traffic volumes are attributed to the fact that the road serves as an approach to the Croatian A6 motorway carrying considerable tourist traffic.
_	Art director Brian McEntee suggested that Belle be the only character in her village to wear blue in order emphasize the fact that she is different and an outcast.
_	It took Syed a while to admit the fact that he could no longer reconcile his understanding of science with the claims of Islam.
_	They argue that Hofstadter's misunderstandings include the fact that the Populists were not simply incipient capitalists trying to reform but instead forward-looking radicals, who sought a democratized industrial system and a transformation of social values in order to help the individual protect his humanity as his autonomy slipped away from him in a rapidly industrializing society.
_	The catena-based approach, however, does not account for the locality facts; since catenae can span multiple clauses, the fact that multiply-sluiced wh-phrases must be clausemates is a mystery.
_	That beaver were once native to the area is supported by the fact that the Washo have a word for beaver, "c'imhélhel" and the northern Paiute of Walker Lake, Honey Lake and Pyramid Lake have a word for beaver "su-i'-tu-ti-kut'-teh".
_	The free Riemann gas has a number of other interesting connections to number theory, including the fact that the partition function is the Riemann zeta function.
_	Due to these design elements, and the fact that Cameron Offices was staffed by public servants re-located from the more central government precinct in Parkes into what many saw as a back-water, the Cameron Offices were unpopular with many of the public servants who worked in the buildings.
_	He acknowledges the fact that many people are actually opposed to the term and that the media has arbitrary and whimsically imposed Hispanic and Latino as absolute and monolithic ethnic groups:
_	The women in the novel, meanwhile, are obedient, quiet, and absent from positions of authority – despite the fact that Igbo women were traditionally involved in village leadership.
_	As he strikes out his opponents one after the other, he soon becomes aware of the fact that he has held the Yankees at bay thus far, not allowing one hit from the more talented Yankees team.
_	His concerns mainly entered on the fact that the majority of the managers who followed the decision did so out of loyalty to Woolworth, and that moving such a valuable resource already established in the United States to what was a financially unproven "Little Infant" in the UK would have a detrimental effect upon the "Bread and Butter" of the Company.
_	It received mixed reviews, with criticism for the formulaic nature of the plot and the fact that elements remained unresolved or were predictable, but also praise for the visual effects, action sequences and acting performances.
_	Instead, we must accept the fact that the gifts were supposed to continue as a confirmation of sound doctrine until Christ's return but were lost as the Church deviated from that sound doctrine given by Christ to the apostles and by the apostles to the early Church of the first few centuries".
_	Readers have been misled by the fact that Pound assigns to every poem a title or, alternatively, a number.
_	He has worked under the pseudonyms "Mark Davis", "Jimmy Johnson", "Michael Korgen", from the fact that since the late 1970s, many foreign artists have been hired on TV CMs, and because he wanted to show he had a foreign style in some ways.
_	Then there's the fact that they get along really well together".
_	Despite the fact that Hyde mentions God (such as stating his hair was a gift from God in "Eric's Hot Cousin",) he does not express any sort of organized religious affiliation.
_	Because of the line-up changes since the recording of "Metridium Field", and the fact that the hard drive containing the original session files for the album had locked up and thus made remixing the record impossible (which the band felt it needed before a worldwide release), Giant Squid decided to rerecord the entire album to reflect their progression in sound and songwriting.
_	Despite the fact that commercial stations (such as Sky Sports) have acquired the vast majority of sports television broadcasting rights in the UK, the BBC remains dominant in radio sport with BBC Radio 5 Live and its local radio stations.
_	According to the Treaty, the Ottoman Empire ceded the eastern half of Moldavia (which became known as Bessarabia) to Russia, despite the fact that Moldavia was supposed to be protected.
_	The case was originally brought up due to the fact that the German Federal Police identified and reported to U.S. authorities Kutzner's IP address as one where a known file containing actual child pornography was being shared.
_	The issue of statistical power in multilevel models is complicated by the fact that power varies as a function of effect size and intraclass correlations, it differs for fixed effects versus random effects, and it changes depending on the number of groups and the number of individual observations per group.
_	Despite the fact that the city's charters over the decadesthe Dongan Charter (1686), the Cornbury Charter (1708) and the Montgomerie Charter (1731)supported by specific laws passed by the province or state in 1741, 1751, 1754, 1764, 1774 and 1787, gave the city's Common Council full powers over the creation of new streets, the Council rarely did so, independent of the actions of the various landowners who developed their property and ran streets through their projects as they saw fit, which were approved after the fact by the Council.
_	Rugby caught on slowly but surely with the local population, thanks to HKRFU's constantly improving development programme, and the fact that many more local Chinese had played whilst in overseas education, and simply because rugby has been widely recognised as an excellent game to play.
_	The aversion against opaque paint had its origin in the fact that well into the nineteenth century lead white was used to increase the covering quality, which pigment tended to soon discolor into black under the influence of sulphurous air pollution, totally ruining the artwork.
_	In the Stern TV interview it was revealed because of what had been done to the band and the fact that the producers and manager used them the contract was null and void..
_	These proposals stem from the fact that the granite burial vault is much too small to have facilitated an actual burial.
_	Due to the fact that Kallø keeps their products natural and organic, they do not use artificial additives or MSG.
_	Special complications resulted from the fact that each Russian air army implemented its own signal procedures and cryptography standards, that according to the ability of the individual Russian signals officers, making it either more or less difficult for the Luftwaffe Chi-Stelle.
_	Kirkus questioned some of Jarnow's conclusions about the influence of psychedelic culture, while reiterating the book's writing style and entertaining history: "Though Jarnow is sometimes unduly celebratory and sometimes begs credulity—is the fact that we use emoji on our mobile phones really evidence that the psychedelic revolution carried the day?
_	Etta is madly in love with Kennit and oblivious to the fact that he is all but incapable of returning her sentiments.
_	Subsequent studies, also by Senter, have continued to show support for this finding despite the fact that some data used in the original study was later found to be flawed.
_	Increasingly, Jameson became frustrated and disillusioned with the fact that he had never received any financial rewards from his music.
_	The politically correct term for those discriminated against is "visible minority" ("minorité visible"), due to the fact that the segregation applies to any visible feature (color of skin, dress, name) and is not related to the ethnic group itself.
_	Their guilt is only assuaged by the fact that they are getting back at their cheating spouses.
_	The common ground lay in the fact that officers men were drawn largely from agricultural communities.
_	This can be captured by the fact that computing a correlated equilibrium only requires solving a linear program whereas solving a Nash equilibrium requires finding its fixed point completely.
_	Some minerals like creedite form prismatic crystals that appear to be acicular, but are instead prismatic in a bladelike form; these can be told apart by the fact that all prismatic crystals are less sharp, sometimes are tipped with a pyramidal shape, and keep a standard cross-section shape with straight edges.
_	In the song, M'bilia Bel praises her husband as being handsome and successful and stresses the fact that even though he has the opportunity to choose from any of Kinshasa's beautiful women, he chose her.
_	This was exacerbated by the fact that all affiliated groups, known as "kindreds", were autonomous, while the AFA promoted an individualistic ethos which allowed for a diversity of opinions.
_	Much of the criticism of some of Twelve South's products has been reduced by the fact that the products are very flexible and will be usable even with a variety of products and cases on the products, one such example of this is the HiRise for iPhone and iPad Mini which will work with an iPhone 5 or iPad Mini without any case up to cases including those that are waterproof.
_	A standard order is often called "ascending" (corresponding to the fact that the standard order of numbers is ascending, i.e. A to Z, 0 to 9), the reverse order "descending" (Z to A, 9 to 0).
_	The letter also criticized the fact that “ASA Members were provided only the resolution and a link to a website supporting it.
_	Her election was particularly meaningful to the city's GLBT community, given the fact that conservative organizations attacked her on the basis of her sexual orientation during the campaign.
_	The political popularity of minimum wages stems in part from the fact that the policy offers a means for redistributing income without having to increase government spending or establish formal transfer mechanisms.
_	Class told, and this country's face was saved, to an extent by the fact that the England selectors had in one case out of the four selections, ignored the Brooklands' [selection race] results and chosen a man whom, all the country had known for two years, had the class necessary to remain with the leaders.
_	In response to the claim that uses have been found for "junk" DNA, proponents note that the fact that some non-coding DNA has a purpose does not establish that all non-coding DNA has a purpose, and that the human genome does include pseudogenes that are nonfunctional "junk", with others noting that some sections of DNA can be randomized, cut, or added to with no apparent effect on the organism in question.
_	The anonymous hoaxers who created the article, according to the press calling themselves "The Batuta Army" (pl. "Armia Batuty"), allegedly wanted to draw attention to the fact that there are still places in Poland named after former communist officials who "do not deserve the honour".
_	The Cleveland Browns are considered to have a less of a positive economic impact on the city, both due to the fact that they only play 8 games in the stadium a year, far less than the Cavs and Indians, and because of their poor playing.
_	Despite the fact that he opposed secular treatment modalities — psychiatry and psychology — his followers espoused them and even trained in the treatment of sexual disorders.
_	However, that this wasn't a real show is obvious in the fact that at the end of "Popular", Elphaba is still seen on stage next to Glinda when she is supposed to have left, as well as Glinda's bubble (with Henry and Betty on it) moving during "Defying Gravity" as the bubble isn't used at all during that number.
_	After hearing this, they kept the fact that they had developed similar powers from their parents before Garth, thinking that the lightning had corrupted Mekt somehow and would soon corrupt them and refusing to believe that Mekt had developed into a sociopath just because he had been a "solo" on a world of twins, ran away from home to find Mekt (telling his parents he was going to visit his Aunt Ryth), despite Ayla's attempts to dissuade him.
_	The six secretary system is explained by the fact that the government of Joseon was composed of six Boards (or Ministries).
_	Meanwhile, eldest son Yuguo (Zheng Geping) and his wife (Lin Meijiao) have to reconcile the fact that the latter is retrenched.
_	And this is notwithstanding the fact that her style of singing embraces many possible elements: you can discern in it both soul music and jazz, new wave, and even African griots.
_	The fact that the Polish national poem begins with the words "O Lithuania" largely stems from the fact that the 19th-century concept of nationality had not yet been geopoliticized in his time.
_	Pro-bono services in Uganda are premised on the fact that a significant proportion of the Ugandan population lives in abject poverty.
_	This album was different from its predecessors in the fact that it expanded the musical aspect and explored the band’s maturity and potential to compose and record music.
_	Curiously enough, the decree which may save the American manufacturers from ruin and the air service for dependence on foreign airplanes was based upon the fact that the airplane in its present form is strictly an American invention.
_	Years later, he started adapting more power moves and started focusing more on grappling and telling a story in the ring; part of this change was due to the fact that Liger had to reduce the stress he was putting on his body after undergoing brain tumor surgery in August 1996, which explained why he lost his match to Último Dragón in the first round of the J-Crown tournament.
_	In 1943, he joined the Communist Party due to his anti-fascism and the fact that the USSR was by that time a member of Allied Forces in World War II.
_	The 2010 P&C songs were three in number, due to the fact that the arrival of the Parliament deputies happened before the parade, and were unique because all the songs sung were in English (one song even had lyrics in the 3 other major languages).
_	"I dig the fact that he kicked off a run of billionaire playboys who decided to put on a mask and fight crime and that he was Batman before there was a Batman," Smith said.
_	Alan Clayson bristles at the omnipresence of the Oklahoman singer and musician – "the epitome of the self-satisfied sexism of the Delaney and Bonnie super-sidemen", Clayson writes – and the fact that his turn in the spotlight so blatantly became "The Leon Russell Show".
_	"It just revitalized so many of us, from the fact that [it showed] what we can be", said John Chaney, the former longtime Temple University basketball coach who, in 1948, was a teenager in deeply segregated Jacksonville, Florida.
_	It was in that year when the team fell back to the level of district championships in which the team of Gabčíkovo played football matches between the years of 1961 and 1968 under the name of “Družstevník” (“Cooperator”), despite the fact that this their “godfather” was unable to support them...
_	Cold holes exploit the fact that cold air is denser, which makes hot air rise.
_	An additional intensity to the rivalry is the fact that both Maribor and Olimpija always had support on their matches from ultras groups, called Viole Maribor (supporting Maribor), and the Green Dragons, who support Olimpija.
_	The impetus for the creation of the Academy arose from the fact that only members of the Church of England were given places at ancient universities.
_	The people ignore the fact that the orphans have solid alibis and the children are quickly locked up inside the Deluxe Cell in the prison, prior to being burnt at the stake the following day for breaking the town rules.
_	Sue Bradford said that the fact that Copeland did not disclose that his Queen's Counsel, Peter McKenzie, had previously represented Christian organisations like Right to Life New Zealand and the Society for Promotion of Community Standards undermined the opinion.
_	Said of it: "While one may not agree on its historicity, one can't dismiss the fact that the Union Carbide building is unique, both structurally and aesthetically.
_	This is further illustrated by the fact that both "Ramilles" and "Royal Sovereign" were given partial modernization, radar enhancements and augmentation of their anti-aircraft weapons during 1942 and 1943, while the other two sisters had been withdrawn from service by the end of 1943 and placed into reserve, with the subsequent removal of their 15-inch main batteries.
_	Manson-Guise engines seem to be fairly unique in the fact that they can run in either direction (flywheel can run clockwise or anti-clockwise).
_	The squadron gained the nickname "105th Light Attack and Twilight Pursuit Squadron" during the Vietnam War. "Twilight Pursuit" was a tongue-in-cheek reference to the fact that squadron aircraft carried the air-air AIM-9 Sidewinder missile.
_	The difficulty in correctly identifying the source of the fossil lies in the fact that the log of the "Fly" does not record it.
_	Models of the pulvinar projections to the visual cortex have been proposed by several imaging studies, though the mapping of pulvinar projections has been a difficult task due to the fact that pulvinar subdivisions are not conventionally organized and have been difficult to visualize using structural MRI.
_	For turn into a contender he had to play a first game against the champion where his superiority was attributed to the fact that he was able to play with both hands while Azcárate was only able to play with one.
_	In 1908, despite the fact that Hallam declined owing to rheumatism in his right shoulder, Wass remained at his best and took sixteen for 103 in a day against Essex.
_	More infuriating for Iran was the fact that
_	It reasoned that: (1) a significant private interest was affected considering the length of the retention and given that vehicles are "often central to a person's livelihood or daily activities"; (2) the risk of erroneous deprivation was great considering that NYPD’s pecuniary interest and the fact that no compensation was paid for the depreciation and replacement costs of vehicles erroneously held; and (3) the Government’s interest in the vehicles not being sold or destroyed pending the forfeiture proceeding could be satisfied by "less drastic measures than continued impoundment," including bond or a restraining order.
_	Virtually all the buildings in Birkastaden are Art Nouveau, a result of both the brief construction period and the fact that some 50 buildings were designed by architects Dorph & Höög, at the time the largest architectural practice in Northern Europe.
_	However, some new evidence, especially those made by Dr. Dimitrie Roman, bring up to light a document which indicates the fact that a group of houses were certainly located on the border of the village from 159 BC.
_	He then quotes Mark Akenside (1744), William Wordsworth (1805) and Jane Austen (1816) on their uses of the word 'culture' to make clear the fact that "culture was developing in English towards some of its modern senses before the decisive effects of a new social and intellectual movement".
_	Oliva has stated however that he was saddened about the success of the record, citing the fact that the same song was released by both bands, yet TSO's rendition became a bigger hit.
_	In the summer, the island's population grows to about 200, despite the fact that it is the only year-round inhabited island in Casco Bay with no paved roads.
_	Restricted by the fact that the algorithms are second-order methods and need to store and factorize a large (and often dense) matrix.
_	Despite the fact that ethnic Turks constitute only 8 percent of the total population, they form 9.7 percent of all people under twenty years old and just 5 percent among all people that are aged sixty years or over.
_	Her aircraft capacity was also changed based on previous wartime experience and the fact that "Taihō" was expected to carry larger newer-model carrier planes still under development at the time of her construction: 24 Mitsubishi A7M2 "Reppu" "Sam" fighters, 25 Aichi B7A2 "Ryusei" "Grace" torpedo bombers and four Nakajima C6N1 "Saiun" "Myrt" reconnaissance planes.
_	It had the Horstmann coil-spring suspension system, which was found to be durable and reliable, although the fact that the tank was short in relation to its width and that it pitched violently on rough ground made accurate gunnery whilst moving exceptionally difficult.
_	This relationship is due mostly to the fact that one of Nike's founders was OTC founder Bill Bowerman.
_	The club is notable for now being the 3rd oldest amongst modern British university ice hockey programmes (having been founded in 1994) and for the fact that it was the first to introduce mixed gender participation into a full-contact university sport.
_	Cotes missed the fact that a complex logarithm can have infinitely many values, differing by multiples of , due to the periodicity of the trigonometric functions.
_	The reversibility of this interaction and the fact that it is performed at low temperatures is the reason for the successful isolation and characterization of functional T cells.
_	She appeared in a number of MGM musicals, most notably "Cabin in the Sky" (1943), but was never featured in a leading role because of her race and the fact that her films had to be re-edited for showing in cities where theaters would not show films with black performers.
_	Despite the fact that he took the job of mayor primarily for its economic benefits, he eventually dedicated himself sincerely to the duties of mayor, including setting up defenses for Fabletown against the Adversary and, in the "Happily Ever After" arc, giving Bigby Wolf land next to the farm in order to live with his new wife, Snow White, and their children.
_	The spots derive their name from the fact that they were once incorrectly believed to be caused by liver problems, but they are physiologically unrelated to the liver, save for a similar color.
_	Though Pausanias (Bk. I., xxii. 6) speaks of the pictures "which time had not effaced," which seems to point to fresco painting, the fact that there is no trace of preparation for stucco on the walls shows that the paintings were easel pictures (J. G. Frazer, "Pausanias's Description of Greece", 1898, ii. 252).
_	PTB dealt with this controversial subject from 1977 to 1989, above all due to the fact that the task "long-term management and disposal of radioactive waste" had been assigned to it.
_	In understanding how common flying is now, we lose sight of the fact that competition in the airline industry was fierce, for it meant a new economy coming to an industry starved section of the country.
_	When the album was reissued by Cadence in 1963, the Review Panel in the somewhat newly renamed "Billboard" magazine updated the rating it was given upon its initial release to reflect the fact that "Williams, a seller of stature," had become "increasingly hot, thanks to regular TV exposure and hits on his current label."
_	She did not open fire, as her captain did not want to reveal the fact that she was out-ranged by the German battleships.
_	Hindered by the fact that the BSN was off-season (being a summer league, in contrast to the other leagues in the hemisphere) and players abroad, this version of the team relied on local players, particularly a core of inexperienced young players (SF Carlos Emory, PF Chris Gaston and SG Mike Rosario) that was complimented by several veterans that were past their prime (SF/PF Gabriel Colón, PG Guayito Santiago and SG/SF Rick Apodaca), but also included Eric Griffin (PF), Weyinmi Efejuku (PG) and Walter Sharpe (PF) as reinforcements.
_	The pasha shows up just in time to attest to the fact that she is his cousin ... and, therefore, a true princess.
_	The CAESAR reactor design exploits the fact that the fission products and daughter isotopes produced via nuclear reactions also decay to produce additional delayed neutrons.
_	In his closing arguments, Cochran famously uttered the phrase, "If it doesn't fit, you must acquit," referencing the fact that the glove the prosecutors alleged Simpson wore during the murder did not fit Simpson's hand.
_	The school’s colours, red and white, derive partly from Scarlett’s name, and also from the fact that the school opened in the year of Canada’s Diamond Jubilee.
_	The police report inventory of the glove box revealed the fact that only two cassettes were in the car at the time of the murders.
_	But Wulfstan was not blind to the fact that, in order for this Reform model to thrive in England, the English clergy and laity (especially the laity) needed to be educated in the basic tenets of the faith.
_	The fundamental theorem of algebra, combined with the fact that formula_53 commutes with itself, guarantees that the polynomial can be factored, putting formula_24 in the form:
_	"Behavioral observation is a natural starting point for assessing attachment disorders because behavioral descriptions... have been central to the development of the concept... despite the fact that observations have figured prominently... no established observational protocol has been established"
_	It seems to be a fairly common species judging by the fact that calling males occur at separations of approximately .
_	The results were immediate and deeply troubling - not one of the major radio stations in Los Angeles would program the record, despite the fact that the group was in town, performing sell-out shows to rave reviews.
_	Apple'N'Apps gave the game as score of 4.5 out of 5 praising the game as a "great game of mini-golf", having "smooth controls", having "beautiful hole design" and that there are "so many holes to play" while criticizing the fact that it is "Tough to judge depth at times", there is "no way to speed slow animations", and there is "no way to restart quickly".
_	The Court doubted that even small children would perceive that the school was endorsing religion in these circumstances, and that doubt was even more attenuated by the fact that the children were just as likely to perceive official condemnation of religion from the school's excluding the Club from its facilities.
_	The film also disregards the fact that "Getaway" was in fact the third chapter of a trilogy which included the earlier works "The Last Hero" and "Knight Templar".
_	1996's "Mortal City", also licensed and distributed with Razor and Tie, received substantial notice, partially due to the fact that it coincided with her tour with Baez.
_	Vincent becomes mad at Fish due to the fact that his last drug deal got Vincent locked up.
_	According to the plaque near the pass itself, the name derives from the fact that third Shikken Hōjō Yasutoki built here a Shakadō (a Buddhist temple devoted to Shakyamuni) dedicated to his father Yoshitoki's memory.
_	However this was refused by the NSW Government Architect because of the difficulties involved, the lack of any known plans and drawings for the structure, the fact that it would not be satisfactory to reproduce in durable material ornamentation that was originally designed to be temporary.
_	BC readily promotes the fact that, due to its powder form, it dissolves faster than pain-relief tablets, and thus gets to work faster.
_	After the death of his father in 1431, and despite the fact that he was legally an adult and able to govern by himself, Wenceslaus remained under the tutelage of his mother, together with his younger brothers, who were his co-rulers.
_	Patten, bemoaned the fact that much of the corporation’s high-brow programming had been moved to BBC Four, the digital channel, and given low budgets that meant shows were “sometimes made with glue and string”.
_	She also argued that they misused data to show that reproductive-age rape victims suffer greater psychological trauma than non-reproductive-age rape victims, that their view that rape is a reproductive adaptation is contradicted by the fact that many rapes do not involve vaginal penetration or ejaculation into the vagina, or are perpetrated on children, elderly women, or men, or involve greater violence than that needed to force copulation, that their "near exclusive focus on copulation in males is inconsistent with evolutionary theory, which suggests that it is advantageous for men to support their children long enough for them to reproduce", and that it was doubtful that rape "could be governed by a discrete set of pre-programmed psychological mechanisms specific" to it or understood through comparisons to the behavior of non-human animals, which involved the risk of anthropomorphism.
_	She concluded that despite the fact that the attention Thornhill and Palmer's book had received had brought them "a position of minor fame", it was "vacuous, irrational, and dangerous".
_	Professor Browning attributes the order and the fact that, with two significant exceptions, in general further transports of Jews to Riga from Germany did not result in immediate mass execution, to Himmler's concern over some of the issues raised by the shooting of German (as opposed to native) Jews and the desire to postpone the same until it could be in greater secrecy and at a time when less controversy might arise among the Nazis themselves.
_	These properties account for the fact that optical rotatory dispersion and circular dichroism are widely used in organic and inorganic chemistry and in biochemistry.
_	Treatment of tissue defects caused after a trauma present major surgical challenges especially those of the upper and lower limb, due to the fact that they often not only cause damage to the skin but also to bones, muscles/tendons, vessels and/or nerves.
_	Despite the fact that there were multiple screenings before the final selection, Lady Hyegyong asserts that she was favored since her first introduction to the royal family, noting both King Yeongjo and Queen Jeongseong seemed to immediately favor her .
_	As a result, the pyruvate formed from glycolysis cannot be oxidized which leads to hyperglycaemia due to the fact that glucose in the blood cannot be used efficiently.
_	Gloucester, while I-95 continues as the two right-most lanes in a somewhat sharp counter-clockwise (albeit the fact that it contains two lanes) loop.
_	The industrial output was minimal, due to the fact that the poor majority could not pay for the products.
_	Here the apparent depth of thought and the difficulty of the discussion merely serve to conceal from the reader the fact that its content remains an entirely undemonstrable and merely arbitrary assumption."
_	About seventy per cent of all prisoners in the South are black; this, however, is in part explained by the fact that accused Negroes are still easily convicted and get long sentences, while whites still continue to escape the penalty of many crimes even among themselves.
_	Olympic regulations regarding amateur status of athletes were eventually abandoned in the 1990s with the exception of wrestling, where the amateur fight rules are used due to the fact that professional wrestling is largely staged with pre-determined outcomes.
_	Ferrer was proclaimed to be Venerable on 13 June 1992 after Pope John Paul II had recognized the fact that he had lived a life of heroic virtue.
_	The Nobel Committee points to the fact that it has to execute the will of Alfred Nobel, in accordance with the following text in his will:
_	Moreover, what leads the reader to believe that this is the story of any astrologer is the fact that the author has not given him a name- he is simply referred to as "The astrologer".
_	The definition is further complicated by the fact that certain varieties simply do not have economically viable yields when they get truly ancient.
_	In 1921, again despite the fact that 90 percent of the islands' population was Swedish—and that they expressed an almost unanimous desire of being incorporated into Sweden—the League of Nations determined that the Åland Islands should remain under Finnish sovereignty, which is often attributed to the skill of its Minister to Paris, Carl Enckell, who also was envoy to the League of Nations in charge of Finland's presentation of the Åland question.
_	However, provincial languages have no official status in Pakistan, except Sindhi in Sindh, given the fact that Urdu and English are the official languages of the country.
_	The reports dwell upon the varying ease with which the bird could be caught according to the hunting method and the fact that when roasted it was considered similar to pork.
_	Although included in several plans for railway lines including the Thingley Junction to Westbury line and the Staverton and Bathampton line, the financial backing required wasn't available and the fact that Devizes is so high above sea level made it impossible and so as a result Devizes was left without a station.
_	The species name refers to the fact that the type specimen was collected more than 100 years before it was formally described.
_	They begin to acknowledge the fact that the image in front of them, who happens to be them, moves; indicating that they appreciate and can consider the relationship between cause and effect that is happening.
_	This, in combination with the words "nature's changing course", creates an oxymoron: the unchanging change of nature, or the fact that the only thing that does not change is change.
_	A motto often seen in its promotions is “All under one roof!” referring to the fact that ME Productions houses of all its departments in its 40,000 square warehouse and offices without the need for sub-contracting, which often hampers the logistics, budget or timing of an event.
_	During rehearsal, Dave Coulier, a hockey player, was frustrated at the fact that he kept tripping in his figure skates, so he filed off the toe picks to make them more like hockey skates.
_	He deeply regrets the fact that an 18-year-old girl in a deep depression committed suicide with an overdose of pills he prescribed.
_	In the episode, "SEALd Fate", he got frustrated by the fact that he was kidnapped and made audience to a brutal killing of an innocent girl by Damien Fontelroy.
_	For a catadioptric system that has a combination of mirror and lens, the determination of reduction is more complicated, due to the fact that the telescope has a variable focal length, where the imaging plane can move along the axis of the imaging system.
_	Cultural and religious allegiance accounted for the fact that tuition was carried on in modern Greek, a symbol of Byzantine civilization.
_	Carolina was especially affected by the fact that she could never seem to beat Tex.
_	What had previously been seen as relatively low-class street performing was now regarded as a proletarian art form, and the fact that xiangsheng was performed in Standard Chinese made it a useful tool for promoting the use of Putonghua () throughout the nation.
_	SIGAR head John F. Sopko said he was "troubled by the fact that our government can and does use classified information to arrest, detain, and even kill individuals linked to the insurgency in Afghanistan, but apparently refuses to use the same classified information to deny those same individuals their right to obtain contracts with the U.S. government."
_	Almost nothing is known of the style or quality of "German" wines that were produced in the Roman era, with the exception of the fact that the poet Venantius Fortunatus mentions red German wine around AD 570.
_	Stuart and Revett, who did the earliest and only complete architectural study of the arch in 1751-53 CE, were perplexed by the fact that the arch is not aligned with the Temple of Olympian Zeus, despite the fact that it is only c. 20m from the "peribolos" wall (boundary wall) of that complex.
_	Despite the fact that the doll is a failure, Lisa takes heart that her message was able to get through to at least one little girl.
_	This meaning of a "body's inertia" therefore is altered from the popular meaning as "a tendency to maintain momentum" to a description of the measure of how difficult it is to change the velocity of a body, but it is consistent with the fact that motion in one reference frame can disappear in another, so it is the change in velocity that is important.
_	Margazhi Raagam is significant for the fact that it uses the digital capture quality of the Red One camera and high-quality, uncompressed, six track surround sound to deliver audio clarity and audio mixing finesse that carnatic music audiences have not experienced in a live concert so far.
_	The assumption of such a wide distribution range, however, seems partly due to the fact that small individuals cannot be distinguished from small specimens of the more southerly "Olivella columellaris", and to the resulting misidentifications.
_	Also the fact that the wind there was came perpendicular to the course (river Seine) and was blocked or diverted by trees and buildings.
_	Minister of Education and Science Krista Kiuru expressed concern for the overall drop, as well as the fact that the number of low-performers had increased from 7% to 12%.
_	Dwindling goods traffic coupled with the fact that the station served a relatively rural community - there were 204 residents in 1901, rising to 475 in 1961 - plus its slightly inconvenient siting to the north of Willington village, left the station susceptible to competition from the motor car.
_	Due to the fact that Relativity Media filed for bankruptcy on July 2015, the film's release was postponed until Saban Films acquired the U.S. distribution rights in April 2017.
_	Similarly, the fact that several commentaries on the Aryabhatiya have come from Kerala has been used to suggest that it was Aryabhata's main place of life and activity; however, many commentaries have come from outside Kerala, and the Aryasiddhanta was completely unknown in Kerala.
_	Later, in "The World Price of Insider Trading" he discovered the fact that insider trading laws in themselves are not effective - they only start being effective once there is credible enforcement.
_	She gave ample space to the shocking discovery by the media in the 1990s of the fact that three of her grandparents were Jewish and had died in Nazi camps.
_	It likewise soured Sada Kaur; however she accommodated herself to Ranjit's polygamous wander in light of the fact that she had set her heart on greater and better things and was resolved to see that for her own particular purpose and the purpose of her exclusive tyke (and her offspring in the event that she had any), Ranjit Singh do the arrangements that she had set for him.
_	When Zhu prepared to battle Wang and Li Baozhen the next day, Ma Shi, citing the fact that his soldiers at just travelled a substantial distance, requested a few days of rest.
_	MHC-restricted antigen recognition, or MHC restriction, refers to the fact that a given T cell can interact with both the self-major histocompatibility complex molecule and the foreign peptide that is bound to it, but will recognize and respond to the antigen, only when it is bound to a particular MHC molecule.
_	Yousef Abu-Taleb was taking classes at the Blue Ridge Community College in Virginia in early 2005, when he decided to head to Los Angeles with $2,500 in his pocket to pursue his dream of becoming a movie star, despite the fact that he had no formal acting training at the time.
_	He is given his name due to the fact that it is the only thing he can say or understand.
_	It is important to note that the Maltese authorities would neglect to mention the fact that they were making a substantial profit policing the seas and seizing "infidel" ships and cargoes.
_	If the power tower would contain one or more numbers different from 10, the two approaches would lead to different results, corresponding to the fact that extending the power tower with a 10 at the bottom is then not the same as extending it with a 10 at the top (but, of course, similar remarks apply if the whole power tower consists of copies of the same number, different from 10).
_	The problem with this redirect is the fact that anyone who can obtain this URL (e.g. by sniffing the wire) can replay it and get logged into the site as the victim user.
_	As explained by designer Raph Koster, "Being safe from evil is, in my mind, an uneven tradeoff for the fact that you don't get to be heroes anymore, in that you can just opt out of fighting evil.
_	More recently, critics have been kinder to these dense and often deliberately obtuse films, with some considering his 1980s work to be his most compelling, but a full rehabilitation has been hindered by the fact that these works are very rarely screened.
_	Whilst it is unknown for sure whether "Lepiota cristata" is poisonous to humans or not, mycologists at least regard it as suspect − this suspicion comes from the fact that many other small species of "Lepiota "are poisonous.
_	Despite the fact that justice had been served and the matter had been cleared, John Hubert Plunkett and Frederick Hely were dispatched by Governor Bourke to investigate the treatment of the servants at Castle Forbes.
_	The similarity lies in the fact that both materials have historically been used to generate sparks.
_	Although Blanche is only three years younger than Dorothy (born 1929) and one or two years younger than Rose (born 1930 or 1931), she frequently rubs in the fact that she is the youngest roommate in the house.
_	Their phenotypic plasticity in life history traits, wing patterns, and seasonal habits combined with the fact that their entire genome has been sequenced makes them ideal subjects in understanding how the environment effects genes.
_	Its library is also worth mentioning, for the fact that it held over 1100 books, but in 1784 they were transferred to Budin (present day Budapest).
_	This would be proven by the fact that the holotype of" M. lowei", specimen NMC 8790, possessed an interparietal bone, at 609 millimetres in length the longest of any centrosaurine specimen known.
_	During his travels, Craveri also discovered a new species of murrelet ("Synthliboramphus craveri"), which in 1865 was described, named and dedicated to Federico Craveri and Ettore Craveri by the ornithologist Tommaso Salvadori, in acknowledgment of the fact that the Craveri brothers had enriched the Turin Museum of Natural History with many species of birds of Mexico and California.
_	This could be due to the fact that they expend copious amounts of energy excavating and maintaining their elaborate tunnel systems.
_	It has been suggested that Haldane's rule simply reflects the fact that the male sex is more sensitive than the female when the sex-determining genes are included in a hybrid genome.
_	Meanwhile, Talbot (Jennifer Tilly) comes to terms with the fact that her husband has not been satisfied at home and has been cheating on her, as the town prostitute, Thais (Faye Dunaway) shares her wisdom on the ways of men—all this takes place while the town bartender, Bear (James Earl Jones) and the town drunk, Howler (Denholm Elliott), debate the finer points of music and life.
_	I mean, to predicate your opinion on the fact that the guy was born to Mexican parents or something.
_	Philip married her on 15 May 1092, despite the fact that they both had spouses living.
_	Studies have shown that due to the uniform size of the droplets created by this type of spray, due to the high transfer efficiency of the technology, due to the non-clogging nature of the nozzle and finally due to the fact that the ultrasonic energy de-agglomerates the suspension just before atomization, fuel cells MEA's manufactured this way have a greater homogeneity in the final MEA, and the gas flow through the cell is more uniform, maximizing the efficiency of the platinum in the MEA.
_	Considering the fact that she also wrote some of the lyrics herself or together with producer Björn Ulvaeus, ""När en vacker tanke blir en sång"" (the title coming from the first line of the lyrics of ""Då finns du hos mig"") can be seen as the most personal and self-written album of her career (its successor "Elva kvinnor i ett hus" includes ten Agnetha compositions, yet no lyrics by her).
_	General McNair considered converting the airborne divisions in the United States to light divisions but following the failure of the light division concept, the decision was taken to ship them as airborne divisions, cognizant of the fact that they would operate as light infantry divisions.
_	Despite the fact that PKU launched its official BBS later on, Wei Ming station, YTHT still managed to burgeon into one of the best and biggest BBS systems in the education network in China with more than 300,000 users, mainly students and well-educated professionals.
_	Despite the fact that Bosko was popular among theater audiences, he could never match the popularity of Walt Disney's Mickey Mouse, or even Max Fleischer's Betty Boop.
_	One hypothesis behind this action rests with the fact that aggressive actions are costly.
_	As an "Aris kid" playing for his beloved club, but also with the fact that he experienced dark days as well as lighter, he was one of the fans' favourites logically, also one of the "last Mohicans" in the club ("Mohicans"- figuratively related to the players as Giorgios Koltsidas, Kostas Nebegleras, Papadopoulos, Georgios Gougoulias, Ronald Nacho Garcia, Efthimios Kouloucheris, Kristi Vangjeli, Petros Passalis, Spyros Gogolos, that were with this team in the second division, season 2005/06, as well as the season's after that, when the club experienced its promotion and then a total rebirth in the first division with good football and higher standing positions).
_	The story is a good one, but it overshadows the fact that he played cricket for Surrey and Middlesex between 1861 and 1883, and was held in the highest regard for his cricketing ability if not for his personal behaviour.
_	Many people are confused by the fact that bonds are sold for “price plus accrued interest”.
_	(Less talked about was the fact that "Submarine" and "It's Yourself", neither of which had been released on CD otherwise, were both edited versions—the former due to master damage, the latter due to the band's preference.
_	The activists of "The Young Front" believe that the aforesaid is the proof of the fact that the Belarusian regime suffered a defeat in the trials to bring to a stop the youth movement.
_	Much of its appeal in this era was due to the ribald, suggestive themes featured by many troupes; this appeal was further augmented by the fact that the performers were often also available for prostitution.
_	Incumbent President Ellen Johnson Sirleaf signed Executive Order No. 91, thus establishing a Joint Presidential Transition Team, due to the fact that Liberia had "not experienced the transfer of power from one democratically elected President to another democratically elected President for over 70 years [...]".
_	The case law is very complex and contradictory, complicated by the fact that the phrase "generally binding nature" is assumed to have exactly the same meaning in both articles.
_	Filming was complicated by the fact that it was the first movie in Australia shot in CinemaScope.
_	Though some of the symptoms of autism (relating to objects rather than people, the fear of looking people in their faces, the inability to understand/process emotions) pose challenges, her unique work is outstanding for the fact that she chooses these very issues to examine and explore the complex human experience and relationships through her art.
_	Despite the fact that the car represented a major step forward for a team of Minardi's small budget, they remained near or at the back of the grid, in a season-long battle with the Arrows team.
_	Historians agree that the Hungarian campaign of 919-920 started from Arnulf's thirst for revenge, because of the fact that Henry the Fowler was elected as German king and not him.
_	Liutprand refers to the fact that Conrad I paid a tribute to the Hungarians (however, this information was not strengthened by other contemporary sources), and the Hungarians wanted this tribute to continue during Henry's reign too.
_	Bruce Hoffman, a Washington counter-terrorism expert stated that the existence of the document underscores the fact that "this is an insurgency cut of many different cloths...[and] everybody's jockeying for their position of power in the future Iraq."
_	In a retrospective review for AllMusic Mike DeGagne called the album "arguably the finest conglomeration of off-centered instruments concerted together to form a single, unique piece" and stated that "the most interesting and overwhelming aspect of this album is the fact that so many sounds are conjured up, yet none go unnoticed, allowing the listener a gradual submergence into each unique portion of the music.
_	(Spanish for "The Independents"), referring to the fact that they all worked on the independent circuit and claimed to be better than the CMLL wrestlers, never actually stating that they represented AAA in any way.
_	The method of detection is based on the fact that the clouds tend to appear brighter and colder than the land surface.
_	J. Pierrepont Finch is a much more "cuddly betrayer... and audiences were less willing to confront "Wholesale's" unflinching portrayal of Harry's little world of "men and ulcers on parade... that shouldn't detract from the fact that it was a daring and distinctive musical.".
_	This hypothesis is lent weight by the fact that thorium-225 can easily be produced in the reaction used and would not be separated out by the chemical methods used.
_	The Dodgers have a loyal fanbase, evidenced by the fact that the Dodgers were the first MLB team to attract more than 3 million fans in a season (in 1978), and accomplished that feat six more times before any other franchise did it once.
_	The name "explicit reciprocity law" refers to the fact that the Hilbert symbols of local fields appear in Hilbert's reciprocity law for the power residue symbol.
_	Diack was warned for his behaviour, with the fact that he was not a member of IOC at the time of the wrongdoing considered a mitigating factor.
_	Despite the fact that Israel is often referred to now as the fourth most powerful country in the world, the perceived threat to Israel is not military defeat, it is annihilation.
_	The trend may be reflective of the fact that grizzled skippers prefer open grassland habitats.
_	The reason for the annual detections being higher than the prevalence at the end of the year can be explained by the fact that a proportion of new cases complete their treatment within the year and, therefore, no longer remain on the registers.
_	Fullerton's look for the adult Jason was abandoned in the sequel, "Friday the 13th Part 3", despite the fact that the film took place the following day and was helmed by the same director, Steve Miner.
_	This is clear from the fact that many of the motifs in the scene are borrowed from Teniers or from other works of van den Bossche himself such as the globe and the Turkish carpet which he also used in some of his art studio scenes.
_	The small numerical size of the few conversion factors reflects the fact that relativistic effects are only noticeable when large masses or high speeds are considered.
_	Due to the fact that both finalists of the 2002 Ukrainian Cup Final Dynamo and Shakhtar qualified for the UEFA Champions League, the fourth European competition berth was to be awarded to the best fourth placed team in the league competition.
_	However, the administration of FC Metalurh Zaporizhia argued the fact that their team head better head-to-head record with both Metalist Kharkiv (2 1-0-1 2-2 with an away goal) and Dnipro Dnipropetrovsk (2 1-0-1 2-1).
_	In pronouncing an end within the church to the divisions which are common in the world around it, he concludes by highlighting the fact that "there were New Testament women who taught and had authority in the early churches, that this teaching and authority was sanctioned by Paul, and that Paul himself offers a theological paradigm within which overcoming the subjugation of women is an anticipated outcome".
_	Despite the fact that researchers find the outcomes of psychological evaluations to be influenced from allegiance from a specific school of thought, the role of allegiance in the research field should be evaluated cautiously.
_	During this visit, the church's curate, Monsieur Huchet, had brought the church to the Emperor's attention, highlighting the fact that it lacked furnishings.
_	The FBI's J. Edgar Hoover wrote to the Justice Department: "In view of the fact that she has lost her American citizenship, no efforts are being made at the present time to develop a treason case against her."
_	He was also confronted with the fact that photographs of Ibn Khattab, Osama bin Laden and Mohamed Atta were found on his computer, though he protested that agents were taking them out of context and had simply been photos from news agencies such as BBC which were included in online stories he had read, and were saved in his web cache.
_	He had drive and great energy and his victories against Bulgaria and the remnants of the German and Austro-Hungarian Armies were independent of the situation on the Western Front, demonstrated by the fact that they came before the main assault on the Hindenburg Line and against a still-capable army that offered strong resistance to the British and the Greeks in the Battle of Doiran.
_	Despite the fact that a majority of families in the U.S are dual earning, the image of the "ideal worker" persists, presenting work-family conflict.
_	The NBRC initiated this credential, in spite of the fact that the Registered Polysomnographic Technologist (RPSGT) credential was widely accepted in the field of sleep medicine.
_	The school received a $35,520 grant from the state to put up a windmill, but despite the fact that the school was built close to a mountaintop, research showed in 2005 that there wasn't enough wind to actually make installation of the turbine worthwhile.
_	However, the fact that she actually cares about the lives of her teammates puts her at odds with DV8's normal field leader, Threshold.
_	This is not surprising given the fact that this is, in fact, how many Christians interpret holidays such as Samhain.
_	Kuiper's assertions stem, in part, from the fact that many oppressed groups within India have used secret languages to prevent outsiders from understanding them.
_	Even though Mar Athanasius lacked the support of the general assembly of the Church (Malankara Palli-Yogam), the fact that he was a native favoured him.
_	Though all facilities are available in CHANOT Village but it has been always neglected by the local government and the facilities like irrigation system which is bare necessity of the people there has not been provided so far despite the fact that major population are involved in the Agriculture and they have there earning from the agriculture only.
_	After the tournament, Russian fans were left disappointed by comments from Arshavin, who said: "the fact that we [Russian national team] hadn't exceed your [fans] expectations is not our [the players'] problem, it is your [fans'] problems."
_	Spain, however, ignored the fact that it was only the presence of European settlers that provided the security for them to return.
_	Noting that the UK had chosen not to implement all copyright exceptions permitted under EU law, the review drew attention to the fact that UK copyright law did not allow individuals to "shift the format of a piece of music or video for personal use", to make use of a copyrighted work in parody, and nor did UK copyright law allow libraries to archive all digital copyright material.
_	The equation expresses the fact that the first person has no one to share a birthday, the second person cannot have the same birthday as the first (), the third cannot have the same birthday as either of the first two (), and in general the th birthday cannot be the same as any of the preceding birthdays.
_	After the war, use of the term generally vanished; some of this was due to mass demobilization of the participant air forces' existing equipment, and the fact that several of the most-produced medium bomber types were now technologically obsolescent.
_	The objection asserts that although the outcome of an SFA is not determined, one's history up to the event "is"; so the fact that an SFA will occur is also determined.
_	This explanation takes into account the fact that the college was established by Sabine king Numa Pompilius and the institution is Italic: the expressions "pontis" and "pomperias" found in the Iguvine Tablets may denote a group or division of five or by five.
_	The Bucs' defense was aided by the fact that their new head coach was Jon Gruden, who had knowledge of the Raiders' playbook as well as Gannon's mannerisms and even some audibles, which Oakland coach Bill Callahan had left unchanged since Gruden's departure.
_	The capacity of the arena is 14,500–17,800 depending on usage, 14,800 is mostly the capacity during international matches, due the fact that Uefa would not approve the installation of seats on the standing because of fire risk which means a lower capacity is needed to be approved by Uefa.
_	Ferguson gives the example of standardized Arabic and says that, "very often, educated Arabs will maintain they never use L at all, in spite of the fact that direct observation shows that they use it constantly in ordinary conversation"
_	The phrase literally means "nameless partnership" or "anonymous venture" and comes from the fact that the partners (the shareholders) are not directly known.
_	Often overlooked in reports on the Highway of Tears is the fact that over half of the missing women are First Nation.
_	Therefore, to highlight that membrane alterations are a process during early pregnancy—not just an event at the time of attachment itself, to recognise the fact that both apical and basolateral alterations occur, that molecular changes are also evident, and that moreover, there appears to be a degree of commonality across species, we have suggested that alterations in the plasma membrane of uterine epithelial cells during early pregnancy be referred to collectively as “the plasma membrane
_	For reasons unknown, Rodimus and Hot Rod appear in the game as separate characters, despite the fact that they are the same character
_	However, Kururu seems aware of the fact that Mutsumi and Saburo are the same person.
_	Isabella's mother Maria and the Ibelins (now closely allied to Conrad) argued that Isabella and Humphrey's marriage was illegal, as she had been underage at the time; underlying this was the fact that Humphrey had betrayed his wife's cause in 1186.
_	This is proven by the fact that only after the occupation of Spain first romances appeared in southern France.
_	The closure came despite the fact that UNSW had already invested over S$22 million (A$17.5 million) in its Singapore campus.
_	Despite the fact that the referee had awarded the goal and multiple newspaper reports stated that the ball had clearly gone over the line, Kinnaird's fellow council members took his word for it, and struck the goal from the records, changing the official score to 2–0 (although if Oxford had not scored, there would have been no reason for the game to go to extra time, so by rights they should have annulled Wanderers' second goal as well).
_	The latest truce with Scotland was due to expire on 15 July 1385, and the fact that the English muster was due to take place on the 14th indicates that the plan was to invade immediately it had done so.
_	After the original video was found to be too shocking for many musical channels, and the fact that the flashing was excessive enough to cause a warning to appear on some music channels, a new video was filmed.
_	(The character Aud is recognizable as Anya; her name is pronounced "odd"—this is a play on the fact that people are always telling Anya she is odd.)
_	Finally, the third reason for religious study in sociology is the fact that religion changes over time in response to different social conditions.
_	The trio's participation in the tournament was also added to their villainous act in Progress with the members wearing NXT jackets, playing up the fact that they were under WWE contracts and promising they were going to leave Progress with the promotion's two championships.
_	However, many peoples who have partially or completely embraced Islam, have also established inequality between sons, such as the Oromo of east Africa, who had patrilineal primogeniture in inheritance, in spite of the fact that some of them were Muslim.
_	Another unique feature of this species of sea turtle is the fact that their carapaces are found to be much thinner than other sea turtle carapaces.
_	Gracey accepted the fact that the level of insurrection was such that he would first have to pacify key areas before he could repatriate the Japanese.
_	The name Atelier Van Lieshout emphasizes the fact that, although Joep van Lieshout founded and leads the collective, the work produced stems from the creative impulses of the entire team.
_	There is spectral smearing in a rainbow owing to the fact that for any particular wavelength, there is a distribution of exit angles, rather than a single unvarying angle.
_	In addition the fact that the message was written in English was evidence that it could only have come from a Native American with extensive Christian education which showed the Englishmen's attempts to assimilate Native Americans was not wholly successful.
_	This despite the fact that none of them had played on the recording in question.
_	The disappearance of this phoneme might be attributed to the fact that, unlike , it didn't play any morphological role.
_	The environmental chemistry of some radioactive elements such as plutonium is complicated by the fact that solutions of this element can undergo disproportionation and as a result many different oxidation states can coexist at once.
_	Di Lauro's grief was in no way diminished by the fact that, as several supergrasses (informers) have since claimed, he was implicated in his boss's murder.
_	However, these facts are already entailed by the fact that codice_84 is true for any nonnegative codice_13.
_	An interesting aspect and a problem for the East German guards was the fact that the anterior part of the Wall strip was located on the steep embankment of the former railway tracks at a higher elevation than the adjacent area in the west.
_	In each case, the fact that a fire began aboard a ship and spread to land did not bring the tort under admiralty law.
_	Todd VanDerWerff of "The A.V. Club" rated the episode A, citing the fact that the show's structure creates believable opportunities for people with different beliefs to interact and engage with one another.
_	He also focuses approvingly on the fact that Shirley and Pierce, unlikely comedic heroes, are given the reins in this particular episode.
_	Because the League of Nations mandate for Namibia was cancelled by the United Nations and the fact that Namibia became independent, the Jewish population in Namibia dramatically declined since 1965, with only 60 to 100 Jews living in Namibia today.
_	Another great inconvenience of these roofs was the fact that they were a home for snakes, rats, mice and spiders.
_	The Kannenbäckerland owes its name to the fact that, in this region, the largest clay deposit in Europe was found and, since the 16th century, has been used to make the well-known grey and blue Westerwald Pottery.
_	The common belief in the safety of railway travel is undermined by the fact that many railway cars are severely overcrowded.
_	Previous attempts to utilize high-performance ceramics such as zirconium-oxide were thwarted by the fact that this material could not be processed using the traditional methods used in dentistry.
_	The new material was described as "more adventurous" <ref name="Art Brut, Buffalo Bar, 09/4/11"></ref> and "more varied than on previous albums", and was generally "well received", despite the fact that the audience was "not familiar with any of the material."
_	She has stated that this is due to the fact that internet art like hers that can be based on images that she finds from surfing on the web can encourage lengthy production.
_	After Henry III's death in 1309, and despite the fact that her eldest son Henry IV the Faithful was of legal age to rule by himself, Matilda became the regent of her late husband's Duchies (except Glogów, which was given to her by Henry III in his will as her "Oprawa wdowia") until 1312.
_	The "interest effect" derives from the fact that if the foreign tax rate is low, the tax rate effect on the net yield is growing with time as the amount of additional interest increases exponentially (interest advantage).
_	Difficulties in making a clear distinction between event logging and software tracing arise from the fact that some of the same technologies are used for both, and further because many of the criteria that distinguish between the two are continuous rather than discrete.
_	From the fact that each beam generated by ZF-precoding is orthogonal to all the other user channel vectors, one can rewrite the received signal as
_	Its popularity has endured despite the fact that even a relatively simple, but iterative, process such as amortizing the interest over the life of a loan – a calculation which modern spreadsheets can complete almost instantly – can take over a minute with the HP-12C.
_	This is most likely due to the fact that anti-dsDNA are a heterogeneous population, some of which have been found not to be pathogenic.
_	Although the power he ceded as Speaker seemed little enough, the fact that he gave up anything made him, in retrospect, "the father of the modern Legislature," according to Mel Miller, a subsequent Assembly Speaker, also from Brooklyn.
_	Zizek notes the inconsistency of this vision in the fact that the dinosaurs prey on each other, and have other irreconcilable differences: "The problem, of course, is: how far do we go?
_	Often complete ranks of enemies ran before physical contact, frightened by the long pikes and the fact that the morale of the Swedish battalion could calmly withstand their fire.
_	In turn, the source of the Latin word is from the Ecclesiastical Greek "Clericus", meaning appertaining to an inheritance, in reference to the fact that the Levitical priests of the Old Testament had no inheritance except the Lord.
_	German courts were troubled by the fact that Crompton could not prove how many looms were manufactured in Germany, and when he tried to peer into the windows of the Schoenherr factory to count, German authorities arrested him on the grounds of breaking patent law.
_	This expression coincides with the fact that committed cells are located in the center of the developing retina while undifferentiated cells are concentrated in the periphery Fz5 expression is implicated in differentiation of retinal precursor cells to a neural fate.
_	Dataz blames the lack of female rappers in Tanzania for the fact that MCing and DJing are associated with hooliganism and masculinity, most popularly through the mimicking of American gangsta rap, a genre that has a large lyrical base in the subjugation of women.
_	The prioress made the men aware of the fact that the convent had more liturgical devices stored in a house in Stade.
_	The unique taste of this cabbage soup was from the fact that after cooking it was left to draw (stew) in a Russian stove.
_	This was in recognition of the fact that circumstances in South Africa and in the fishing industry changed considerably after 1994, the year of South Africa’s transition to democracy.
_	However, this criticism is usually rebutted by the counter-argument from the United States Forces Korea that such promotion of KATUSA soldiers is sufficiently warranted given the fact that KATUSA soldiers usually possess at least two years of college experience, which would translate to an advanced enlisted rank for US soldiers.
_	This emphasises the fact that the recrystallization is directly linked to the process in question, while acknowledging that there is no concurrent deformation.
_	An interesting point toward the work's possible authenticity is the fact that writings for both right and left hand in the score occasionally collide with one another.
_	She vaguely identifies the root of her wanderlust in the fact that she was an adopted child, but this never quite seems reason enough and she is, “tired of wandering, tired of feeling that the home in which she was living was temporary”.
_	Their considerable height results from the fact that they are equipped with a further crossbar for a 110-kV circuit.
_	They were further intrigued by the fact that many of the wives were lawyers who had halted their personal careers for the sake of their husbands' professional ambitions.
_	Despite the fact that it is not approved for use in menopausal hormone therapy, topical progesterone is registered in some countries under the brand name Progestogel as a 1% gel for direct local application to the breasts to treat premenstrual mastodynia (breast pain).
_	The effectiveness of topical progesterone for this indication may be related in part to the fact that the site of application of topical progesterone has been found to significantly influence its absorption.
_	UPA and CPA customers did not like the fact that their electricity bills would be increased in order to pay off the loans the REA and other creditors had granted UPA and CPA to finance the project.
_	White has explained that they used these colors to distract from the fact that they were young, white musicians playing "black music".
_	A number of features distinguishes these buildings, including the materials used and the fact that many of them have planted and tree-filled courtyards.
_	For example, a food bank with an endowment to invest would want to buy the stock of a company with a good human rights record, despite the fact that this company might also happen to produce beer.”
_	Despite the fact that he was fiercely opposed to the move, Cardozo was transferred to Argentine team San Lorenzo de Almagro in June 2005, and finished the season with only 4 goals due to injuries that kept him away from playing several games.
_	The second inequality comes from the fact that a median minimizes the absolute deviation function
_	Davy's scheme was seen as a public failure, despite the fact that, as Frank A. J. L. James comments, "The somewhat ironical problem [...] was not that they were unsuccessful.
_	The Labour Party focused its campaign on the fact that, at the time, there was worry as to whether the UK government's Help to Buy scheme could be used to fund the buying of second homes in the county, but was later announced to be untrue.
_	In fact the first equations derived can be interpreted as determining the quotient of the Euclidean division of the polynomial on the left by the monic polynomial , while the final equation expresses the fact that the remainder is zero.
_	This book was largely ignored by the medical profession due to the fact that it was obscurely written and sold very few copies.
_	Broadbent criticized the Liberal party for taking refuge in the fact that child care is a provincial jurisdiction, saying that this is the same argument that was used in the 60's about a universal health care insurance system.
_	Ketner's performance was the strongest performance by a Democrat that Brown had seen in his career and was made all the more surprising by the fact that she was openly lesbian and the 1st district, stretching across the coast of South Carolina, was strongly conservative.
_	However, this account ignores the fact that there is little to connect Morel's descriptive use of the term and the independent development of the "dementia praecox" disease concept at the end of the nineteenth century.
_	He did appear in one episode of "EastEnders" and often brags about it, delaying for as long as he can the fact that he was in one scene, had one line, and did nothing but buy a cagoule from Bianca Jackson's market stall.
_	During Vornan-19's first public press conference he mentions the fact that in the future society is very different because they have tapped the energy within all matter so that no one has to work to obtain energy.
_	The land was valued at £2.30 due to the fact that the village was located on the River Severn and had woodland which was useful for agricultural and farming purposes.
_	Its story will be built on the fact that Bo Peep was absent in "Toy Story 3", with Woody and Buzz Lightyear trying to find her and bring her back.
_	The case is also not helped by the fact that Radetzky was an adjunct of Ernst Gideon von Laudon during the Siege of Belgrade (1789) and the subsequent period of occupation (see Habsburg-occupied Serbia (1788-92).
_	Despite the fact that warm afternoons begin occasionally so early, 191.1 mornings each year fall to or below freezing, and even in May 6.8 mornings reach this temperature.
_	According to Taub, the show is intended to "liberate people, expose political issues, and expose the fact that our society is oppressive and full of lies."
_	Meyers bases his conclusions on studies that report extraverts to be happier; these findings have been questioned in light of the fact that the "happiness" prompts given to the studies' subjects, such as "I like to be with others" and "I'm fun to be with," only measure happiness among extraverts.
_	He is also blame for the fact that the Turkmen attack Kazakh villages.
_	Despite the fact that Aerosoft, the publisher of the series, announced that volume 4 would be set on a line on the Paris Métro, TML-Studios publicly released pictures and information that Volume 4 will instead be set on the New York City Subway system in New York City, based on the 7 service.
_	Similarly, the fact that the caves on Nagarjuni Hill were not consecrated by Ashoka but by his successor Dasaratha, suggests that these caves were only built after the reign of Ashoka.
_	In regard to artistic influences, Levine cited the books "Nineteen Eighty-Four" and "Logan's Run", representing societies that have "really interesting ideas screwed up by the fact that we're people".
_	Mention of this statue later and the fact that Frank and Joan saw it in the antique shop window provide a strong lead so they get a search warrant.
_	This conclusion is supported by the fact that similar sequences representing alternating periods of occupation and non-occupation occur at a number of other caves in the area.
_	Substantial variations between annual (AADT) and summer (ASDT) traffic volumes are attributed to the fact that the road connects to a number of summer resorts.
_	The club's taking of most of Iraq's best players as well as the fact that they made domestic football much less competitive made the team very unpopular among fans.
_	Cycling journalist Sam Dansie believed that the fact that Eddy Merckx Cycles has maintained a presence as an elite bicycle due to its adoption of new methods over time.
_	Some critics have attributed the interest surrounding the newly released Game Boy Advance, coupled with the fact that "Toki Tori" was a new name in the industry as the reason it was ignored by the public at large.
_	Since the blancmange curve of parameter formula_56 is the parabola of equation formula_57, this illustrate the fact that in some occasion, de Rham curves can be smooth.
_	Of little solace was the fact that the Patriots were the only team to score against the Bears in the playoffs that season.
_	Given the fact that union of Northern Epirus with Greece had already been dismissed by the European Great Powers, they decided that only autonomy or alternatively an international occupation would be appropriate for the region.
_	His research contributed substantially to the fact that Kassel became a center of the astronomical research.
_	Despite the fact that they were smaller than the twin camera process used previously for 3D, the All-Media Cameras were still bulky and made the film shoot difficult, causing delays when transporting the cameras to remote desert locations.
_	WFIL-TV and the later WPVI-TV had regularly included "Operation Alphabet" in their daily schedules from its 1962 debut into the early 1980s, making it one of Philadelphia's longest-running programs, despite the fact that it was only in production in the early 1960s.
_	They say that the premise of the show is "very much about all families who have been in the White House, the price they've paid for being there and the fact that those same families will often try or continue to try to get back into the White House again."
_	This notion has no intrinsic meaning, since what is meant by "known" functions very often is defined precisely by the fact that they satisfy certain given equations, and the list of such "known functions" is constantly growing.
_	In 1984, Jerald and Sandra Tanner, critics of the LDS Church, became the first to declare the letter a forgery despite the fact that it, as well as others of Hofmann's "discoveries," would have strengthened the Tanners' arguments against the veracity of official Mormon history.
_	According to her, the title came from the fact that the album is "the synthesis, the combination, the contrast, the synergy between the organic and the synthetic, also the past and present".
_	Evidence of this is the fact that Italian has both and as outcomes of palatalization in different environments, while Western Romance has only .
_	Even more suggestive is the fact that the Mozarabic language in al-Andalus (modern southern Spain) had as the outcome despite being in the "Western Romance" area and geographically disconnected from the remaining areas; this suggests that Mozarabic was an outlying "relic" area where the change > failed to reach.
_	In a 1984 interview, Pierson said he was captivated by the fact that these two offshore stations were the first and only all-day commercial radio broadcasters serving the UK.
_	The reason for this could be the fact that it was purely meant for children, unlike children works by other singers that included sexual content for adults.
_	But Sphaerus answered very neatly, that he had not given his assent to the fact that they were pomegranates, but to the fact that it was probable that they might be pomegranates.
_	While the battle ensues at Nanda Parbat, the White Ghost takes Ra's to a secluded place, where he appears to accept the fact that his death is inevitable.
_	This constitutes a problem mainly for collaborative filtering algorithms due to the fact that they rely on the item's interactions to make recommendations.
_	Another theory includes Western African words related to dance and music, based on the fact that Merengue has African elements in it.
_	In general, 20th-century Guatemalan literature is strongly influenced by politics, as evidenced by the fact that its authors were forced into exile during Guatemala's successive dictatorships and civil wars.
_	For example, the fact that C minus 2 points is hyperbolic implies Picard's theorem that the image of any nonconstant entire function C → C misses at most one point of C. Nevanlinna theory is a more quantitative descendant of Picard's theorem.
_	It is considered that the removal of the Houseboat, the Cubby, the Workshop and the Solar Shed have no impact on the significance of the site, confirmed by the fact that they were provided with a level of low significance in the 2002 Conservation Management Plan.
_	Google has pointed to connections between Microsoft and data protection consultancy "80/20 Thinking", run by Davies, and has said that Davies' connections to Microsoft should be made clear in public, as the credibility of his criticisms is undermined by the fact that he acts as a consultant to companies who are direct rivals and critics of Google, a fact Davies rarely discloses in press releases or comments.
_	Row was a street in the City of London that is supposed to have received its name from the fact that, when the monks and clergy of St Paul's Cathedral would go in procession chanting the great litany, they would recite the Lord's Prayer ("Pater Noster" being its opening line in Latin) in the litany along this part of the route.
_	The first one is deduced from the fact that the topological dimension T is invariant by homeomorphism, and thus can be defined as the infimum of the Hausdorff dimension over all spaces homeomorphic to "X".
_	The word messauge is a term of art used by drafters of deeds to make note of the fact that all improvements, buildings and structures are conveyed along with the land.
_	Mumford goes on to argue that the "moral change that took place under capitalism can be summed up in the fact that human purposes, human needs, and human limits no longer exercised a directing and restraining influence upon industry: people worked, not to maintain life, but to increase money and power and to minister to the ego that found satisfaction in vast accumulations of money and power."
_	Guillaume Le Vasseur de Beauplan recorded the fact that Kozaks danced in such a manner, and other historical accounts verify this.
_	Historic texts and also recent findings reveal the fact that the city included about 5,000 houses with some modern aspects like an ego system.
_	The Estonia-Russia border treaty had been signed in Moscow on 18 May 2005 and ratified by Estonia, but was not ratified by Russia — official reason for this was the fact that Estonia's internal treaty ratification legislation passed by parliament mentioned the 1920 Treaty of Tartu (the treaty under which these territories were originally recognised as Estonian).
_	Upon seeing Tatyana again, he becomes obsessed with winning her affection, despite the fact that she is married.
_	This claim was branded "an ugly lie" by the Turkish media and attributed to the impaired relationship between Russia and Turkey after the 2015 Russian Sukhoi Su-24 shootdown incident and to the fact that RT is a Russian state agency.
_	Little is known of his life other than the fact that he served at Kremsmünster Abbey.
_	Meanwhile, Chris and Meg attempt to hide the fact that Stewie is unconscious, after they accidentally bump him down a flight of stairs.
_	Although Herder focused on the positive value of cultural variety, the sociologist William Graham Sumner called attention to the fact that one's culture can limit one's perceptions.
_	Noda did this to express the fact that he cannot believe in God, however can believe in the power of humanity's hearts.
_	Neil was happy to stay friends until he discovered he had a love rival in Hanif Ruparell, despite the fact that he was dating Angie Freeman.
_	The liquid contains polymers wherein each Sb is octahedral, the structure being described with the formula [SbF(μ-F)] ((μ-F) denotes the fact that fluoride centres bridge two Sb centres).
_	Japanese astronomer Syuichi Nakano reported the discovery, drawing attention to the fact that the object had not been visible in images from 1993 nor in Harvard–Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics records for the years 1930-1951, despite it appearing to slowly brighten over the previous years.
_	This reflects the fact that an elliptic fibration has potential good reduction at such a fiber.
_	Another aspect contributing to "belgitude" is the fact that many Belgians identify more with being Flemish, Walloon or part of Brussels, but even within those groups many feel more attached to being part of a city or province than any national or community identity.
_	One such drawback is the fact that elder siblings, especially the first born of the relevant gender, will be heavily incentivized to sidestep the tradition, even more so if primogeniture inheritance is a familiar concept.
_	It refers to the fact that "Veterupristisaurus" is currently the oldest known representative of the "shark-toothed lizards", the Carcharodontosaurids.
_	They held a disproportionate number of positions in the new country due to the fact that Urdu was made the national language of the new state and as such was, for many Biharis, their mother tongue.
_	The reasons for such contradictions apparently lay in the fact that different authors were chiefly concerned with building consistent chronologies, which recorded each possible name and date, but failed to provide reasonable explanations for picking the dates and sometimes even for historical characters included in such records.
_	Velasquez considers "Hulog Ka Ng Langit" as the most memorable album she has ever made due to the fact that the album is a product of her love for her son and family.
_	At a photoshoot, Valerie dresses as Marilyn Monroe but after Mrs Tembe informs her of the fact that she won't be working at the Mill for longer, she later breaks down telling everyone she has cancer and shuts herself in the toilets, crying.
_	The review also noted the fact that reductions (e.g., sums over arrays) need additional code.
_	Despite the fact that most students enter the school with below average Key Stage 2 results, Key Stage 3 and 4 results are above that of similar schools.
_	She highlights the fact that Violet, away from Caesar, is wearing jeans and able to be less overtly feminine.
_	The college was concerned about the increasing frequency of accidents between pedestrians and automobiles on that street, pointing to a recent incident involving an injured maintenance worker and the fact that there had been 6 other similar accidents in the previous 15 years.
_	Tomas feigns innocence despite the fact that the Vulcan gun's barrels are still smoking.
_	Razi based his hypothesis on the fact that some of the poetry of the early Islamic era refers to Mihragan in connection with snow and cold.
_	Objects and co-objects are used in phago and exo rules in order to illustrate the fact that both involved membranes agree on the movement.
_	In 1669, Eleonora had to resolve the conflict between the Imperial court in Vienna and the Holy See, which arose due to the fact that the Pope didn't appoint any Cardinal of the candidates proposed by the Emperor.
_	With larger populations, social and technological innovations were easier to fix in human populations, which may have all contributed to the fact that modern Homo sapiens replaced the Neanderthal populations by 28,000 BP.
_	Despite the fact that Sela met the International Olympic Committee's criteria to play in the Olympics, and the Israel Tennis Association recommended that he deserved to go, the Israel Olympic Committee refused to accept the recommendation.
_	The fact that the Saarland was removed from Germany after the Second World War, largely contributed to the fact that the traffic between Homburg and Glan-Münchweiler fell steadily in the following years.
_	The "Rajavaliya" a primary source written during the 17th century refers to the fact that the Aryacakravartis collected taxes from Udarata and southern lowlands.
_	President Obama's administration, despite the fact that the coin and its design were decided solely between the US Mint and the CCAC.
_	Professor of English literature John Johnson has claimed that the importance of "Agrippa" stems not only from its "foregrounding of mediality in an assemblage of texts", but also from the fact that "media in this work are explicitly as passageways to the realm of the dead".
_	These procedures are often not applicable to developing nations due to their complexity and the fact that the flavours of unrefined oils are well accepted in these areas.
_	We said,"Didn't the fact that you were buying a triple-A rated product with a yield much in excess of what you could get from Procter & Gamble sound too good to be true?".
_	Watch claims in its report that as of November 18 over 2,000 civilians were still in the Tel Shair corridor section of the mine belt due to the fact that Turkey had been refusing entry for cars or livestock, and the refugees did not want to leave behind their belongings.
_	In other words, his desire to seek a higher political office was fundamentally borne out of the fact that the electorate had passed a verdict of
_	Weiss would have liked to trade Martin, but was deterred by the fact that the second baseman was extremely popular with Yankee fans and with the press covering the team.
_	The classification of these instruments is primarily complicated by the fact that the seventh hole produces a semitone instead of a tone.
_	She became the first person in the show's history to be fired in the British version of "The Apprentice", which came down to the fact that she displayed a disrespectful attitude to superiors, as was demonstrated in the task against her team's project manager.
_	Two more murders follow and, after all present have been questioned, several secrets become known - including the fact that one of the students is unknowingly the son of one of the lay lecturers and that, through his mother, he will inherit the property should it be closed and sold.
_	They criticize the fact that some types of implicit direct negative evidence are not necessarily corrective (i.e. parental responses that may qualify as implicit direct negative evidence can occur after either grammatical or ungrammatical utterances).
_	Druckmann attributed this to the fact that "Remastered" was developed as a recreation of the original, altering only technical and graphical aspects.
_	Haaretz cited that some women activists have protested the fact that United Torah Judaism, along with other ultra-Orthodox parties, refuses to run female candidates for office.
_	In the book "Creepshows: The Illustrated Stephen King Movie Guide", author Stephen Graham Jones says that the movie's critical failure and near financial failure was based on the fact that the "mean-spirited film did not have one single likable character."
_	Burford later attributed this to the fact that national youth broadcaster, Triple J, refused to play the song on-air.
_	This was surprising to the New Zealand public due to the fact that the United States of America had not sent any of its Naval forces to New Zealand since 1987.
_	She explains her concerns as stemming from the fact that Ling's biological mother was a famous actress and singer, who became someone's mistress and abandoned her child to marry rich in Thailand.
_	This refers to the fact that the axes of the woodmen have wooden shafts and the trees have therefore contributed to their own doom.
_	The real significance of ""L'Amérique indépendante..."" lay in the fact that it was published as a separate volume of Démeunier's contributions to Charles Joseph Panckoucke's "Encyclopédie méthodique", which had been corrected and debated in correspondence with Thomas Jefferson.
_	The difference is due to the fact that, upon oral administration, a large hormonally inert pool of estrogen sulfate and glucuronide conjugates with extended terminal half-lives is reversibly formed from estradiol during first-pass metabolism, and this pool serves as a metabolism-resistant and long-lasting circulating reservoir for slow reconversion back into estradiol.
_	"3" refers to the fact that it is the third generation of computer modules - first was the RCX and the second is the NXT.
_	Romako based his design on the German "Zieten", though the German vessel was significantly faster than the "Zara" class, in part owing to the fact that "Zieten" had a longer, finer hull and was more lightly built.
_	The first leader of independent India, Jawaharlal Nehru, paid Curzon a surprising tribute, referring to the fact that Curzon as Viceroy exhibited real love of Indian culture and ordered a restoration project for several historic monuments, including the Taj Mahal:
_	According to Benny Morris, the arguments that were advanced not to launch the attack were: the negative international repercussions for Israel already accentuated by the recent assassination of Count Bernadotte; the consequences of an attack on an agreement with Abdallah; the fact that defeating the Arab Legion could provoke a British military intervention because of Britain and Jordan's common defense pact and lastly because conquering this area would add hundreds of thousands of Arab citizens to Israel.
_	Ultimately, despite the fact that Barack Obama narrowly won the district in 2008, Skidmore was defeated by a wide margin, winning 38% of the vote to Bogdanoff's 58% and Rosenberg's 5%.
_	Despite the fact that Rodríguez clearly had no chance against Calderón, his candidacy was considered a smart move, as he would start to be in the spotlight and helping his way in future nominations.
_	For all its folly – and the fact that an hour could have been lopped off its running length, easy – "Gangs Of Wasseypur II" provides enough cinematic memorabilia to single-handedly last us the summer."
_	Despite the fact that the 1.3-litre is a carry-over from the previous generation Myvi, Perodua reported an increase of 10 hp for the new model.
_	However, the local creatures (along with a mechanical, time-controlled street-sweeper and the fact that the Goons themselves are not very clever) have led to their defeat or being trapped in a dangerous situation.
_	Such investigations are hampered by the fact that few of the original "readymades" survive, having been lost or destroyed.
_	Jaci Stephen writing for the "Daily Mail" highlighted the fact that Roo and Sid were fighting an attraction for one another.
_	This was based upon the fact that the Bächle should have attracted his attention after a day in the city and that it should "so long as somehow possible keep holding on to such a characteristic, beautiful and hygienic quirk as presented by the Bächle".
_	His managerial skills are well recognized, given the fact that he was Deputy Manager, Jawaharlal Nehru Stadium during IXth Asian Games.
_	the major difference between Franken Stein and Mary Shelley's Victor Frankenstein is the fact that Franken Stein has the classic personality of a psychopath or serial killer.
_	Furthermore, due to the fact that one of the four Donau-Harbors (Donauhäfen) in Austria is located in Linz, it constitutes an attractive location in regards to logistic and trading enterprises.
_	Olympic Torch Relay took place partly on the new road, despite the fact that only a part of the route in the Moscow region and the junction with the Ring Road was completed in 1980.
_	The volumes are not formal subdivisions of Title 48, but refer instead to the fact that the FAR is printed by the Government Printing Office in two volumes for convenience.
_	During the following 150 years, over 600 Turkish baths opened in Britain, including those built by municipal authorities as part of swimming pool complexes, taking advantage of the fact that water-heating boilers were already on site.
_	With view to the fact that the number of people executed by hanging by Nazi Germans is unknown, altogether at least 1,580 people were executed in Pankrác Prison between 1930 and 1989.
_	The nazirite must uphold all of the requirements stemming from a nazirite vow, despite the fact that the days do not count in the Diaspora.
_	Very exceptional was the fact that all these jokes about past politics were not removed when the newspaper episodes were published in album format.
_	Moreover, the strongest criticism pertained to the fact that the elected European Parliament (EP) had no right to block implementing measures: only the comitology committees could do so, and if they did, the proposal was referred to Council alone, even when the initial delegation of powers was through an act adopted jointly by both Parliament and Council under the co-decision procedure.
_	Furthermore, the fact that the largest contributor may negotiate profit provisions between himself and the club opens the possibility for large-scale financial investment that exceeds charitable and non-profit contributions that are usually the cornerstone of companies limited by guarantee.
_	"School Library Journal" wrote that the book was timely due to the fact that there were significant issues of censorship being reported.
_	This attribution came to an end in 1898 with the discovery of Matabei's art name and the fact that the meaning of the word "ukiyo" bore different meanings before Asai Ryōi's use of it in 1661 to refer to the demimonde.
_	This emerges for example from the fact that Archilochus, a famous iambic poet, was once criticized for being "too iambic" The genre appears to have originated in the cult of Demeter, whose festivals commonly featured insulting and abusive language (, "aischrologia").
_	Tanzania has been enjoying stable peace even before independence due to the fact that there are more than 150 ethnic tribes; Kiswahili as national language that was reinforced during Mwalimu Julius K.
_	For the article, the band's co-manager Cameron Randle of Refugee Management stated ""The whole album is premised on the fact that this band brings a credibility and artistic integrity to country music.
_	The venues for the two playoffs were not announced initially due to the norm of allotting the Eliminator and second qualifier to the home stadium of last season's runner-up, and the fact that the 2017 runner-up, Rising Pune Supergiant were no longer a part of the IPL.
_	There is controversy about his age, or the fact that the National Association has not been officially credited as a "major league".
_	The decisions of the court cannot be appealed, something that is motivated, in part, by information sensitivity and the fact that special knowledge and physical protection of infrastructure and documents is needed.
_	The next important investments from the Gierek-times are: the Warszawa Centralna Station (1975, now the biggest station in Warsaw) and the broad, dual carriageway Warsaw-Katowice, which even now is called "Gierkówka" (in a choice of the "destination point", pretty significant was the fact that Gierek himself was born in Silesia, in Sosnowiec).
_	Further complicating the identity of the KV55 mummy is the fact that he does not seem to be the father of the female mummy KV21a.
_	Despite the fact that Marbury had less impressive statistics than in prior years, people claim that Marbury's newfound unselfishness was key to the team's apparent improvement towards the end of the season.
_	Their general approach to the game was often derided by others in the sport as unprofessional and their playing style was frequently accused of being basic and unsophisticated in comparison to the style of football played by most leading clubs at the time, despite the fact that it helped them win an FA Cup and also achieve regular finishes in the top 10 of the old First Division, during the six seasons leading up to the creation of the FA Premier League.
_	The nation was shocked by the brutality of the crime and the fact that the alleged perpetrator was 11 years old.
_	Primal complex, inner orientation: the fact that the time axis is oriented implies that each time interval is oriented: this is the inner orientation of the primal time intervals.
_	As he comes to accept the fact that Gautham is not in the city, he phones Lizzy who he has not spoken to in months.
_	The fear comes not from the absence of knowledge of another person’s thought process, but rather from confronting the fact that we have no control over anything."
_	The title Auchinleck Chronicle comes from the fact that the "Asloan Manuscript" was formerly owned by the Boswell Family at Auchinleck House in Ayrshire.
_	"The losses, despite the fact that they have become a problem are nowhere near the levels that would cause alarm bells to ring" the correspondent said.
_	This possibility is supported by the fact that a manager's house was built for his company to a design by J Longden in October 1881 and Pfeiffer's house appears on a survey plan of 12 December 1882.
_	Recent entry numbers have been held up by the fact that many of the competing clubs now enter two, three or even four teams.
_	Finally, the fact that patients can identify the actions of a given tool from a sequence of photographs, shows that they completely understand object usage.
_	Based on analysis of the video and the fact that Fanning was not bitten, some marine biologists believe the shark had no intention of biting him.
_	Despite the fact that Harrod and Bridges had a dispute over land some years previous, these two and another man entered the wilderness of Kentucky in 1792, purportedly in search of the mine.
_	Complicating matters further was the fact that if the Sword was lost for any reason (such as being stolen by a wandering foe), the player must return to the level he or she originally found the Sword to reclaim it, and the clock did not stop or reset when this occurred.
_	Masaccio provided a large inspiration to the more famous Renaissance painter Michelangelo, due to the fact that Michelangelo's teacher, Domenico Ghirlandaio, looked almost exclusively to him for inspiration for his religious scenes.
_	They also discuss the fact that everyone in the office assumes the two are either sleeping together or have slept together in the past.
_	The most prominent feature of the dictionary is the fact that its entries are stored in a special notation that allows to render them in different ways.
_	The Erins said that Fallen Leaves still hasn't accepted the fact that he is dead, and this is why Fallen Leaves' spirit still walks through the tunnels.
_	A further difficulty arose from the fact that if an attack occurred during daylight, it would be almost impossible to move troops down the exposed slopes to reinforce the railway line without crippling losses, and troops withdrawing from the railway line would be similarly exposed.
_	If the conception of a this structure is difficult due to the fact that distant words belong to each other or an expected structure of the sentence is violated, more resources, namely the ones for activating low-activation items, are consumed.
_	"If you raise money to run for (office)", Sherman explained, "and if you take that money that people have contributed to you based upon the fact that they think their money is going to a presidential candidate, and you give it to a girlfriend of a God-knows-what ... that's a crime.
_	This, combined with the fact that he represented a tropical island, made his a human interest story reported extensively in the media.
_	This, when generalized, is a reference to the actual migrations brought about by Khwārizmian and Mongol pressure, and moreover it suggests some perceptible connection, if not precisely with Baba Ishak, at least with circles influenced by religious influence of that kind - there is a reference to a Khorasanian Șūfī, Baba Ilyās, with whom both Nûre Sûfi and Baba Ishāq are said to have been in touch - and also to the fact that the first chiefs who brought in these Turkmens were equally leaders in the field of religion.
_	Due to the fact that the Cabinet structure was identical to, and that most of the ministers where the same as the ones of the first Boc cabinet, and the Croitoru (proposed) Cabinet, this new proposal was nicknamed by the media and analysts "The Boc III Cabinet without Boc".
_	Measures were taken to hide the fact that Napoleon was no longer facing Schwarzenberg's army.
_	Radu of Afumați became voivode of Wallachia despite the fact that the Ottoman sultan had supported Mehmed-Bey, the Pasha of Nikopol - a Romanian renegade converted to Islam, for the crown.
_	On 25 June 1996 she was proclaimed to be Venerable after Pope John Paul II acknowledged the fact that the late religious had lived a model life of heroic virtue.
_	Stabenow was also likely helped by the fact that Al Gore won Michigan on the presidential level.
_	A small port and swimming area is located by the coast, but fajã blies the fact that there are no permanent residents at the location.
_	This is further supported by the fact that the castle's tower only has clocks on three of its four faces - the side facing Sutherland is blank, supposedly because the Duchess did not wish to give the time of day to her former relatives.
_	By February 1942, the cypher had been reconstructed with "astonishing rapidity", perhaps being helped by the fact that until 1 April 1942, almost all the traffic in Cypher No. 3 had been recyphered using only one table, the General "M" table.
_	This approach is motivated by the fact that only robust and accurate feature points that survived the geometry scrutiny of multiple images are reconstructed in space.
_	He stated that I had been promoted from one department to another, every month getting better work and better money, and in spite of the fact that he employed as many as one thousand people in his establishment, he never promoted anyone as rapidly as he had me.
_	Despite the fact that the Lotus Elan has been (and continues to be) used extensively for racing it was Lotus' first car that was not designed with racing in mind.
_	This reputation for accuracy is due in no small part to the fact that only good quality bolt action and single shot rifles have been so chambered from the factory.
_	The clone is an exact duplicate - except for the fact that the clone is ten years younger than Damian.
_	Historically, quagga taxonomy was further complicated by the fact that the extinct southernmost population of Burchell's zebra ("Equus quagga burchellii", formerly "Equus burchellii burchellii") was thought to be a distinct subspecies (also sometimes thought a full species, "E. burchellii").
_	The conviction that Germany had nothing to expect from defeat but oppression and exploitation still prevails, and that accounts for the fact that the Germans continue to fight.
_	He writes it has resulted in the fact that "Israeli schoolchildren are among the most violent in the world, a phenomenon believed to be the result of force being an accepted societal means of dispute resolution.
_	Furthermore, they identified Nhu's aides at the site, his idiosyncratic style in the announcements supposedly made by the ARVN, and the fact that the army had little motive to attack the Buddhists.
_	In December 2016 "Private Eye" reported how Renewal had been founded by a former Lewisham Council leader and senior officer, suggesting potential bias, and that the decision to approve Renewal's plans may have been made as far back as 2013 despite the fact that no due diligence had been able to be carried out by PricewaterhouseCoopers due to "poor" and "limited" access to information and management at Renewal, which is controlled from the Isle of Man and British Virgin Islands.
_	Deforestation on the slopes above the town combined with the fact that the city had been built as a series of closely packed houses and buildings – usually sharing walls – built in narrow roads paralleling and closely hugging the shore of the lake.
_	Also of note is the fact that 12 is the first film for which the composer John Adams has allowed his music to be used.
_	However, the insolvency of the Sportfreunde Siegen and the fact that the SpVgg Bayreuth was refused a licence meant, Bamberg did still move up to the "Regionalliga".
_	The objects acquired reflect the fact that the Hawaiians initially treated Cook as a god and presented him with high status goods such as feathered capes, hats, ornaments and images.
_	"The question is, could its sudden appearance be connected with the fact that our science officer, , has developed a high fever of unknown origin which has so far resisted all medication."
_	Bibi Osterwald was the standby for Dolly in the original Broadway production, subbing for all the stars, including Bailey, despite the fact that Osterwald was a blue-eyed blonde.
_	In modern oral tradition, the fact that no other pirate, regardless of nationality, has been said to recurrently share his loot with the poor is emphasized.
_	The court ruled in favour of Lewis, citing the fact that, when Charles I enclosed the park in the 17th century, he allowed the public right of way in the park.
_	But the fact that you dislike them has nothing to do with their right to speak.
_	Burne, who worked at the Westminster Hospital, pointed with suspicion to the fact that Bird's brother Frederic also worked there.
_	In January 1811, von Sömmerring wrote a letter to Cuvier deploring the fact that he had only recently been informed of Cuvier's request for information.
_	Particularly important is the fact that the monument is shown, with the same format, a map of Basilicata 1618.
_	Despite the fact that the school was administrated by the French, a movement against colonialism had been smouldering.
_	Olson and Meisel also take issue with the idea that Leonardo painted the "Mona Lisa" as a self-portrait, and that this idea is based on the fact that points of congruency are found between Leonardo's face and the Mona Lisa's.
_	This appears to be due to mergers: the fact that entering tone has split oddly suggests that it has split twice, as in Cantonese and Taishanese, but that tone ⑦b subsequently merged with ⑧.
_	It was one thing to shuffle through names when the band was unsigned, but things had changed and "Eskobar" now needed to be conscious of the fact that many of the names they were coming up with were already taken.
_	This date derives from the appearance of surviving icons and the fact that the area (known as "Muntenimii") was starting to become populated at the time, by craftsmen and Roma.
_	This was due to the fact that Julia Louis-Dreyfus was on maternity leave.
_	The large number of presently known magnetic white dwarfs is due to the fact that most white dwarfs are identified by low-resolution spectroscopy, which is able to reveal the presence of a magnetic field of 1 megagauss or more.
_	All the animated academic debate on Philippines historiography invokes the perennial question of how to do "nationalist" history, how to establish a "people's" perspective, given the fact that the major documents involved in Philippine history are the records not of the Filipino people, but of the foreign colonizer?
_	She was hurt by the fact that she was trying to stand up for a cause and the other women, including personal friends, voted against her playing and held the event anyway.
_	He sees irony in the fact that "The New York Times" reported on Soviet forced use of neuroleptic drugs (which Florida Senator Edward Gurney called "chemicals which convert human beings into vegetables") in "psychiatric jails" but called the same drugs "widely acknowledged to be effective" when reporting on American schizophrenic patients.
_	The village is considered an affluent area where property prices are significantly higher than the national average (probably due to the fact that Twyford provides an easy route to London).
_	The phenomenon of an eagle turning its flexible head almost 270 degrees, while sitting or flying, is attributed to the fact that when its large head is turned fully its eyes are also turned, unlike a human.
_	However, Voss sensationally walked out on the GC17 bid team due to the fact that they refused to offer a five-year contract as head coach.
_	The way they took care of business was shown handily after the big fire as they chose to rebuild everything, despite the fact that insurance covered only 25% of losses.
_	This knowledge comes from the fact that the city appears again as a target of Zunghar aggression forty years later.
_	The poor payment record is attributed primarily to the fact that individual contributions had little correlation with anticipated pension benefits.
_	His yearning for a spiritual awakening at this point can be gauged by the fact that he started to dispose all his money to the poor and the remaining he just threw.
_	"It is extremely sad to hear that judges have decided to give Lindsay Sandiford a death sentence – despite the fact that the prosecution weren't even asking for it.
_	They started the season with a 30-point deduction imposed by The Football League and Football Association for various financial irregularities, despite the fact that these misdemeanours were carried out by the club's previous owners who had not been in charge since January 2008.
_	The Italian fleet commander, Admiral Carlo Pellion di Persano, initially adopted a cautious course of action; he was unwilling to risk battle with the Austrian Navy, despite the fact that the Austrian fleet was much weaker than his own.
_	At the time of his induction into the Helms Foundation's Basketball Hall of Fame, Steinmetz said that he was proudest of the fact that "I had three sons who won basketball letters at Wisconsin.
_	The decision was taken without input or consultation from the public or user-groups in spite of the fact that during the last round of de-staffing the public and user-groups spoke vocally against cuts to this service.
_	For example, Bob Hayes won the 100 meters in a FAT time of 10.06 seconds, which was converted to an official time of 10.0 seconds, despite the fact that officials with stopwatches had timed Hayes at 9.9 seconds.
_	During the 25th Session of the Human Rights Council, El Ghazzali criticised the fact that several states in which convicted ‘blasphemers’ are currently in jail are also current members of the Human Rights Council.
_	"[Alana] couldn’t really accept the fact that all these corpses were somehow dragged together [by the killer] and put on a stage somewhere," recalls MacLaverty.
_	This presented a problem however; the fact that these two runways intersect near their western end creates a crisscross pattern between aircraft landing and taking off.
_	When authorship ―female or otherwise― remained a matter of passing interest, female playwrights were in an open and equal market with their male colleagues" , the fact that the author was not very important made it easier for female writers to use male names, so their plays would be more easily accepted.
_	This can only be explained by the fact that Wilson was originally signed for five albums by Novedi, and that the official receivers of the defunct publisher wanted the revenues for the legal and financial finalization of the bankruptcy.
_	He believed it was merely a reference to the fact that Quebec is the only province where most Canadians speak French rather than English and that Quebec is the only jurisdiction in Canada that practices civil law rather than common law.
_	During the period of pan-European warfare with which the nineteenth century opened, the Napoleonic general Jean Lannes, who had been appointed Prince of Severia by the Duchy of Warsaw, asserted control over Imielin, along with Severia, citing in support the fact that historically both had belonged to the Bishopric of Kraków.
_	The name water-vine comes from the fact that the woody sections of the vine may be cut into sections and the sap that drips from the sections may be drunk as water.
_	Plecker refused to recognize the fact that many mixed-race Virginia Indians had maintained their culture and identity as Indians over the centuries despite economic assimilation.
_	Despite the fact that Abie has stopped drinking and is no longer a threat, Mr. Varga orders Harry to kill Abie anyway.
_	Although it is logical that France would want the Rhineland to be a neutral zone, the fact that France had the power to make that desire happen merely added onto the resentment of the Germans against the French.
_	In fact it derives only from the fact that the hypothetical dimensions of the pyramid are similar to those of the other seven pyramids, while there are major factors arguing against the identification: firstly, the engraving in the "Description" depicts the Pyramid as a true pyramid, not a step pyramid like the other seven; secondly, the other seven pyramids are built of stone, while the Pyramid of Athribis was made of brick.
_	An important context of the route is the fact that marshes and wetlands have suffered long-term erosion from levees, which are keeping the Mississippi River from flooding but also from re-depositing sediments.
_	The Archdiocese of Washington often prides itself in sharing the fact that the Society of Jesus celebrated the first Mass in British North America on its shores in 1634.
_	He volunteered to serve at the Blechhammer POW camp in Upper Silesia, and the fact that he had been a member of the British Union of Fascists before the war helped him ingratiate himself with the Germans and strike up a relationship with the camp commandant.
_	The theory behind the revival of the weapon derived from the fact that, in the period around 1860, armour held superiority over the ship-mounted cannon.
_	Thus many of the works of Fatimid architecture reflect architectural details imported from Northern Syria and Mesopotamia, probably in part due to the fact that they often employed architects from these places to construct their buildings.
_	The announcement did not go well with some of her ten sisters and six brothers; many who lived in the Dominican Republic were disturbed over the fact that her revelation was received negatively there, as the general consensus in Latin American countries during the second half of the 1980s and early 1990s was that AIDS only affected homosexuals and prostitutes.
_	As in her earlier work, Cavarero continues to develop and deepen a number of themes foregrounded by Hannah Arendt—who asserts in "The Human Condition" that what matters in speech is not signification or 'communication' but rather the fact that 'in acting and speaking, men show who they are, reveal actively their unique personal identities and thus make their appearance in the human world.'.
_	Eddy is disappointed at first to find her son is actually a male version of Saffy; a rather reserved and bookish young man, who delights in the fact that he is gay and yet still boring, holding a job in New York's famous Strand Bookstore.
_	The decision was not well received among the crews of the two ships, due to the weakness they were suffering from due to dysentery, and the fact that travelling to the Maluku Islands would mean sailing against both wind and current.
_	On the contrary, she was more "frustrated" by the fact that people critiqued her looks when she just wanted to celebrate more representation of black women that are not traditionally featured in mainstream media.
_	This biochemical test uses the fact that "Streptococcus agalactiae" excretes a CAMP substance, making it slightly more hemolytic, which can be observed on blood agar media.
_	The designation of SR 685 came into being in the early 1960s, replacing what had been known as SR 675, due to the construction of Interstate 675 in the Dayton vicinity, and the fact that Ohio does not duplicate numbers among different types of highways.
_	He is also given a new cover identity of 'Jack Daniels' as well as speech therapy and work to erase old mannerisms in order to help hide the fact that he was the man the public had recently seen "assassinated".
_	The account mentions some of the effects of the war on local people and businesses and the fact that the town adopted a , .
_	This reflects the fact that consumers would have been willing to buy a single unit of the good at a price higher than the equilibrium price, a second unit at a price below that but still above the equilibrium price, etc., yet they in fact pay just the equilibrium price for each unit they buy.
_	Local journalists were deterred by the fact that he can't speak Italian fluently so his interviews were conducted in English.
_	The society's motto "We See It First!" is/was a descriptive slogan referring to the fact that the camera operator, by personally viewing the scene through the viewfinder of a motion picture camera, physically sees the scene prior to anyone else until the screened dailies.
_	Some complained about the fact that it limits violent and sexual content on television and radio during daytime hours in order to protect children.
_	Some experts suggested that the main change in fertility in the older women was the fact that it took them "longer" to conceive, not necessary that they were significantly more unlikely to eventually succeed.
_	The "Maggid Meisharim", furthermore, shows a knowledge of Karo's public and private life that no one could have possessed after his death; and the fact that the maggid promises things to its favorite that were never fulfilled—e.g., a martyr's death—proves that it is not the work of a forger, composed for Karo's glorification.
_	The Mulready name arises from the fact that William Mulready, a well-known artist of the time, was commissioned to illustrate the part of the letter sheets and envelopes which corresponded with the face area.
_	The need for money by the party organization stemmed from the fact that Franz Xaver Schwarz, the party treasurer, kept the local and regional organizations of the party short of money.
_	Kennedy is excluded from many official listings, in spite of the fact that he acted as governor for about four months.
_	In the book "Bowling Alone", Robert Putnam observed that nearly every form of civic organization has undergone drops in membership exemplified by the fact that, while more people are bowling than in the 1950s, there are fewer bowling leagues.
_	Further exacerbating the rivalry between the "Dienststelle Ribbentrop" and the "Auswärtiges Amt" was the fact that Neurath and Ribbentrop utterly hated one another, with Ribbentrop making no secret of his belief that he would be a much better foreign minister than Neurath, whereas Neurath viewed Ribbentrop as a hopelessly inept amateur diplomat meddling in matters that did not concern him.
_	Peruzzi gained recognition after his performances against Santos in the home and away legs of the quarter-finals of the 2012 Copa Libertadores, in which Peruzzi marked and annulled Neymar, despite the fact that his team was eliminated in the penalty shootout.
_	The main reason cited for the financial failure of the film was the fact that the film was released 3 days after the September 11 attacks.
_	The new call-sign became WFIL, a combination of the two previous identifiers (the fact that the new call letters were close to a phonetic spelling of "Philadelphia" was merely a happy coincidence).
_	Her life is complicated by the fact that her husband Richard, her business partner's brother, played by Christian Solimeno, has low fertility and cannot give her the baby she wants.
_	Another interesting facet of this cop is the fact that he studied to become a historian.
_	This justifies counting it among the 613, even if it does not apply during exile, just as numerous commandments associated with the Temple are counted despite the fact that they cannot be kept during exile.
_	Inference for such signalling networks is complicated by the fact that total concentrations of signalling proteins will fluctuate over time due to transcriptional and translational regulation.
_	One of the main features of the Russian pop industry is widespread touring concerts and corporate performers in Russia and the CIS, which is due on the one hand, the enormous size of the country, as well as to the fact that because of the rather widespread piracy, the profit from CD sales are not up to the performers (that unites it, such as Arabic pop music).
_	No doubt their readiness to see her merely as the ignorant wife was enhanced by the fact that she was heavily pregnant at the time three weeks after Donald left, she gave birth to a daughter, their third child.
_	He points to the fact that the Saga domain tried for a short period of time to launch gold and silver mining.
_	He carefully concealed from both his father and his girlfriend Kathy the fact that he was a mutant, endowed with superior agility and the ability to sense danger.
_	In a January 2000 review in "New York" magazine, Walter Kirn wrote that all of the humor in the book was unintentional and described the book's best joke as the fact that "Trump seems to think he's writing out of pity, and campaigning because he cares."
_	He described a strong patriotic sense among them, writing that their ability to survive in the camps was partly explained by the fact that "they are among the cohesive of the national groups, and from this point of view the most advanced".
_	This existence of a formal parametrization of the branches of an algebraic curve or function is also referred to as "Puiseux's theorem": it has arguably the same mathematical content as the fact that the field of Puiseux series is algebraically closed and is a historically more accurate description of the original author's statement.
_	Radoslav Lopašić infers from the inscriptions and the fact that the Church had been abandoned for 30 years in a 1558 document, that the year inscriptions are years of rebuilding.
_	The pair were initially awarded bronze, but after the competition was complete the judges revised the score to reflect the fact that they had not finished in time with their music.
_	While the Misfits are celebrating the fact that they are free from their powers, a follower of "Jesus" holds up the bar where Curtis and Alisha are now working, robs them, and kills Nikki.
_	However, despite the fact that the Pilots Board, which was the controlling authority, was not consulted, £5000 were allocated and a tender was accepted.
_	Gheorghe Pintilie and Alexandru Nicolschi, leaders of the OS: Iosif Nemeș and Tudor Sepeanu and the prison political officers, very few people from the administration – even those who were aware of the fact that beatings are used during inquiry – were aware of the methods used for extracting information.
_	Despite the fact that the video content from Nintendo Video had been downloaded at no additional cost, unlike the Nintendo eShop, the application was not functional outside the console's official jurisdictions due to issues of video licensing.
_	U.S. presidential election, the blog displayed a strong and consistent distaste for John Kerry, despite the fact that Kaus endorsed Kerry and contributed to his campaign.
_	This unprecedented move may be explained by the fact that a significant portion of the tribe still practised Christianity, or by pressure upon their grazing lands by tribes from the south, but the primary goal of the move was to escape from Hamdanid authority and taxation.
_	This highlights the fact that through to the twelfth century politics were family affairs in which women as creators of families could exercise real power.
_	In 2013, a bronze plaque was installed at The Church of the Village in Greenwich Village, memorializing the fact that the first meeting of what came to be PFLAG was held at the church in 1973.
_	Horowitz points out that the film's dichotomy of absolute good versus absolute evil glosses over the fact that most Holocaust perpetrators were ordinary people; the movie does not explore how the average German rationalized their knowledge of or participation in the Holocaust.
_	Incorporation of the music of "Night on Bald Mountain" as a dream sequence involving the hero was a late addition to the scenario in the course of composition, despite the fact that such an episode is not suggested by the original story.
_	This effect is caused by the fact that the wing enters the ground effect before the tail, which is mounted high in the T-tail case.
_	Despite the fact that Kessel insists on burning through the wall to rescue Joe instead of waiting for the time lock to open, Joe succeeds in the heist and is hailed as a hero for "preventing" the robbery of the gold bar.
_	The Soviets transmitted a radio broadcast from Radio Tashkent into Xinjiang on 14 May 1967, boasting of the fact that the Soviets had supported the Second East Turkestan Republic against China.
_	Weekly review comments on the fact that Tiptree has only just now been revealed to be a woman, as well as stating "Much of the best of Tiptree's work has appeared in previous collections, and these seven stories, though never less than intelligent and perceptive, don't have many blockbusters among them."
_	Rubenstein continued to highly praise the inclusion of the dubstep transition due to the fact that she thought she would never "use the words 'dubstep' and 'Leona Lewis' in the same sentence."
_	This is despite the fact that he claimed there are significant numbers of gay men, and at all levels within the church including the cardinalate.
_	Despite the fact that then-President Lyndon B. Johnson won the state handily in that year's presidential election, Babcock managed to narrowly defeat Renne to win his second and final term as governor.
_	The seller must give notice to the buyer of the fact that the thing is available, if the buyer cannot reasonably be expected to appropriate the thing without such notice.
_	While Cota retained command of the division to the end of the war, during which he led it in the invasion of Germany, he had lost his sterling military reputation and the confidence of his superiors, despite the fact that, before commencement of operations, he had voiced concerns regarding the plan to those same superiors.
_	In 2003, he was named by "Granta" magazine as one of 20 "Best of Young British Novelists", despite the fact that he has not published new work in English since 1996.
_	The dispute centres around the fact that while the Sam Kee Building's width varies from floor to floor, Pittsburgh's "Skinny Building" is 5'2" (1.57 m) wide on all floors.
_	Although the number of ADC interceptor squadrons remained almost constant in the early 1960s, attrition (and the fact that production lines closed in 1961) caused a gradual drop in the number of planes assigned to a squadron, from 24 to typically 18 by 1964.
_	He has kept to his decision, despite popular demand for the song, and despite the fact that Christian radio stations continue to air the song frequently.
_	It should also be noted that the bullet density is missing from Miller's formula despite the fact that Miller himself states his formula expands upon Greenhill's.
_	Testimony to the close relationship shared by Iraq and western Iran during the Abbasid era and later centuries, is the fact that the two regions came to share the same name.
_	New Zealand Indian Central Association president Paul Singh Bains said the fact that TVNZ was still "promoting" the clip on its website showed it had "totally lost the plot" and was insensitive to the offence Henry had caused.
_	Despite from some of the canton's conservative elements, the ban on private motor car usage was grudgingly lifted in the mid 1920s, and during the ensuing decades the more prosperous guests for whom the hotel had been designed increasingly used cars, which highlighted the fact that the village had never acquired reliable year-round road links, especially upriver, to the south.
_	Her tech spec indicates that she frequently takes advantage of her looks, counting on the fact that Autobots won't blast her on the grounds that she's female, using her charms to beguile them then destroy them.
_	The name "bar complex" comes from the fact that used a vertical bar | as a shortened form of the tensor product ⊗ in their notation for the complex.
_	This is consistent with the fact that it was clearly translated from a recension of Aldhelm's poem in which lines 61-67 have been moved to before line 44.
_	At the 105th Indian Science Congress in March 2018, after the death of legendary British scientist Stephen Hawking, Vardhan wrongly claimed that Hawking had said that the Vedas postulated a theory superior to Albert Einstein's theory of relativity, despite the fact that there is no record of Hawking having made the statement.
_	The name of the road comes from the fact that the British had built 4 huge halls along the road, which catered to meetings, exhibitions, etc.
_	Noting that inter-Arab trade volumes are much more modest than they should be, Karam has argued that the reasons for this are "principally the lack of extensive distribution networks, the absence of comprehensive trade agreements that go beyond the existing accords and the fact that transactions have to go through the US dollar."
_	Most accounts agree that Nobin loved his wife dearly, evidenced by the fact that he was ready to accept his wife at first and run away with her, even after knowledge of the affair.
_	Because of her age and the fact that the siblings were raised separated by gender, she was in practice raised as an only child.
_	Despite the fact that he taught in public school for twenty-four years, his family didn't receive any pension because of six missing months of teaching.
_	Sandé said that the song was based on the fact that she believes in God and heaven, although she does not follow a religion.
_	Characteristic of their methods was the fact that they made it a practice to use Soviet prisoners of war as radio intercept operators.
_	It was a deliberate policy” as stated by the papal legate Abbot Marcone, when he wrote in 1943 that given the fact that most guerrillas were “schismatics” (i.e. Eastern-Orthodox Serbs) “our Croatian episcopate does not have any special motive to protest publicly against the government in favor of the schismatics”
_	The book also contains criticism aimed at the Soviet Union and other communist states, but its major point centres on the fact that although the United States claimed to support freedom in the Cold War, it still supported authoritarian regimes.
_	According to Cole, this analysis ignored the social development that has taken place in Iran over the last decade, the large pro-reform election victories in 1997 and 2001 (prior to the reformist voter boycott of 2005), and the fact that the concern of the electorate today is "about culture wars, not class."
_	The term "English Socialism" has precedents in his wartime writings; in the essay "" (1941), he said that "the war and the revolution are inseparable... the fact that we are at war has turned Socialism from a textbook word into a realisable policy" – because Britain's superannuated social class system hindered the war effort and only a socialist economy would defeat Adolf Hitler.
_	The Second scroll showcased the consolation to Makoto while he is praying to the gods and Buddha despite the fact that he did not do the actions which he was accused of.
_	Their name comes from the fact that a finite lattice is a modular lattice if and only if its
_	26 March marked the fact that his kidnapping was now the longest-ever of a foreigner in Gaza since abductions began happening in the Gaza Strip, which led to renewed calls for his release.
_	Wright, himself, took pride in the fact that he had never applied for a coaching/managerial job throughout his career and his services had always been sought by the new employers.
_	Ribic's attorney DePoe objected to the fact that the two witnesses from the Canadian Armed Forces were only allowed to testify by transcript.
_	Maynard certainly profited greatly from this friendship, but that should not diminish the fact that during the outbreak of violent hostilities in 1856 he risked the wrath of his fellow settlers by protecting neutral Indians.
_	As the title in the mules had passed to the scrapman, it was decided that the company was not entitled to compensation amounting to over £60,000, despite the fact that the machinery was still on its premises.
_	Skeptics point to the fact that making a fake weeping statue is relatively easy.
_	David Quinn of the "Irish Independent" wrote that the spirituality depicted "goes some way towards explaining the film's gigantic popularity, and that is the fact that "Avatar" is essentially a religious film, even if Cameron might not have intended it as such."
_	Luciano used his influence to help get the materials to build a church at the prison, which became famous for being one of the only freestanding churches in the New York State correctional system and also for the fact that on the church's altar are two of the original doors from the "Victoria", the ship of Ferdinand Magellan.
_	The quality of research is the fact that teachers from FTT members of scientific committees and chairmen of sections of scientific conferences abroad, members of editorial boards and editorial boards of scientific journals and collections of scientific forums.
_	Especially after Chkalov's death, the Soviet authorities started to promote young designers, in preference to Polikarpov, despite the fact that the I-180 was the best performing Soviet fighter at the time of its cancellation and that it was faster than the Bf 109.
_	In order to complete her endgame, Elena, fully aware of the fact that he would at some point double-cross her, also ordered the creation of "Arvin Clone", a corporal in the U.S. Army named Ned Bolger, who was captured and brainwashed to believe that he was, in fact Arvin Sloane, committing numerous criminal acts in the process, such as setting Irina up to appear as if she had contracted an assassin to kill Sydney.
_	Jack Paar left the show in March 1962, citing the fact that he could no longer handle the load of putting on an hour and forty-five minute show a night, five nights a week.
_	Other historical notes of interest include the fact that the Grade I listed stone urn in the Master's Garden is 2,000 years old and was originally part of an Egyptian nilometer.
_	For example, during the 2005 American League Division Series, for both home games between the Chicago White Sox and the Boston Red Sox, temperatures soared to near , despite the fact that it was already well into October.
_	This is despite the fact that Westhoughton enjoyed similar levels of patronage (see usage figures right).
_	A further reason for his arrest is the fact that Machold has settled in Switzerland instead of remaining in Austria.
_	Despite the fact that he had not been present when the violence broke out and that in fact he had actually tried to calm down local hotheads.
_	In addition to sharing the post of prime minister, what made the MSM/MMM electoral accord exceptional was the fact that it would allow, for the first time in the history of the island, a non-Hindu Mauritian to become the Prime Minister.
_	This comes from the fact that present day Lebanon, the Mediterranean coast of Syria, and northern Israel is the area that roughly corresponds to ancient Phoenicia and as a result like the majority of the Lebanese people identify with the ancient Phoenician population of that region.
_	However, there was constant tension between him and the king due to his disobedience, nonconformity with the social norms of Wessex, his non-adherence to Christianity, and the fact that he was reluctant to swear his allegiance to Alfred, as his ultimate goal was to reclaim the throne of Northumbria, which was stolen by his uncle.
_	Despite the fact that the songs he wrote sold millions of records, his royalties were minimal.
_	Such business development is root in the fact that as a high definition optical payload provider, Wayulink discovered that many Chinese UAVs currently on the market is either too small or not stable enough to carry the latest optical payload developed by Wayulink.
_	The delay was due to the fact that the powers could not come to an agreement which, in turn, hinged on the outcome of the Turkish national movement.
_	In both cases, he was largely hampered by the fact that he played on a losing team.
_	Michael, oblivious to the fact that Ryan is obviously referring to his own drug addiction, gives him hypothetical advice involving a wiretap and snitching on a drug dealer.
_	For this reason, Warner wanted the scene shot in a chapel, but relented when "the writers pointed out that, apart from the fact that Jarrett would [never be willingly caught in a] chapel", the whole point of the scene was to "have a lot of noise, with rattling knives and forks and chatter, that suddenly goes completely silent when Jarrett first screams."
_	Ted partly attributes this to Jack's "never giving money to charity" and the fact that "he wouldn't wear trousers during the summer".
_	Ludwig's behaviour was defended by the fact that it would correspond to political habits, to negotiate with the task of sovereignty or its restriction also over money payments, how often payments in the form of appanages or other donations to sovereigns were also agreed.
_	Harnick replied, "I can tell you I have no information as to the fact that remark was ever made.
_	Best provided evidence supporting the fact that strangers, contrary to popular belief, do not (with a single rare exception of an estranged father-son situation) and have never tampered with or poisoned the candy given to a trick-or-treater as far as records can provide.
_	Hildyard was supported, according to the University of Nottingham, by the 4th Duke of Newcastle under Lyne "in spite of the fact that Newcastle’s son, the Earl of Lincoln, was his opponent.
_	This constant revision reflected the fact that the book, with all its shortcomings, was the best encyclopedic account of operas from Gluck to Mascagni in existence.
_	This bias is in spite of the fact that larger prey are typically faster and choosing them results in less successful pursuits.
_	Despite the fact that intelligence stabilizes in early adulthood it is thought that genetic factors come to play more of a role in our intelligence during middle and old age and that the importance of the environment dissipates.
_	Hamoodur Rahman Commission though heavily criticized other senior military staff of Pakistan Army in East Pakistan at the time including confirmation of mass atrocities, cleared Ali citing the fact that he was not involved in any direct Military Operation due to the nature of his post which was mostly Administrative.
_	Snyder wrote that protocol dictated that Honorius address his correspondences to imperial officials, and the fact that he did not implies that the cities of Britain were now the highest Roman authority remaining on the island.
_	In this context, the use of French seemed to be on the decline despite the increased number of graduates of the educational system, which leads to the fact that much of French remains an important social indicator.
_	Combined with the fact that temperature is normally distributed, this agreed with the GBM equations described above, and the authors derived that formula_59 and formula_60.
_	At first, the fact that he was asked back to audition for the role had puzzled him, until he discovered the reason he had not cast for the previous parts—
_	Chris Carter had been unable to imagine Pileggi as any of those characters, due to the fact that the actor had been shaving his head.
_	The perpetrator has to be aware of the fact that the victim is unaware of an attack and is defenseless.
_	Holly is only capable of sustaining one hologram aboard the ship, due to the fact that the amount of energy required to power a hologram for one second could 'power the whole of Paris for three years', and for the majority of the series, that hologram is Arnold Rimmer.
_	Hasbro has been the target of many fans' anger over this situation, despite the fact that the company does not determine order sizes or distribution.
_	This system will be installed on the roof of a historical market building which according to Dario De Bortoli, Adelaide Solar City Program Manager, is a proof of the fact that solar power systems can be installed even in historical buildings without much renovation.
_	It allows the fact that real-world features are not mathematical points, and that their positions need not line up exactly for them to be considered in alignment.
_	In spite of the fact that they shared a joint call for personal dignity and responsive government, the upsets over these three nations reflected economic grievances and social progression.
_	Although the theatrical nature of these tours is similar to museum theatre in that it makes use of first person interpretation, the fact that these tours take place outside of traditional museum settings and requires the audience to move through urban environments makes this style of walking tour a genre of its own.
_	He got this nickname due to being primarily known for being involved in bank robberies in the Seattle area during the 1990s and the fact that he used acting disguises.
_	Accordingly, despite the fact that the Dahlin family had virtually no money, David enrolled in the University of South Dakota in Vermillion, South Dakota.
_	He is the earliest to draw attention to the fact that, as the deacons had a special celebration on St Stephen's day 26 December, the priests on St John the Evangelist's day 27 December, and again the choristers and mass-servers on the Feast of the Holy Innocents on 28 December, so the subdeacons were accustomed to hold their feast about the same time of year, but more particularly on the festival of the Circumcision.
_	One can intuitively understand overfitting from the fact that information from all past experience can be divided into two groups: information that is relevant for the future and irrelevant information ("noise").
_	However, the report highlighted the fact that this is likely to be just a local legend, as the quay was not constructed until 300 years after the event.
_	Satram, himself held high ambitions and was aware of the fact that as long as Purnananda Burhagohain exercised absolute control over state affairs, his ambitions will never be fulfilled.
_	Chen attributes the exodus to the end of Thatgamecompany's three-game contract, and to the fact that the company had run out of money to pay employees, mandating an unpaid hiatus until the revenue from "Journey" came in.
_	The name "live oak" comes from the fact that evergreen oaks remain green and "live" throughout winter, when other oaks are dormant and leafless.
_	A number of such these revolve around the fact that Singh had an extraordinary control over dribbling the ball.
_	When Rivers saw it, she was shocked to see that she was nowhere on the list despite the fact that she had been "The Tonight Show"'s permanent guest host since 1983.
_	Around 1831 Díaz encountered Théodore Rousseau, for whom he possessed a great veneration, despite the fact that Rousseau was four years younger.
_	Numismatists who support her point to the fact that Sinnock took his depiction of the Liberty Bell, which appears on the 1926 Sesquicentennial half dollar and Franklin half dollar (1948–1963), from another designer without giving credit.
_	The name 'Ember' was chosen to reflect the fact that research and science often move slowly, and their benefits or impacts may not be apparent for years or more.
_	He admires the fact that his friend has kept his youthful appearance over the time that he has known him.
_	The area has been substantial for the communications from Finland to Sweden, shown for instance by the fact that, as early as in the 17th century, mail delivery from Finland to Sweden went through the lands of Grönvik.
_	Responding to these comments, Amonkar has stated that this reputation perhaps derives from her insistence that performers be treated respectfully, and to the fact that she chooses to spend time before her concerts in solitude and preparation instead of socializing with fellow musicians.
_	However, Spain continued to resent the loss of its fleet at Trafalgar and the fact that it was forced to join the Continental System.
_	In 1701, Frederick William's son and successor Frederick I reached the consent of Emperor Leopold I to proclaim himself a King "in" Prussia at Königsberg, with respect to the fact that he still held the electoral dignity of Brandenburg and the royal title was only valid in the Prussian lands outside the Empire.
_	What is most interesting about the poem, however, is not the fact that it depicts the city with photographic accuracy, but that it acts as a guide to the upper, and upper-middle class walkers of society.
_	As part of the settlement, 21st Century Fox apologized to Carlson, saying that "We sincerely regret and apologize for the fact that Gretchen was not treated with the respect and dignity that she and all of our colleagues deserve."
_	Newman is the leading ground gainer in the American League, despite the fact that he is with a second division club."
_	The reason is related to the fact that the society of Kafaraka was a farmer’s entity, where only poor Christian peasants working in a land owned by government or princes.
_	But it was hampered by the fact that the station was on a Class-A FM signal.
_	This is further complicated by the fact that these ships were jumboized in the 1960s, together with , , and , for some then comprising the "Ashtabula" class - sometimes with or without the "Mispillion"s.
_	If the spacecraft is meant to be able to return to its point of launch "on command", then some sort of maneuvering will be required to counteract the fact that the Earth is turning under the spacecraft as it flies.
_	After the overthrow and murder of Madero by Victoriano Huerta, he complained about the fact that Huerta had annulled the elections for the Congress of Mexico, since he had just planned to be a candidate in that election.
_	It has its origin in a seal of the Siberia Khanate representing a sable and showcasing the fact that Siberia (or rather Yugra) was the main source of sable fur throughout the Middle Ages.
_	He remarked that he had become fed up with the "interference" from the show's producers and the fact that certain guests had appeared on air while under the influence of the illicit drug cocaine.
_	However, some scientists continued to voice their support in spite of Galton's and Weismann's results: notably, in 1900 Karl Pearson wrote that pangenesis "is no more disproved by the statement that ‘gemmules have not been found in the blood,’ than the atomic theory is disproved by the fact that no atoms have been found in the air."
_	San Franciscans considered this change to be "a slight on their city in favor of Los Angeles," despite the fact that Rowe's version was not at all to be interpreted as representing the City of Angels.
_	Oliver Sava of "The A.V. Club" praised that the fact that she is one "of this show’s most tragic characters".
_	It went on to appreciate Gaga's vocals and the fact that she did not lip-synch, as well as the hurried costume changes, while commending the "raw" nature of the show.
_	This was due to the fact that his strongest events overlapped with those of Paul Hamm and Morgan Hamm, and the team needed gymnasts who were stronger in other disciplines.
_	In spite of the fact that a number of members of the panel of judges were men ill-disposed to Arnold over actions and disputes earlier in the war, Arnold was cleared of all but two minor charges on January 26, 1780.
_	Another change from the F404 is the fact that the first three stages of the high-pressure compressor are blisks rather than dovetailed blades, saving in weight.
_	This proof relies on the fact that zero is the only nonnegative number that is less than all inverses of integers, or equivalently that there is no number that is larger than every integer.
_	(This is implied by the fact that implies ).
_	She was enabled to accomplish this through the fact that the physicians and women of Chicago were ready to sustain her, and the other fact that her position as a sanitary inspector of the health department made her an officer of the police force, thus giving her authority for any work she found necessary to do.
_	The most direct evidence for ROS as a defense mechanism is the fact that many icthyotoxic algae produce greater concentrations of ROS than nonichthyotoxic strains.
_	When Emerson exposed green plants to differing wavelengths of light, he noticed that at wavelengths of greater than 680 nm the efficiency of photosynthesis decreased abruptly despite the fact that this is a region of the spectrum where chlorophyll still absorbs light (chlorophyll is the green pigment in plants - it absorbs mainly the red and blue wavelengths from light, leaving the green light to bounce back and hit our eyes).
_	In a school funding system enacted in 1994, Michigan school funding entirely originates from the state, so despite the fact that Bloomfield Hills has a property rich tax base, the decrease in enrollment forced the district into an operating loss.
_	The album was officially released to listen by Green Day on the Rolling Stone website on November 6. Initial vinyl copies of "¡Dos!" feature "Drama Queen" (from "¡Tré!") instead of "Stray Heart" due to the fact that they were pressed before the two tracks were swapped.
_	This process takes advantage of the fact that a single bacterial cell can be induced to take up and replicate a single recombinant DNA molecule.
_	In terms of preservation of social network, while URA has made provisions to enhance such efforts, given the fact that all the residents and commercial operators have left the site without any existing explicit arrangement for their return, the chance of re-establishing such social network was uncertain.
_	The difference was due to the fact that the brick walls finished in line with the top of the roof slab, covering the fascia, whereas the concrete walls finished at the soffit of the roof slab, flush with the fascia.
_	He also pointed to the fact that it was for the first time that Muslim students will receive education in Cuba.
_	Although unlikely, due to the fact that the core countries rely on the exploitation of the periphery, there have been pushes for core countries to help better the periphery countries.
_	This is partly confirmed by the fact that the earliest archaeological remains found at the site (fortification walls around the acropolis and the foundations of a temple) date no later than the 6th century BCE.
_	The Army paid him for the leave at an enlisted man's pay rate, despite the fact that he'd been an officer while accruing the leave, and Bouck was furious.
_	Russell's fragmented family life is evidenced by the fact that he does not appear with them on any census record, save in 1860.
_	On January 23, 1996, the Clash acquired US national team star Eric Wynalda, despite the fact that Wynalda and Calloway did not get along during their time together with the Hawks.
_	As time goes on he loses much of his memory (perhaps even his sanity), the only thing he has a clear memory of is of the faces of his human tormentors, and the fact that he was betrayed by someone close to him.
_	They also criticized the fact that Le "et al." violated ICZN
_	The defining characteristics separating members of this tribe from others within the family are a dimorphism of the cypselae and the fact that each cypselae lacks a pappus.
_	The Queen was shocked and thought the speech ""almost communistic"" and went on to attribute Rosebery's ""shocking and disappointing"" behaviour to the fact that ""poor Lady Rosebery is not there to keep him back.""
_	The whole matter is complicated by the fact that there was a high percentage of bilingual and similarly "Slovak-Hungarian" persons who could claim being both Slovak and Hungarian.
_	The location may have had a certain meaning for Beckett-the-person but Beckett-the-writer chose it more for its geographical features, the two rivers merging into one and also the fact that a smaller version of the Statue of Liberty stands on the isle representing the literal New World that Ohio is part of and the metaphorical new world that Listener moves to.
_	The greatest disparity comes from the fact that married women or those in common law marriages still earn disproportiante wages compared to men in the same scenario.
_	Stamler's curfew, prohibiting takeoffs or landings by jets after 9:00 PM and before 7:00 AM most days and limiting flights by jets to a two-hour window on Sundays, was overturned by Superior Court Judge Gordon L. Brown who found Stamler's curfew to be in conflict with a decision made by the United States Supreme Court earlier that year in the case of "City of Burbank v. Lockheed Air Terminal, Inc." in which the court rejected a similar curfew imposed by the city of Burbank, California on Hollywood Burbank Airport limiting overnight flights on the basis of the fact that airports were subject to federal oversight by the Federal Aviation Administration under the terms of the Noise Control Act of 1972.
_	As Hannover and Bielefeld fans have affinities as well, all three clubs are sometimes called the "Nordallianz" ("Northern Alliance") despite the fact that the city of Bielefeld is not technically located in Northern Germany.
_	On 15 March 2008 he was deemed to be Venerable after Pope Benedict XVI acknowledged the fact that Lorgna had lived a life of heroic virtue.
_	This despite the fact that the qualification, workplace performances and other relevant characteristics of the fictitious job applicants were held constant and only their parental status varied.
_	spherical and of uniform density formula_1, and the fact that within a
_	Overlooking Windermere itself is Claife Station, the ruins of a residence notable for the fact that each room was glazed in differing coloured glass to give the effect of viewing the landscape in the changing seasons.
_	Despite being heavily outnumbered and aware of the fact that there is no way out, the NPA's second-in-charge ties a bandanna around his forehead while reminding his remaining soldiers about their slogan; never giving up even in the toughest of situations.
_	He is nonetheless comforted by the fact that Ashoke, prior to his death, finally told his son why he had chosen that name for him.
_	The meaningfulness of their role in the process is secured by the fact that no candidate will be able to achieve a majority of delegates even by the end of the third group's vote in May.
_	These benefits accrue over a period of 35 years and result from increased lifetime earnings, based upon the fact that youth tried in the juvenile rather than the adult system will be free of the burden of a criminal record that suppresses earning potential."
_	It is not known why these restrictions are in place, considering the fact that the city centre is not on the approach path to the airport.
_	Part of the failure can be attributed to the fact that unlike the Anglo-American rock-n-roll culture, the Russian song tradition heavily emphasizes lyrical complexity over hooks or drive, which reinforces the not entirely fair comparisons between BG and Dylan.
_	One reason for this interest is the fact that BEC are up to now the only method for the determination of sizes and lifetimes of sources of elementary particles.
_	Substantial variations between annual (AADT) and summer (ASDT) traffic volumes are attributed to the fact that the bridge carries substantial tourist traffic to the Adriatic resorts.
_	The club, though, received nothing for Rocca's services, which was quite absurd, considering the fact that the Kangaroos were able to draft him with the 34th selection in the 2000 National Draft.
_	Examples of shipwrecks discovered off the island’s coast (e.g. the Kyrenia ship) plus evidence of ancient ports (e.g. Amathus) give proof to the fact that Cyprus was a major seafaring player in antiquity and located along important trade routes.
_	As a result of being out, the school no longer hides the fact that it is a school for mutants and it opens its doors for more mutant (and even human) students to come in.
_	Despite the fact that the Norroena Society has been recognized as a federation of learned men, Professor Andrew Wawn questions the existence of an actual society.
_	The most common criticism of these editions is the fact that they were considered inexpensive or abridged reprints of earlier works with little new added to the content.
_	Like Dr. X, he has had many different looks, but is easily characterized by his pale green skin and the fact that his left eye is bigger than his right.
_	The phenomenon consists in the fact that when gamma-quanta pass through the medium with polarized electrons, their polarization plane rotates due to spin-spin interaction of the electrons and photons.
_	According to Huxley, the fact that all the members of the club gained distinction within science was merely coincidental.
_	This factor was a commonality on long circuits, but the weather at Spa was always more unpredictable than other long circuits, combined with the fact that it was an ultra-high speed track with all but one corner (La Source) being extremely high speed made it one of, if not the, most dangerous race track in the world.
_	Combined with the fact that organic products are now sold predominantly through high volume distribution channels such as supermarkets, the concern is that the market is evolving to favor the biggest producers, and this could result in the small organic farmer being squeezed out.
_	On myths, Clastres said, "The rite is the religious mediation between myth and society: but, for structuralist analysis, the difficulty stems from the fact that rites do not reflect upon each other.
_	In "Dune Messiah" (1969) Herbert explains that the planet's name (a spelling pronunciation of the Roman numeral IX) is derived from the fact that it is the ninth planet of its sun.
_	If Elizabeth had made this proposal in 1378, after Catherine's death, the fact that the French king and the Hungarian king did not recognise the same pope would have presented a problem.
_	Taima seemed to be a better mother this time, and no notable occurrences of aggression were reported; this may be in part due to the fact that Kalina acted as "aunt" to Malia and helped Taima to look after her.
_	Cocker felt that the game's soundtrack was enjoyable for fans of electronica, although he liked the fact that players could import their own playlists to the game, an aspect he thought that introduced more variation.
_	According to British criminal Colin Blaney in his autobiography 'Undesirables', groups of English thieves have frequently targeted the nation in the past due to the fact its citizens are relatively wealthy and the fact that they are naïve about crime due to the country's low crime rate.
_	Valentim is fondly remembered by the Boca Juniors fans for the fact that he scored 10 goals in 7 Superclásico games against their fiercest rivals River Plate.
_	In the first century of Dutch (VOC) dominance the cultural influence of the Portuguese Indo population continued as can be seen by the fact that Portuguese Malay mix languages remained in existence well into the second century of the VOC era and autonomous Portuguese Indo groups existed into the 19th century.
_	In reviewing "Persona 4 Golden", Destructoid's Dale North revealed he was not a fan of Fitzgerald's voice, due in part to the fact that he preferred Yui Horie, Chie's Japanese voice actress.
_	Their polite conversation quickly turned into an argument about whether Miller Lite beer’s best aspect was its taste or the fact that it was less filling than other beers.
_	Factors for the change of name of these people from Jurchen to Manchu include the fact that the term "Jurchen" had negative connotations since the Jurchens had been in a servile position to the Ming dynasty for several hundred years, and it also referred to people of the "dependent class".
_	It is commonly called a satellite suburb of Tamworth because of its closeness and the fact that its residents use Tamworth's services.
_	On two occasions, Cloke kicked five majors (round six and round 21) highlighting the fact that with a supportive cast in the forward line, the centre-half forward is capable of being a key scoring threat.
_	It is also distinguished by the fact that it was a converted building, which differed from the usual practice of purpose built court houses.
_	Finally, he insisted that the series was always going to be in a regular size format, and has hypothesized that the "giant-size" story was put forward to cover up the fact that the team was missing deadlines.
_	Similarly, reflecting the fact that George Chuvalo was renowned for his ability to take punches (he was not once knocked down in his career), it is physically impossible to knock him down in the game (even if the player continuously punches him in the stomach for 15 rounds).
_	"At that moment, I [couldn't] get past the fact that I didn’t make the Olympic team", he later commented.
_	It also supports counterfactual history—asking "what if" and considering different possible paths that social evolution may take or might have taken, and thus allows for the fact that various cultures may develop in different ways, some skipping entire stages others have passed through.
_	Due to the fact that Gorin is a relatively not very wide river and that the barges do not carry the tug, either on the shallow or close to the shore, a certain cargo was attached to the last barga, i.e. "Dragons", which stretched the bottom of Gorin.
_	Probably their Latin name was due to the fact that one hundred men (one hundred is said in Latin ""centum"") worked each fortified farm, under the orders of a former centurion.
_	While being recognised as a rare example of an active reformer in contemporary Austrian politics, his governments were also highly controversial from the beginning, starting with the fact that he formed a coalition government with Jörg Haider's Freedom Party of Austria (FPÖ) on both occasions.
_	Its walls are strengthened with rectangular projecting towers, pointing to the fact that it was one of the earlier castles constructed by crusaders, it was only later on in the crusades that the transition to round towers in the curtain wall was made to help with visibility.
_	Descendants of Auda abu Tayi and the real Sherif Ali went further, suing Columbia despite the fact that the film's Ali was fictional.
_	That there was a time during the civilised period when there was no significant occupation at all on the present site is strongly suggested by the fact that the main road from Dufton to Blencarn by-passes the modern village entirely, running to the south between the modern green and the church.
_	Despite the fact that inexperienced trainees (who were mainly woman) were eager to work, on the job their pace was slow, their output was too low and the turnover was enormously high.
_	Mary McAleese called the abuse "an atrocious betrayal of love", saying: "My heart goes out to the victims of this terrible injustice, an injustice compounded by the fact that they had to suffer in silence for so long."
_	Despite the fact that he is politically liberal, in "Buckley", Bogus still acknowledges that he admires him for the wit and personality he displayed during his life.
_	For instance the fact that any element should compare equal to itself allows using them as sentinel value for efficiency reasons, and if this is the case, a random comparison function would break the sorting algorithm.
_	(a) The separation of teaching from research is bad, especially for teaching: the fact that a degree is offered in, for example, Pharmacology without a Pharmacology department to support it, means that there is no guarantee that there will be staff qualified or fully motivated to teach it.
_	Concerned about John's behavior, Jeremy tries to talk some sense into him by reminding him that his last attempts to speak to her has failed and that he needs to accept the fact that it's over.
_	Sky became victorious with a win over Kim's latest contender Madison Rayne, Sky put the company on notice of her rematch clause as a former Knockout Champion and the fact that she didn't receive her rematch against Kim since losing the title at the Turning Point PPV on November 13.
_	By the middle of the 20th century, Catholics had gone to great lengths to develop their own educational system and were expected to support it, so the fact that the school was founded with a view to sending its alumni to non-Catholic colleges was something of a departure for the time.
_	Some sources attribute the raid to American support for Carranza, while others point to the fact that some Columbus residents had cheated Villa out of money he had paid for armaments.
_	Mandard's reporting of the Cofidis doping scandal had left scars, despite the fact that Tournant had not been involved.
_	Asked what had hurt him the most after the cancellation of "Comedy Nights with Kapil" by Colors TV, Sharma said: "I am only hurt by the fact that they (Colors TV) removed the show from YouTube.
_	Kabardian uses for labialization, as ӏу . гу is , though г is ); ку is , despite the fact that к is not used outside loan words.
_	Some of that charm lay in the fact that personal ambition was wholly lacking in his character and, though everything he undertook in a diversity of fields he tackled with spectacular ability, the limelight was anathema to him.
_	This was despite the fact that Chahine changed the names of all of the characters and stripped the story of all its supernatural and miraculous elements.
_	He uses the fact that Harrington's "arch republican"
_	His family opposed this action and claimed the hospital's decision was related to the fact that Nikolouzos's Medicare funding was running out, a contention denied by the hospital.
_	Despite having been accepted as a member of the Rohan family, several genealogical books note the fact that the Rohans fail to mention this child again.
_	All multi-tenors based on the four-drum configuration are called "quads" despite the fact that there may be a total of five or six drums counting the shot drums.
_	Hergé biographer Pierre Assouline asserted that the strip was "completely opposite in spirit" to Hergé's preceding "Tintin in the Land of the Soviets", due to the fact that it was "utterly lacking in ambiguity or cynicism."
_	Sometime between 1894 and 1905, the name of the station was changed to Wakefield, despite the fact that Washingtonville still existed as a neighborhood in the Bronx at the time.
_	Meanwhile, Homer himself is troubled by the fact that his so-called heroism was nothing but luck, and his gloomy mood deepens when he receives a congratulatory phone call from Magic Johnson, who tells Homer "People like that are eventually exposed as the frauds they are".
_	The case also alludes to the fact that "Alpine Investments v Minister van Financiën" provides a similar test for services, and "Gebhard v Consiglio dell'Ordine degli Avvocati e Procuratori di Milano" for establishment.
_	The incident drew attention to the fact that an all-female prison was necessary.
_	Malta, a signatory to the Protocol 1 to the European Convention on Human Rights, made a declaration saying that it accepts the protocol's article 2 (on parents' right to have their children educated in line with their religious or philosophical views) only insofar "as it is compatible with the provision of efficient instruction and training, and the avoidance of unreasonable public expenditure, having regard to the fact that the population of Malta is overwhelmingly Roman Catholic".
_	Despite the fact that Barbara was thirty-four and the groom was forty-two, it was the first marriage for both of them.
_	Their households, as well as that of Han Yuan (who would have suffered execution as well but for the fact that he had already died by the time that executioners arrived at his place of exile), were confiscated to become servants.
_	He quickly became more interested in social rather than Irish nationalist issues and in 1937 decided to volunteer for the International Brigades, motivated in part by the fact that his friend and IRA veteran Kit Conway had been killed in action in the Battle of Jarama on Doyle’s 21st birthday.
_	The modern history of legislation affecting pawnbroking begins, however, in 1800, when the act of ~9 & 40 Geo. III. c. 99 (1800) was passed, in great measure by the influence of Lord Eldon, who never made any secret of the fact that, when he was a young barrister without briefs, he had often been indebted to the timely aid of the pawnshop.
_	On 6 November Jordan is forced to operate on a bulimic patient in spite of the fact that he is not supposed to, at the end of a shift in a meeting with Henry and reveals that he intends to return to surgery.
_	The gravel chub is considered a threatened species in many areas mostly due to the fact that it has a highly specific, clean habitat need.
_	In 1993 a man named Augustus da Silva Peixoto (b. 1947) was admitted into the shelter despite the fact that he was not meant to be there at all; he became obsessed with Oliveira and began to harass her despite her best efforts to keep her distance from him while treating him like she did the others.
_	Given the fact that the positions of government officials were not threatened by China's previous efforts to shatter the iron rice bowl, and that workers at SOE's experienced disproportionate unemployment, scholars predict that there is possibility that the unbalance could lead to public dissatisfaction with the government.
_	Marth's lab further discovered relationships between aberrant glycan linkages and autoimmune diseases including the fact that alterations of glycan linkages could initiate chronic inflammation in the development of autoimmunity.
_	However, despite the fact that they had already seen horses, seeing Spanish knights in full regalia proved to have shock value, as the warriors had never seen such in open battle.
_	But her father's return to Canada saw her get homesick but believed her studies would take her mind off it plus the fact that she had to learn English.
_	The task is not made any easier by the fact that the race runs through some of the busiest roads in Tyneside during the early evening rush hour - close cooperation between local councils, police, and local residents ensures that everyone still manages to have a great night out.
_	Martin, Rebeca's neighbor and childhood friend, will also join this love triangle to fight for Rebeca's love, despite the fact that Rebeca only views him as a brother.
_	The Court held that federal and provincial laws can complement one another, and the fact that Canadian banks are federally chartered does not confer sweeping immunity from provincial laws:
_	...[T]he Communist Party of Great Britain had to call attention to the fact that the Labour Government, while talking of its attachment to the cause of peace, was continuing the policy of previous imperialist governments.
_	There is some confusion over the fact that the Lord Lyon King of Arms addresses correspondents by their name followed by "Esq." in correspondence, namely on letters.
_	Such natural kinds provide a natural ground for inductive inference by virtue of the fact that our innate inferential tendencies (as revealed by empirical psychology) are structured in a way that assumes a world of natural kinds, and, thereby, tend to provide us with accurate beliefs about the world in environment populated by such natural kinds.
_	Despite the fact that there are millions of eMule clients, there are only several hundred servers.
_	The additional patterns addressed the fact that the blue and grey Type I pattern was not meant for a tactical environment.
_	In order to woo her, Taylor joins her Alcoholics Anonymous meetings to hopefully connect with her, despite the fact that Taylor has never had a drink in his life.
_	With the revelation that Katherine was pregnant with Vulcan at the time D'Ken abducted her and the fact that he killed her soon after ripping Vulcan out of her womb, the Adam X scenario remains conjecture.
_	Unlike his father, Speed doesn't get into any perilous trouble of fighting thugs and gang members, therefore instead of fighting (due to the fact that he doesn't know hand-to-hand combat), Speed uses his racing skill to get away from bad guys.
_	This book was banned in 2007 with 7 other books to the fact that his dogged persistence in promoting open and fair elections had incurred the wrath of the Central Propaganda Department.
_	Despite the fact that "The White Stag" was a Newbery Medal winner and "The Good Master" was named an Honor book, a number of reviewers consider "The Good Master" to be Seredy's best book, preferring it over "The White Stag".
_	The next year, thanks to the fact that the Cardinal-Infante shifted the focus of his campaign to the French border in that year, Frederick Henry managed to recapture Breda with a relatively small force, at the successful fourth Siege of Breda, (21 July–11 October 1637).
_	These economies were pushed through despite the fact that the economic situation in the Republic had improved appreciably in the 1630s, following the economic slump of the 1620s caused by the Spanish embargoes.
_	The name stems from the fact that the ring generated by the functions in such a chain is Noetherian.
_	The apparent reason for his protests was the fact that he was next in age, after Crown Prince Sultan; the new succession arrangement is based on merit, rather than age.
_	The title is a word play on the fact that the piece was written for the string trio Time for Three.
_	It receives an average annual rainfall of approximately , despite the fact that it lies relatively close to the Indian Ocean.
_	He explains about the Alliance naquadria bomb and the fact that the bomb squad can't get in.
_	The name comes from the fact that the shape of each arm of the cross was thought to resemble a paw (French "patte").
_	Many people including Mike Ditka have claimed that the reason for this was due to the fact that the Patriots' defensive scheme was centered on stopping Payton.
_	Some of this is encouraged, as for example the inclusion of ethnicity maps that are known to have biases and inaccuracies based in part on the fact that people's identities are complex and constantly shifting, rarely conforming to precisely configured spaces.
_	The addition of Mercutio into the fray increases the tension, and Tybalt is seen as a slightly more peaceful character than in previous versions, as Mercutio is disgusted by the fact that Tybalt continues to search for a quarrel with Romeo, when Romeo is trying to bring peace between them.
_	This decision was motivated by the fact that Armstrong had become cold and vindictive toward him.
_	The legal question was whether the exercise of Mrs Orpen’s "power of appointment" in favour of Mr Orpen, in terms of her father’s will, was valid, and whether her spouse’s deceased estate had obtained vested rights with regard to the twenty per cent trust capital that she bequeathed to him, regardless of the fact that she died before her father.
_	The construction was complicated by the fact that the ground in the area is soft, and the dam was built with certain angle to the riverbed, so that the water pressure pushed it to the ground.
_	"Crazy on You" attracted attention both for the relatively unusual combination of an acoustic guitar paired with an electric guitar, and the fact that the acoustic guitarist was a woman – a rarity in rock music during that time.
_	In the fact that a person should have the reality of his being, as a particular human being, directly before God, and accordingly, again, and by the same token, that man’s sin should be of concern of God.
_	and accept the fact that not every belief worth our attention and instead we should focus on good values that makes us better family, friend, neighbor and thus human.
_	This is supported by the fact that all slabs under ~50 Ma. However, there are cases where aseismic ridges on the same scale as the Nazca Ridge are subducting normally, and cases where flat slabs are not associated with bathymetric highs.
_	One of the key factors in including high capacity loops in the Triennial Remand Order is the fact that it was one of the few elements that the D.C. Circuit did not vacate in their order in "USTA v. FCC".
_	Since every minister was also a subscription agent, the fact that Minister George Whitfield was listed as the book’s agent was customary of Wesley’s system.
_	The law that a bribe is not necessarily monetary was be derived from the fact that does not say: “And you shall take no profit.”
_	Reviewing "Songs of Innocence", Alexis Petridis of "The Guardian" said, "You might detect a certain whiff of desperation in the fact that parts of the album sound distinctly like Coldplay", citing the resemblance that the guitar line to "Every Breaking Wave" has to a melody from Coldplay's song "Paradise".
_	And the fact that Tezcan falls in love with the American lieutenant Angel, makes the situation by far more complicated.
_	The value of the project lies in the fact that someone completely independent from the subject or the Catholic Church, and who is an agnostic, is portraying Josemaría according to his own view."
_	It is widely agreed a more dire emergency could have resulted had the weather not been so accommodating during the entire salvage process, especially in light of the fact that the "LeConte" was already listing ten degrees and the tides in Peril Strait were already making the situation highly precarious.
_	This was a consequence of the fact that the Lutheran reformation warmly welcomed music.
_	It was the responsibility of the Mayor of Aberystwyth to deliver the poll books to the count at Cardigan and controversy arose from the fact that the Mayor, R.O. Powell, was not only a supporter of Harford but also the brother of Colonel Powell, the Conservative member for Cardiganshire who had recently been return unopposed.
_	This is possible due to the fact that kernel modules and loadable drivers have direct access to the kernel memory from its privileged access.
_	He was certainly not as highly regarded in Venice as in the other towns where he worked, for he had a stylistic individuality, even an idiosyncratic style and, after his death, he gradually became neglected and then almost forgotten; this could be attributed to the fact that his oeuvre now remains in lesser known churches or in provincial museums.
_	Memphis has an Egyptian name, in reference to the fact that early slab serifs were often called "Egyptians" as an exoticism by nineteenth-century typefounders.
_	"Official Xbox Magazine" criticized the fact that the game only comes equipped with two modes and four arenas.
_	It illustrates the fact that an extra dose of caution is needed in doing analysis on infinite-dimensional spaces as compared to finite-dimensional ones.
_	As part of the 2007 restructuring, a controversial plan was put into action to reduce the workforce by 4,855 through attrition and retirement incentives, in spite of the fact that RTVE is the European public broadcasting service with the smallest workforce.
_	Rip even explains his reasons involving business with him ending with the fact that some of it was Reed Thimple's idea.
_	Because Albrecht was only born in the year before his father's death and the fact that there were substantial religious disputes between the guardians, the guardianship could only be terminated in 1608.
_	Some confusion remains about the relationship between social liberalism and socialism, despite the fact that many variants of socialism distinguish themselves markedly from liberalism by opposing capitalism, hierarchy and private property.
_	However, the past tense of both imperfective and perfective in modern East Slavic languages inflects by gender and number rather than the person due to the fact that the present tense conjugations of the copula "to be" (Russian "быть", Ukrainian "бути", Belorussian "быць") have practically fallen out of use.
_	According to a Harvard Business School case study, Neopets, Inc. had reached profitability four months after launching operations, "largely due to the fact that it spends nothing for customer acquisition, relying strictly on word-of-mouth," and as of July 2001, the site was ranked #4 in "stickiness".
_	It is positioned considerably lower than the road to its front, witness to the fact that the road has been resurfaced a number of times during the lifetime of the pub.
_	However, despite the fact that Gojong and his Queen Consort brought the Korean economy to an acceptable level to the West, modern manufacturing facilities did not emerge due to a political interruption: the assassination of the Queen Consort.
_	And I'm prouder of that than the fact that the government decided to give me the Medal of Honor.
_	Although the XJR-12s did not manage to win, Jaguar's decision not to run the untested XJR-14 was vindicated by the fact that Peugeot's 905 failed to finish the race.
_	According to Kumarila, the two truths doctrine is an idealist doctrine, which conceals the fact that "the theory of the nothingness of the objective world" is absurd:
_	Navasish and his wife who had been trying to conceive takes Pakeeza in after accepting the fact that her husband has betrayed her and decided to care for the child herself.
_	The "69/96" in the title derives from the fact that Oswald created the recordings represented therein between 1969 and 1996.
_	Its nickname originates from the fact that it was set aflame and burned almost to the ground during an uprising in 1875.
_	Shinrei deduces that he is the Sendai Aka no Ou based on the fact that he claims to have sent Kyo out into the world years ago and that he has the power to destroy Hishigi's Taishirou barrier.
_	This reduction in political power is demonstrated by the fact that he was able to holding an office only after the sudden death of the king, when he served as ispán ("comes") of Pozsony County between 1272 and 1273.
_	Despite the fact that Web of Night has not been released commercially in the U.S., the song has been performed by T.M.Revolution both in Baltimore at OTAKON2003 and in Anaheim Pacific Media Expo in 2004.
_	Of significance is the fact that Fiann achieved 3 overall speed records in purely man-powered boats against open-class boats, that are advantaged by partly wind-supported designs on a Trade Winds routes.
_	The skit is based on the fact that Freeman starred in the British series of "The Office" as Tim Canterbury.
_	Maile stated in a 2011 Warped Tour interview that his favorite song off "The Verge" was "BLU", due to the fact that it is the band's first ballad and the piano as the lead instrument for the first time.
_	Due to their near flat topography and the fact that the water speed is slow in the shallows of the point bar they are popular rest stops for boaters and rafters.
_	It is true that he always recognized the importance of the organization of individual life and the 'development of a wealth of individual forms' (GS, III, p. 358), but he stressed the fact that 'self-education can only be continued […] in the wider context of development of the world' (GS, VII, p. 33).
_	made a posting to his personal blog indicating his displeasure at the fact that the band had altered his original artwork submission.
_	Further controversy was fueled by the fact that Dempsey left the ring at the end of the first round, thinking the fight was over.
_	Ponzi's good fortune was increased by the fact that just below this favorable article, which seemed to imply that Ponzi was indeed returning 50% return on investment after only 45 days, was a bank advertisement that stated that the bank was paying 5% returns annually.
_	Molly is a colorful character all right, and the screen, which is as wide as can be, is filled with vivid colors that help project the fact that this is merely a satisfying musical comedy and not an inspired subject."
_	States that have legalized abortions and easier access to abortions have lower rates of child neglect and better living conditions for children overall; this may be attributed to the fact that children in those states are more likely to be "wanted" when they are born.
_	Despite the fact that there was no issue of legality ever raised, and, although several other cabinet members of the Syriza administration had been receiving the same subsidy benefit, her media character assassination was based on the argument that she was 'rich and did not need it'.
_	This is most likely derived from the fact that they produce and sell death sticks, addictive and eventually fatal drugs distilled from balo mushrooms, which are farmed in large quantities underground.
_	The 4:1 mechanical advantage afforded to the single engine driving in first gear was cancelled out by the fact that there was only one engine operating, so the maximum output torque from the transmission was the same as was available in top gear with all four engines operating.
_	Whenever Charlotte came to see them she concluded her to be anticipating the hour of possession; and whenever she spoke in a low voice to Mr. Collins, was convinced that they were talking of the Longbourn estate, and resolving to turn herself and her daughters out of the house as soon as Mr. Bennet were dead""), all before Mr. Bennet is 'cold in his grave' (despite the fact that Mr. Bennet is healthy); completely ignoring the fact that this is exactly what she herself (and Lady Lucas) would be doing if she was in Charlotte Lucas' situation.
_	This is due to the fact that the KE supplement contains >99% of the D-βHB-isoform while the KS supplement contains ~50% of the L-βHB-isoform, which is metabolized much slower than the D-βHB-isoform.
_	However, they don't know that when a gatekeeper dies he is replaced by his future self, and so they ignore the fact that Jamie has replaced Sapling.
_	Federal supporters of tenant management did not publicize the fact that most of Cochran residents remained poor and lived on welfare throughout the decades of Gilkey's tenure.
_	This had seemed logical to the Dorchester Terminal, due to the fact that the Metra Electric District and South Shore Line both share a station along the IC ROW, at 63rd Street.
_	However, Wadi as-Seer's outer neighborhoods do not affect the culture of the area, due to the fact that a high percentage of the population is low-income, unlike the rich and wealthy inhabitants of Abdoun and Sweifieh.
_	He clashes with his liaison officer, Lieutenant Commander Robert Yarrow (Dennis O'Keefe), over the fact that his men are not allowed to arm themselves against the Japanese.
_	Development of a supplementation strategy should take into consideration the fact that vitamin A supplementation was less effective in reducing diarrhea incidence when compared to vitamin A and zinc supplementation, and that the latter strategy was estimated to be significantly more cost effective.
_	Allegations that Silkwood's exposure to plutonium-239 was a deliberate act of radiation poisoning are fueled by the fact that she was in possession of potentially compromising evidence that linked Kerr-McGee with egregious safety violations, encompassing unsafe workplace conditions at the plant, faulty manufacture of fuel rod components that posed a potential public safety risk, and even substantial missing plutonium supplies that were unaccounted for; Silkwood also contended that she had evidence that photographs containing evidence of hairline cracks in the fuel rods may have been doctored by company personnel as a cover-up.
_	You might not be able to pay for health care or your insurance, but if you have an app on your phone that alerts you to the fact that you need to exercise more, or you aren't eating healthily enough, they think they are solving the problem.
_	Also, "in exercising the function of selecting incidents to make an artistic production, Longfellow ... omitted all that aspect of the Manabozho saga which considers the culture hero as a trickster," this despite the fact that Schoolcraft had already diligently avoided what he himself called "vulgarisms."
_	Pallante bemoans the fact that Clarindo and Dalinda can have each other, but he can never have his love, Princess Cleria of Cyprus (Darete's sister), who spurns him although he rescued her.
_	Kara is written as eager to take up a position at the right hand of Superman, but Superman thinks she is too young and unready, despite the fact that she and Jimmy Olsen, who struck up a friendship at once, were critical in ferreting out an early connection between Intergang and Granny Goodness.
_	The Republican Party did not put up a top-tier candidate, acknowledging that they were not even focusing on the race This is highlighted in the fact that the Republican nominee was the founder of an anti-illegal-immigration group, running in a district that is one-quarter Hispanic.
_	Despite the fact that their initial formation centered around turning praise and worship songs into ska the album faced criticism for "jumping on the bandwagon" on praise and worship music's growing commercial appeal.
_	The previous day, Sánchez received a note from the award committee explaining the decision, quoting rule fifteen of the 87th Academy Award Rules, noting "the fact that the film also contains over a half an hour of non-original (mostly classical) music cues that are featured very prominently in numerous pivotal moments in the film made it difficult for the committee to accept your submission".
_	For the 2012-2014 legislative term, Smith served as the Senate Democratic Leader, and, by virtue of the fact that his party was in the minority, the Minority Leader of the Senate.
_	His sweet, rich colour between 1921 and 1924 was unashamedly artificial, and is itself symptomatic of the fact that his return to lucid representation did not mean a return to nature approached naturalistically...
_	An editorial complained that the website had attempted to discredit Ken Livingstone's Conservative challenger Boris Johnson by highlighting the fact that the far-right British National Party had called on its supporters to cast a second-preference vote for Johnson.
_	Opponents also question the fact that authoritarian Belarus was a member of the World Organization of the Scout Movement, against WOSM's stated guidelines, while democratic neighbor Ukraine is not a WOSM member.
_	This is mainly due to the fact that contemporaries did not care for the maternal side of families concentrating more on the males – hence the name of her mother is unknown.
_	In his introduction, Melicson, himself a well informed architect, attracted his readers' attention on the fact that Le Corbusier was not the only a great architect of the period contributing to the formation of a new architectural vision.
_	There is general accord among scientists that high precipitation a week prior to the failure contributed to the conditions at failure, but the 5 day delay between the rain and the landslide, and the fact that Southern Leyte regularly gets high overall levels of precipitation means that the precise nature of that contribution is unknown.
_	Clubmans were still delivered on cross-ply tyres despite the fact that by 1970 radials had become the norm for the car's mainstream competitors.
_	In early testing of 64-bit support in Adobe Photoshop CS4, overall performance gains ranged from 8% to 12%, due to the fact that 64-bit applications could address larger amounts of memory and thus resulted in less file swapping — one of the biggest factors that can affect data processing speed.
_	In the United States, the Winter Classics have been a ratings winner; 4.56 million people watched the 2011 Winter Classic, and the game led to a ratings win for NBC in the coveted 18–49 age group despite the fact that poor weather forced the NHL to move the start time of the game back several hours on less than a day's notice.
_	Roger Stone denied leaving the message, despite the fact that his voice was recognized, claiming he was at a movie that was later shown not to have been screened that night.
_	Henry Drummond in "The Descent of Man" (1894) stated that emergence can be seen in the fact that the laws of nature are different for the organic or vital compared to the inertial inorganic realm.
_	In this case, the angular velocity and angular acceleration of the body are scalars and the fact that they are vectors along the rotation axis is ignored.
_	This identity struggle represented in French rap music is further complicated by the fact that black rappers in France struggle to create a presence in the film industry and on television where French Blacks receive little exposure and being white opens doors to many more opportunities.
_	Reading the interval notation is somewhat complicated by the fact that some staves use bottom-up notation (the bottom note of each chord is specified and intervals are read upwards from the given note) and some use top-down notation (the top note of each chord is specified and intervals are read downwards from the given note).
_	The Gamma Epsilon part of the name originates from the fact that the house was originally the Gamma Epsilon chapter of Kappa Sigma.
_	Apparently the relation between indicated mean effective pressure and air supply density is based upon the fact that the change of indicated mean effective pressure is proportional to the change of density of the charge at the beginning of compression, irrespective of whether the density is changed by altitude or by throttling.
_	Reese was an Atlantic City legend who never lost his love for the town – despite the fact that he once was a public advocate of leveling it with “a bulldozer six blocks wide.
_	His election was validated despite the fact that he had given senatorial electors free transport and food on one of his boats, from where they went under escort to vote.
_	A measure of the success of Hewitt's 2013 season is the fact that he won the Newcombe medal as the most outstanding Australian tennis player in 2013, a year in which he returned to the world's top 100.
_	Bugs lives a pampered life, oblivious to the fact that a scientist plans on switching his brain (or at least his personality, since no surgery is involved) with that of a chicken.
_	In Ross's "Translator's Introduction," she notes that Mann's 19th-century version of the text was influenced by Mann's friendship with Sarmiento and by the fact that he was at the time a candidate in the Argentine presidential election:
_	She is struck by the jealousy of her aunt who is enraged by the fact that Snow is lovelier than her.
_	With the same interest and passion in folk music, and in spite of the fact that all were engaged in other musical groups at that time, they decided to continue together.
_	The second sentence refers to the fact that Philip Morris sued the filmmakers, and in a 1979 secret settlement all copies were suppressed.
_	Its second name dervies from the fact that it was the church for the Ordre de la sincérité and its successor the Order of the Red Eagle.
_	An interesting history is found in the fact that the town had been divided for four centuries between two lords, and this division was only completed in 1849.
_	The court held that the role of the AAT was administrative in nature – not judicial – regardless of the fact that the AAT considered questions of law.
_	Webber gave the game a 58/100 score and commented on the fact that "the game is better played in front of an audience, but there is more available than what someone may see at first glance" .
_	This was despite the fact that due to participation in freedom struggle he was forced by the colonial British regime to leave Ripon College at Calcutta and he transferred to Victoria College (now Acharya Brojendra Nath Seal College) at Cooch Bihar.
_	Another aspect of Playfair that separates it from four-square and two-square ciphers is the fact that it will never contain a double-letter digram, e.g. EE.
_	The inspiration for this idiomatic metaphor lies in the fact that the wheel is the archetype of human ingenuity, both by virtue of the added power and flexibility it affords its users, and also in the ancient origins which allow it to underlie much, if not all, of modern technology.
_	Other than the fact that they spoke a language belonging to the Oto-Manguean language family, nothing is known of their tongue.
_	Having fallen surplus to requirements ahead of the 2017–18 season, the club attempted to find a solution with regards to the player's contract termination; the fact that no agreement was reached as of the summer transfer window's end created turbulence amongst Omonia's ultras, indirectly accusing the player of being professionally idle whilst being paid out of his contract's earnings.
_	Bogart was proud of his success, but the fact that it came from playing a gangster weighed on him.
_	However, research productivity is hampered by the fact that the Marriott School has no doctoral programs, and therefore, no doctoral students focused on research.
_	He joined Aboomoslem Mashhad F.C. in November 2009 but the organisation did not give him the permit to sit on the bench as they mentioned the fact that he is on the suspension list, providing no evidence to prove their accusations.
_	Many reviews also found the interface confusing and difficult to learn, a problem that was not helped by the fact that the "Learning" manual was just a rearranged version of the reference manual.
_	Payne once again claimed that the album would be "edgier" and that the group had written most of the songs for it; Horan came up with the name of the album, commemorating the fact that it is One Direction's fourth record to date and that it has been four years since the band's formation.
_	Despite the fact that the first-ever powered flight had occurred only seven years previously, Rolls had been attempting a precision landing.
_	At the 1999 ceremony in the wake of the horror stories that were coming out of Woodstock 99, Adam Horovitz addressed the fact that there had been many cases of sexual assaults and rapes at the festival, suggesting the need for bands and festivals to pay much more attention to the security details at their concerts.
_	According to his 2011 autobiography "The Elephant to Hollywood", Caine had been released from his contract with producer Joseph E. Levine after the making of "Zulu" as Levine has told him, "I know you're not, but you gotta face the fact that you look like a queer on screen."
_	In 2012, arguing that after more than 9 years the EPA continues to maintain the registration status for clothianidin despite the fact that the registrant has failed to supply satisfactory studies confirming its safety, an alliance of beekeepers and environmental groups filed a petition on March 21 asking the EPA to block the use of clothianidin in agricultural fields until they have conducted a review of the product.
_	Social pressures and stereotypes contribute to the fact that many girls lose interest in STEM early on.
_	Another parallel between the student loan industry and the mortgage industry is the fact that subprime lending has run rampant over the past few years.
_	The "colegio mayor de Maese Rodrigo" and the university proper, although housed in the same building, never lost their separate identities, as is shown by the fact that, in the 18th century, the university was moved to the College of San Hermenegildo, while that of Maese Rodrigo remained independent, although languishing.
_	Fox initially named the project "Node.x", a play on the naming of Node.js, with the "x" representing the fact that the new project was polyglot in nature, and didn't simply support JavaScript.
_	Despite the fact that Israeli security legislation for Palestinian territories does not state that military law applies only to Arab residents of the territories, and not to Jews or to Israeli citizens.
_	McLuhan was referring to the fact that our social practices co-evolve with our use of new tools and the refinements we make to existing tools.
_	The title refers to middle class social conventions of the time, in particular the fact that the parents of a girl engaged to a poorly paid curate would typically not allow the marriage until he had secured a more remunerative position – i.e. within the church hierarchy.
_	Originally, the song had a different third verse, differing in the fact that, at the end of the song, Santa is killed by the SWAT team.
_	The name is derived from the fact that the first people to see these measurements erroneously reported that they had discovered sunken islands.
_	Jones et al. (2010) said, "Characteristics of the markers and the fact that they are analysed by fallible humans can result in inconsistencies that present problems for parentage analysis."
_	The anti-semitic daily newspaper "Sfarmă Piatră" (literally "Breaking Rocks") denounced Sebastian as a "Zionist agent and traitor", despite the fact that Sebastian vocally declared himself to be a proud Romanian with no interest in emigrating from his Romanian homeland.
_	Such compounds are widely used in industrial chemistry, despite the fact that they are often highly pyrophoric.
_	Garibaldi later officially conferred him with the rank of Captain despite the fact that Seymour was merely a civilian volunteer, and he assumed the name pseudonym "Captain Richard Sarsfield" in commemoration of a hero he had heard about when at Christ Church, Oxford.
_	The lapses in intuition mostly stemmed from the fact that the limit of an infinite statistical system has many zero-one laws which are absent in finite systems: an infinitesimal change in a parameter can lead to big differences in the overall, aggregate behavior, as Democritus expected.
_	Despite the fact that Sarakatsanika includes a few words related to pastoralism of Aromanian origin, the Aromanian influences on the Sarakatsani dialect are the result of recent contacts and economical dependencies between the two groups.
_	The members nevertheless always insisted on the fact that their approach was foremost a musical one.
_	His poetical work is infused and vivified by his medical profession, his love of and expertise in contemporary art, and by the fact that his parents were Holocaust survivors.
_	One immediate issue for Li Congke to confront was the fact that the imperial treasury lacked the resources for him to give out rewards of what he promised both his initial own Fengxiang soldiers and the imperial soldiers who submitted to him.
_	Some of the town's early growth could be attributed to the fact that it was on an asphalt paved road that intersected with a dirt road to the rest of the District of Santa Rosa del Mbutuy, and other departments of the nation.
_	GAO's independence is further safeguarded by the fact that its workforce consists of career civil servants hired on the basis of their knowledge, skill, and ability."
_	The unusual feature of this game is the fact that the two decks are decks used in piquet and bezique, i.e. those that have the deuces (twos), treys (threes), fours, fives, and sixes removed.
_	The police highlighted that no single shot was fired in the operation, partly due to the fact that El Tanque and his three accomplices were drinking alcohol and were not prepared to defend themselves when the police raided the building.
_	The Spartans initially held out against the allies, but their resistance was hampered by the fact that the Romans' large shields made missile attacks futile.
_	Despite the fact that Grover ruins his dining experiences, Mr. Johnson always goes back to Charlie's (he even says to himself, "Why do I keep coming back to this place?").
_	The existence of eigenforms is a nontrivial result, but does come directly from the fact that the Hecke algebra is commutative.
_	The guru passes his knowledge to his disciples by virtue of the fact that his purified consciousness enters into the selves of his disciples and communicates its particular characteristic.
_	After rumors spread that Mast would return to Travis Carter to drive a car sponsored by Kmart, he joined the No. 98 Cale Yarborough-owned team, despite the fact that the team did not have sponsorship.
_	Using the two previous results and the fact that there exists a Morse function on any differentiable manifold, one can prove that any differentiable manifold is a CW complex with an "n"-cell for each critical point of index "n".
_	The name refers to the fact that the majority of them nest in cavities.
_	Instead, he had merely focused on the fact that an "amendment" to the Constitution means any addition or change to it.
_	The Mysterons’ threat that ‘one of you will be under our control’ as well as the fact that he spares Symphony's life and merely disappeared some time after returning to Earth from the Martian expedition has given many fans of the show reason to believe that he did not die and therefore is not a Mysteron reconstruction but simply that Captain Black remains a human, albeit one that is in the thrall of the Mysterons.
_	The keys also govern the design of the marimba due to the fact that the keys are supported at points called nodes and these dictate the shape of the marimba due to the graduated lengths of the keys and how one supports them.
_	Due to the fact that rising damp often co-exists with other forms of dampness such as condensation, the use of a mould resistant emulsion paint is often recommended.
_	The White Stockings were close contenders all season, despite the fact that the Great Chicago Fire had destroyed the team's home field and most of their equipment.
_	The French had a 2-1 lead until the last minute of the game when Georgi Hristov, known for his speed and the fact that he was playing with glasses, equalized with an individual action from the left wing.
_	Terri Windling identified "Aurian" as one of the best fantasy debuts of 1994, describing it as "distinctive by the fact that it is quite well written".
_	We gradually have resigned ourselves to the fact that we are a pebble on the beach, so to speak.
_	Section 2 of the Act provides that, whenever it is proved that the faculties of a person were impaired by the consumption or use of a substance when he committed an offence, the court may, in determining an appropriate sentence, regard as an aggravating circumstance the fact that his faculties were so impaired.
_	"In Small's bold statement, ‘the history of the transmission of the text of the Qur’ān is at least as much a testament to the destruction of Qur’ān material as it is to its preservation’, and ‘is also testimony to the fact that there never was one original text of the Qur’ān’ (p. 180).
_	The initial composition of the council included representatives from each of the colonies the dominion absorbed, but because of the inconvenience of travel and the fact that travel costs were not reimbursed, the council's quorums were dominated by representatives from Massachusetts and Plymouth.
_	In a brief work, "Sir Edmund Andros", historian Henry Ferguson attested to the fact that the deliberation of certain policies by an assembly of legislators may have proven inefficient.
_	Whilst doing this, the physician reiterates the fact that these two ventricles move together almost simultaneously and not independently as had been thought previously by his predecessors.
_	Despite the fact that Pendergrass sang most of the group's songs, Melvin was controlling the group's finances.
_	This loss of importance is reflected in the fact that the proportion of the district's population living in the parish fell from four and a half to less than two percent over this period.
_	Mitcham also takes note of the fact that the British C-in-C actually feared that the German leadership would embark on Rommel's strategic plans regarding the Suez Canal instead of that of Hitler.
_	Despite the fact that the competing Martinsyde aircraft had also arrived in Newfoundland, the crew of the Atlantic, Australian pilot Harry Hawker and navigator Kenneth Mackenzie Grieve could not attempt the Atlantic flight for several weeks.
_	In the end, Lord opted to stay in New Brunswick due to his young family and the fact that his departure would force his party into a minority government situation.
_	The neutrality of such solutions reflects the fact that sulfate is derived, formally, from the strong acid sulfuric acid.
_	Taxila owed much of it success to the fact that it was located at the intersection of the three major trade routes of India and Central and Western Asia.
_	Therefore, the choice of the name "Mojette" serves to emphasize the fact that the transform uses only exact unit in additions and subtractions.
_	Despite the fact that he is hated for the most part by the other inhabitants of Halloween Town, it appears they still allow him to take part in their celebration, as his shadow makes an appearance in the opening musical "This Is Halloween" as the "shadow on the moon at night, filling your dreams to the brim with fright".
_	Furthermore, citing the fact that U.S. laws allowed Cisco to export its products, the court maintained that it was precluded from providing judicial remedy to victims of China's human rights abuses.
_	Other critiques note the fact that private bodies are excluded from the mandatory procedures(Mason, 2010), and that, moreover, it can also be debated whether the NGOs involved are faithfully representing environmental interests, ordinary citizens often do not have the financial means to participate effectively and are therefore have no choice but to be represented by these larger organisations.
_	Due to the amount of physical and circumstantial evidence investigators had thus far compiled, which indicated Chikatilo was indeed the murderer they had been pursuing, plus the fact that investigators had deduced the blood type of the murderer they had pursued using semen samples obtained from the clothing and bodies of 14 of the victims as opposed to actual blood samples, investigators obtained a sample of Chikatilo's semen to test his blood type, the results of which confirmed that Chikatilo's semen was type AB, whereas his blood and saliva were type A.
_	The writing challenges included the fact that the character was so very unused to modern concepts.
_	The main line of defense of the magazine's owners was the fact that in 2005 the president of Warsaw, Lech Kaczyński, forbade the organization the Pride Parade, manifesting inclination toward uneven treatment of minorities.
_	Despite the fact that the lawsuit was prolonged due to the complex German judicial proceedings, it was closed with an agreement.
_	See deplores the fact that certain persons and Institutions persist in formatting the movement in obvious contradiction with the dispositions of ecclesiastical authority and thus disseminate confusion among the people especially among the simple and defenseless."
_	Despite the fact that Klitschko possessed an overwhelming advantage over his challenger, the Ukrainian was quoted as saying the bout was “the most important fight of my career” due to the political backdrop of the encounter from a Ukrainian point of view.
_	Given the fact that the intensity of the competition for limited university places is unimaginable, most high schools are evaluated by their academic performance in Gaokao by parents and students.
_	This presumption is based on the fact that Abdullah ibn Jada'an, whose house was the venue for this pledge, was Abu Bakr's fellow clansman.
_	But they do have the germ of illness in them at one time or another, and the fact that hundreds of them don't develop tuberculosis doesn't make me say, 'never mind the tubercle bacillus; it doesn't harm people, so let it go'".
_	The main disadvantages of monolithic kernels are the dependencies between system components a bug in a device driver might crash the entire system and the fact that large kernels can become very difficult to maintain.
_	Selman thinks a strong thing about the episode is the fact that, despite Homer's love for food, Homer is not the one that becomes a foodie as one might expect.
_	Zhamaylo was able to restore order, helped by the fact that the Poles did not pursue the Cossacks till the following morning.
_	On March 13 at Beirut, the AFL units from the Shukri Ghanem Barracks in Fayadieh under Col. Barakat clashed with the Officer cadets of the adjoining Military Academy, whose Commander supported Brigadier-General Aziz El-Ahdab's failed coup attempt against President Frangieh, despite the fact that some officers from the AFL (Fouad Malek, Wehbeh Katicha, Ghazi Ghattas) had signed a petition pledging their support to Gen. Ahdab's initiative.
_	Stabenow was also likely helped by the fact that Al Gore won Michigan on the presidential level.
_	Arjun is also angered about the fact that his daughter has developed a crush for Karan.
_	The PLA lost over 20,000 men due to weapons and equipment that were outdated, poorly made, and in short supply (a side effect of the disruption caused by the Cultural Revolution), maps that were decades old, the continued use of human-wave tactics from the Korean War, and the fact that the army had no system of ranks.
_	Even worse was the fact that the Chinese had not even engaged Vietnam's regular army (which was in Cambodia), but instead fought militia and home guard units.
_	It is possible that the writer's family refused to publish the book earlier due to the fact that an incestuous relationship is the dominant feature of the story.
_	He did not discover her true allegiances, or the fact that she was actually his half-sister, until the penultimate episode, "The Coming of Arthur, Part One".
_	To account for the fact that formula_6 may influence the statements that are being proven, the witness relation can be generalized to formula_7 parameterized by formula_6.
_	This was due to the fact that until the 1960s, Argentine football developed more or less isolated from the evolution brought by English, Italian and Hungarian coaches, owing to technological limitations at the time in communications and travelling with Europe, lack of information as to keeping up with news, lack of awareness and/or interest in the latest innovations, and strong nationalism promoted by the Asociación del Fútbol Argentino (for example, back then Argentines playing in Europe were banned from playing in the Argentine national team).
_	Allegations about corruption within the Banten administration are made more sensitive by the fact that there are well-known historical overtones to the issue of corruption in the area.
_	There are also denials of the fact that Indians in general and Hindus in particular are being ethnically cleansed in Kashmir.
_	The costly information hypothesis explains flower constancy based on the fact that insects stay constant and feed on a one flower type because they know they are obtaining a reliable reward: nectar.
_	Hence he applauded the fact that Breen had assumed the power to censor Hollywood.
_	And I remembered Libra and the fact that he is connected to this ascending to godhood thing tied him in really quite nicely.
_	Supporters highlighted the fact that only in Israel are Jewish women prohibited from praying according to their custom in a public location and a 2003 High Court ruling which prevented them from conducting prayer services at the wall was overturned in 2013.
_	Two memorable aspects of the performance were Salomé's costume – a Pertegaz pantsuit covered in long strands of porcelain resembling beads – and the fact that the singer chose to dance on the spot during certain parts of the song.
_	It also questioned whether the operations met the requirements under international humanitarian law based on the fact that the military carried out bombings even after it declared only a few militants remained alive.
_	The meticulous attention that Taghvā'i has given to the accurate representation of even the most mundane aspects of the film would at first sight seem to be at odds with the fact that with the exception of the opening and closing scenes, in "all" other scenes where the clock on the wall of the sitting room is in sight, its pendulum is conspicuously motionless.
_	White is considered by one source to be among the top five tight ends in Kansas City Chiefs history despite the fact that he played only 63 games overall for the franchise.
_	Taiwanese society often treats migrant brides as a threat to public health and a large burden to the nation, despite the fact that the highest point of infection among foreign brides peaked in 1998 with 1.31% of incoming brides testing positive for the HIV/AIDs virus.
_	Whatever its true location, the fact that Tomrair is assigned the title ' of ', coupled with the fact that Amlaíb is identified as the son of the King of ', seems to suggest that " was regarded as a well-defined kingdom as opposed to an obscure region.
_	For example, the Battle of Midway is often cited as a decisive operational victory for the US despite the fact that the Pacific War ended more than three years later with the decisive "strategic" victory of the atomic bombings of Hiroshima and Nagasaki, which directly led to the Japanese surrender; this is because the Midway operation represented the destruction of the majority of the IJN's offensive carrier forces, which decisively stopped both the IJN's string of unbroken victories in combat and their plans to expand eastward into Midway Island, Hawaii, the Aleutian Islands and potentially the US mainland.
_	This layout is caused by the fact that there is a hearth with cut section, the keystone which complete the whole of that room is composed of four fleurons shining all around a coat of arms and reunited by small arches in trefoil.
_	Combined with the fact that the Romanian language contains several hundred words similar only to Albanian, Georgiev proposes the Albanian language formed between the 4th and 6th centuries in or near modern-day Romania, which was Dacian territory.
_	In another interview, he discussed the fact that there weren't any "epics" (very long songs) on "Heaven & Earth":
_	"Miracle Day", however, ended with all kinds of cliffhangers, which Martin found strange in view of its unfavourable reviews and the fact that Davies was not sure he would do any more "Torchwood".
_	Soon though, in the state's opinion, Brown University provided inadequate agricultural education, which was, in part, due to the fact that it could not afford to hire a specific professor or faculty of agricultural sciences and also, in part, due to the fact that Rhode Island's method for allocating land-grant scholarships favored urbanites and effectively produced few to no farmers.
_	The average atomic unfolding behavior was strikingly similar to that of CD, underlining the fact that unfolding curves of low resolution experiments are highly simplified representations of a more complex behavior.
